                 Black Skin, White Masks

Fanon 00 pre iii 4/7/08 14:17:00 Originally published by Editions de
             Seuil, France, 1952 as Peau Noire, Masques Blanc First
             published in the United Kingdom in 1986 by Pluto Press
             345 Archway Road, London N6 5AA This new edition
             published 2008

             www.plutobooks.com

             Copyright © Editions de Seuil 1952 English translation
             copyright © Grove Press Inc 1967

             The right of Homi K. Bhabha and Ziauddin Sardar to be
             identified as the authors of the forewords to this work
             has been asserted by them in accordance with the
             Copyright, Designs and Patents Act 1988.

             British Library Cataloguing in Publication Data A
             catalogue record for this book is available from the
             British Library

             ISBN 978 0 7453 2849 2 Hardback ISBN 978 0 7453 2848 5
             Paperback

             This book is printed on paper suitable for recycling and
             made from fully managed and sustained forest
             sources. Logging, pulping and manufacturing processes are
             expected to conform to the environmental standards of the
             country of origin. The paper may contain up to 70% post
             consumer waste.







             Designed and produced for Pluto Press by Chase Publishing
             Services Ltd, Sidmouth, EX10 9QG, England Typeset by
             Stanford DTP Services, Northampton Printed and bound in
             the European Union by CPI Antony Rowe, Chippenham and
             Eastbourne









Foreword to the 2008 edition by Ziauddin Sardar vi Foreword to the
1986 edition by Homi K. Bhabha xxi Translator’s Note xxxviii

Introduction 1

1 The Negro and Language 8 2 The Woman of Color and the White Man 28 3
The Man of Color and the White Woman 45 4 The So-Called Dependency
Complex of Colonized Peoples 61 5 The Fact of Blackness 82 6 The Negro
and Psychopathology 109 7 The Negro and Recognition 163 8 By Way of
Conclusion 174

Index 182





FOREWORD TO THE 2008 EDITION Ziauddin Sardar




I think it would be good if certain things were said: Fanon and the
epidemiology of oppression The opening gambit of Black Skin, White
Masks ushers us towards an imminent experience: the explosion will not
happen today.* But a type of explosion is about to unfold in the text
in front of us, in the motivations it seeks, in the different world it
envisages and aims to create. We are presented with a series of
statements, maxims if you like, both obvious and not so obvious: I do
not come with timeless truths; fervor is the weapon of choice of the
impotent; the black man wants to be white, the white man slaves to
reach a human level. We are left with little doubt we are confronting
a great deal of anger. The resentment takes us to a particular place:
a zone of non-being, an extraordinary sterile and arid region, where
black is not a man, and mankind is digging into its own flesh to find
meaning.  But this not simply a historic landscape, although Black
Skin, White Masks is a historic text, firmly located in time and
place.  Fanon’s anger has a strong contemporary echo. It is the silent
scream of all those who toil in abject poverty simply to exist in the
hinterlands and vast conurbations of Africa. It is the resentment of
all those marginalized and firmly located on the fringes in Asia and
Latin America. It is the bitterness of those demonstrating against the
Empire, the superiority complex of the neo-conservative ideology, and
the banality of the “War on Terror.” It is the anger of all whose
cultures, knowledge systems and ways of being that are ridiculed,
demonized, declared inferior and irrational, and, in some cases,
eliminated. This is not just any anger. It is the universal * Direct
quotations from Black Skin, White Masks are set in italics.

vi





F O R EWO R D TO TH E 2 0 0 8 ED ITIO N vii



fury against oppression in general, and the perpetual domination of
the Western civilization in particular.  This anger is not a
spontaneous phenomenon. It is no gut reaction, or some recently
discovered passion for justice and equity. Rather, it is an anger
borne out of grinding experience, painfully long self analysis, and
even longer thought and reflection.  As such, it is a guarded anger,
directed at a specific, long term desire. The desire itself is
grounded in self-consciousness: when it encounters resistance from the
other, self-consciousness undergoes the experience of desire—the first
milestone on the road that leads to dignity. Black Skin, White Masks
offers a very particular definition of dignity. Dignity is not located
in seeking equality with the white man and his civilization: it is not
about assuming the attitudes of the master who has allowed his slaves
to eat at his table. It is about being oneself with all the
multiplicities, systems and contradictions of one’s own ways of being,
doing and knowing. It is about being true to one’s Self. Black Skin,
White Masks charts the author’s own journey of discovering his dignity
through an interrogation of his own Self—a journey that will not be
unfamiliar to all those who have been forced to endure western
civilization.


1. I was born in the Antilles

Frantz Omar Fanon, born on 20 July 1925 in Fort-de-France, in the
French colony of Martinique, was a complex figure, with multiple
selves. He was, as he tells us, from Antilles but he ended his life
thinking of himself as an Algerian. His parents belonged to the middle
class community of the island: father a descendant of slaves, mother
of mixed French parenthood. In Fort-de-France, he studied at Lycée
Schoelcher, where one of his teachers was poet and writer Aimé
Césaire. Césaire’s passionate denouncement of colonial racism had a
major influence on the impressionable Fanon. As a young dissident, he
agitated against the Vichy regime in the Antilles and traveled to
Dominica to support the French resistance in the Caribbean. Soon
afterwards, he found himself in France where he joined the resistance
against the occupying forces





viii BL AC K S KI N, WHI TE M A SKS



of Nazi Germany. While serving in the military, Fanon experienced
racism on a daily basis. In France, he noticed that French women
avoided black soldiers who were sacrificing their lives to liberate
them. He was wounded; and was awarded the Croix de Guerre for bravery
during his service in the Free French forces.  After the War, Fanon
won a scholarship to study medicine and psychiatry in Lyon.  While
still a student he met José Dublé, a French woman who shared his
convictions against racism and colonialism. The couple married in
1952, had one son, and stayed together for the rest of their
lives. Fanon also began to use psychoanalysis to study the effects of
racism on individuals, particularly its impact on the self- perception
of blacks themselves. During the 1950s metropolitan France was a
center of revolutionary philosophy and a magnet for writers, thinkers
and activists from Africa. Fanon imbibed the ideas of philosopher
Jean-Paul Sartre; and became friends with Octave Mannoni, French
psychoanalyst and author of Psychology of Colonization. As a young man
searching for his own identity in a racist society, Fanon identified
with the African freedom fighters who came to France seeking allies
against European colonialism.  He began to define a new black
identity; and became actively involved in the anti-colonialist
struggle. So when, in 1953, he was offered a job as head of the
psychiatric department of Bilda- Joinville Hospital in Algiers he
jumped at the opportunity.  Fanon arrived in Algeria just as the
colony was on the verge of a full blown, violent struggle against the
French. He was appalled by the racist treatment of Algerians and the
disparity he witnessed between the living standards of the European
colonizers and the indigenous Arab population. He developed a close
rapport with the Algerian poor and used group therapy to help, as well
as study, his patients. There was intellectual ferment too. A major
event of 1954 was the publication of Vacation de l’Islam by the
Algerian social philosopher Malek Bennabi. Published to synchronize
with the outbreak of the Algerian revolution, Vacation de l’Islam
presented the radical concept of “colonisi- bilité”: the historical
process through which Algeria, and other Muslim countries, declined
culturally and intellectually to a stage
where colonialism becomes a “historical necessity.” Bennabi, who like
Fanon spent most of his life struggling against French racism,
distinguished between “a country simply conquered and occupied and a
colonised country.”1 The latter had lost its own cultural bearings and
internalized the idea of the inherent superiority of the colonizing
culture. Fanon and Bennabi never met; but it is difficult to imagine
their work did not fertilize each other’s thought.  The French
response to the 1954 Algerian revolt was brutal, involving torture,
killing, physical abuse and barbaric repression.  For two years Fanon
secretly supported the revolutionaries. Then, in 1956, he resigned his
post and openly joined the National Liberation Front (FLN). He moved
to Tunis, where he worked for Manouba Clinic and Neuropsychiatric
Center and founded the radical magazine Moudjahid (from Jihad, meaning
freedom fighter). Soon he acquired a reputation as a leading ideologue
of the Algerian revolution. He received many death threats from the
French and their sympathizers—which only served to strengthen his
resolve. By now, Fanon identified himself as an Algerian.  He traveled
throughout Africa speaking on behalf of the FLN; and even served as an
ambassador to Ghana on behalf of the provisional government of
Algeria.  Fanon did not live to see Algeria acquire full independence.
While still in Ghana he was diagnosed with leukemia. He went first to
the Soviet Union for treatment; and later to the United States. He
died in Washington on 6 December 1961.  Throughout the 1960s and
1970s, Fanon was hailed as a revolutionary writer, a hero of the Third
World and anti-colonial movement. He wrote his most influential book,
The Wretched of the Earth, just before his death. Published in 1961,
with a preface by Sartre, it became a key text for radical students
and served as an inspiration for the Black Power movement in the
United States.  While its endorsement of violence is problematic, The
Wretched of the Earth offers one of the most penetrating analyses of
the social psychology of colonialism. But Fanon’s celebrity collapsed
almost as quickly as the Berlin Wall and he was even forgotten in
Algeria which he claimed as his own. Conservative writers have reacted
against his views on violence and leftist intellectuals have
x BL AC K S KIN , WHITE M A SKS
dismissed his revolutionary statements as outdated and naïve. But the
arrival of postcolonial studies in the 1990s heralded a new interest
in Fanon. Today, Fanon waits to be rediscovered by a new generation
burning with a desire for change—the very emotion that motivated Fanon
to set sail from Martinique.
2. The architecture of this book is rooted in the temporal
Fanon wrote Black Skin, White Masks when he was 27. Published in 1952,
it was his first and perhaps most enduring book. And it was
ignored. Its significance was recognized only after the death of the
author, particularly after the publication of the English translation
a decade and a half later in 1967. It was a year when anti-war
campaigning was at its height; and student strikes and protests, that
began at Columbia University, New York, started to spread like
wildfire across the United States and Europe. Martin Luther King was
leading the civil rights movement and was to be assassinated a year
later. Advocates of black power were criticizing attempts to
assimilate and integrate black people. The book caught the imagination
of all who argued for and promoted the idea of black consciousness. It
became the bible of radical students, in Paris and London, outraged at
the exploitation of the Third World.  Black Skin, White Masks was the
first book to investigate the psychology of colonialism. It examines
how colonialism is internalized by the colonized, how an inferiority
complex is inculcated, and how, through the mechanism of racism, black
people end up emulating their oppressors. It is due to the
sensitivities of Fanon, says Ashis Nandy, that “we know something
about the interpersonal patterns which constituted the colonial
situation, particularly in Africa.”2 Fanon began a process of
psychoanalytic deconstruction that was developed further first by
Nandy in The Intimate Enemy and then by Ngugi wa Thiong in
Decolonising the Mind (1986). Other theorists of colonial subjectivity
have followed in their footsteps.  Fanon writes from the perspective
of a colonized subject. He is a subject with a direct experience of
racism who has developed a
natural and intense hatred of racism. When it comes to experience,
this is no ordinary subject: already the author has fought for the
resistance in the Caribbean and France, has been wounded near the
Swiss border, and received a citation for courage. He has a
professional interest in psychoanalysis and speaks of Sigmund Freud,
Alfred Adler, and Carl Gustav Jung without much distinction. He is
going to offer us a psychoanalytic interpreta- tion of the black
problem, he says. But we can be sure that this is not a therapy
session. Fanon is no armchair philosopher or academic theorist. He has
a more urgent and pressing thing on his mind: liberation.  There is an
urgency to Black Skin, White Masks that bursts from its pages. The
text is full of discontinuities, changes in style, merging of genres,
dramatic movement from analysis to pro- nouncements, switches from
objective scientific discussion to deep subjectivity, transfers from
theory to journalism, complex use of extended metaphors, and, not
least, a number of apparent contra- dictions. As a genuine, and dare I
say “old fashioned” polymath, Fanon is not afraid to use any and all
the tools and methods at his disposal: Marxism, psychoanalysis,
literary criticism, medical dissection, and good old aphorisms. And he
is just as happy to subvert them—a livid subversion that some would
see as contradiction. But above all the text has an immediacy that
engages and stirs us. We can feel a soul in turmoil, hear a voice that
speaks directly to us, and see the injustices described being lived in
front of our eyes. This is most evident in the chapter on “The Fact of
Blackness.” Here, Fanon breaks out of all convention and simply lets
his stream of consciousness wash on to the paper.  All this whiteness
that burns me. I sit down at the fire and became aware of my
uniform. I had not seen it. It is indeed ugly. I stop there, for who
can tell me what beauty is? This directness, this simmering anger,
makes us uncomfortable because “civilized society” does not like
uncomfortable truths and naked honesty.  But this is exactly what
makes Black Skin, White Masks such a powerful and lasting indictment
of western civilization.  There is little point, I think, in accusing
Fanon of sexism and gender bias. It is indeed true, as Bart
Moore-Gilbert suggests, that
xii BL AC K S KIN , WHITE M A SKS
Black Skin, White Masks “discriminates pointedly between the
experiences of men and women of colour.”3 But who used gender neutral
language in the 1950s? And yes, Fanon can be used both to attack and
defend European humanism. That’s because European humanism does have a
few redeeming features along with its totalizing tendencies. He is
critical of European universalism yet uses the discourse of
psychoanalysis to reveal the emotional anomalies responsible for the
resulting complexes because one can distance oneself from certain
varieties of universalism and get closer to certain other notions of
universal thought and values.  Fanon is a contextual thinker and
embraces that which makes most sense to him in the context of his
dilemmas.  When reading Black Skin, White Masks one ought to keep the
time and circumstances in which it was written firmly in mind. This is
a dynamic text written in the heat of an intense, and often bloody,
liberation struggle. It emerged from a life- and-death struggle, an
individual as well as a collective struggle, concerned with the
survival of the body as well as the survival of the soul. The struggle
is concerned as much with freedom from colonialism as with liberation
from the suffocating embrace of Europe, and the pretensions of its
civilization to be the universal destiny of all humanity. The text
changes and unfolds itself as the experiences of the author transform
and change him, as he suffocates, gasps, twists, struggles, and turns
his back on the degradation of those who would make man a mere
mechanism.  For Fanon, the struggle is nothing less than an attempt to
survive, to breathe the air of liberty.  We need to see the
context. But we also need to lift our perceptions to see its global
message. For we all desire what Fanon wants.
3. What does the black man want?
At first sight, Fanon is rather hard on the “black man.” He is
supposed to be a good nigger who even lacks the advantage of being
able to accomplish this descent into a real hell. But Fanon’s anger is
directed not towards the “black man” but the
proposition that he is required not only to be black but he must be
black in relation to the white man. It is the internalization, or
rather as Fanon calls it epidermalization, of this inferiority that
concerns him. When the black man comes into contact with the white
world he goes through an experience of sensitization.  His ego
collapses. His self-esteem evaporates. He ceases to be a
self-motivated person. The entire purpose of his behavior is to
emulate the white man, to become like him, and thus hope to be
accepted as a man. It is the dynamic of inferiority that concerns
Fanon; and which ultimately he wishes to eliminate. This is the
declared intention of his study: to enable the man of color to
understand … the psychological elements that can alienate his fellow
Negro.  Whiteness, Fanon asserts, has become a symbol of purity, of
Justice, Truth, Virginity. It defines what it means to be civilized,
modern and human. That is why the Negro knows nothing of the cost of
freedom; when he has fought for Liberty and Justice … these were
always white liberty and white justice; that is, values secreted by
his masters. Blackness represents the diametrical opposite: in the
collective unconsciousness, it stands for ugliness, sin, darkness,
immorality. Even the dictionary definition of white means clean and
pure. We can find, in Roget’s Thesaurus, over 134 synonyms for
whiteness, most with positive connotations. In contrast, Roget’s
Thesaurus tells us black means dirty, prohibited and funereal. It
provides 120 synonyms for black and blackness, none with positive
connotation. This is why a white lie is excusable; and black lie is
all that is wicked and evil. Evolution itself moves from black to
white. Indeed, even the Merciful God is white, with a bushy beard and
bright pink cheeks. The conclusion: One is white as one is rich, as
one is beautiful, as one is intelligent. And the corollary: he is
Negro who is immoral. To become moral in this scheme of the universe,
Fanon tells us, it is necessary to cease being a Negro, cease being
true to history and himself.  But Fanon’s anger is not directed simply
at the black man who wants to turn his race white. He is equally
dismissive of
xiv BL AC K S KIN , WHIT E M A SKS
the man who adores the Negro: he is as “sick” as the man who
abominates him. The idealized Negro is equally a construction of the
white man. He represents the flip side of the Enlightenment: he is
constructed not as a real person with real history but an image. The
idealized Negro, the noble savage, is the product of utopian thinkers,
such as Sir Thomas More, who comes from “No place” and is in the end
“No person.” This Negro was born out of the need of European humanism
to rescue itself from its moral purgatory and project itself, and
displace, the original inhabitants of Latin America and the
Caribbean. Not surprisingly, Fanon does not look on lovers of Negros
with favor.  Liberation begins by recognizing these constructions for
what they are. The first impulse at the arrival of awareness is self-
loathing: as I begin to recognize that the Negro is the symbol of sin,
I catch myself hating the Negro. Here, Fanon is articulating a common
feeling. If all you represent—your history, your culture, your very
self—is nothing but ugly, naïve and wicked, then it is not surprising
that you do not see yourself in a kindly manner.  But this neurotic
situation is not the route to emancipation. There is only one
solution: to rise above the absurd drama that others have staged
around me, to reject the two terms that are equally unacceptable, and,
through one human being, to reach out for the universal.  So the first
thing that the black man wants is to say no. No to degradation of
man. No to exploitation of man. No to the butchery of what is most
human in man: freedom. And, above all, no to those who attempt to
build a definition of him.  While it is understandable, Fanon asserts,
that the first action of the black man is a reaction, it is necessary
to go beyond. But the next step brings us face to face with a
dilemma. Should the black man define himself in reaction to the white
man thus confirming the white man as a measure of all things? Or
should one strive unremittingly for a concrete and ever new
understanding of man?  Where is the true mode of resistance actually
located? How should the black man speak for himself?
4. To speak means … above all to assume a culture, to support the
weight of a civilization
The black man speaks with a European language. He becomes
proportionately whiter in direct ratio to his mastery of the French
language; or indeed, any western language, nowadays most particularly
English. So, almost immediately, the back man is presented with a
problem: how to posit a “black self” in a language and discourse in
which blackness itself is at best a figure of absence, or worse a
total reversion? The problem, however, is not limited simply to the
use of language. When a black man arrives in France it is not only the
language that changes him.  He is changed also because it is from
France that he received his knowledge of Mostesquieu, Rousseau, and
Voltaire, but also because France gave him his physicians, his
department head, his innumerable little functionaries. At issue is
thus not just language but also the civilization of the white man.
Fanon uses “white” as a generic term for European civilization and its
representatives.  In contrast, “black” refers to the non-West in
general. The question then becomes: can the non-West develop its own
self-definition by using the tools and instruments of western
civilization? In human sciences, Fanon detects a problem: they have
their own drama. They have emerged from a particular cultural milieu
and reflect the concerns and prejudices of that culture and
worldview. If western civilization and culture are responsible for
colonial racism, and Europe itself has a racist structure, then we
should not be too surprised to find this racism reflected in the
discourses of knowledge that emanate from this civilization and that
they work to ensure that structural dominance is maintained. The seeds
of inferiority of the non-West are already laid in the first chapter
of history that the others have compiled for me, the foundation of
cannibalism has been made eminently plain in order that I may not lose
sight of it. But western history not only writes cannibalism in the
very chromosomes of the non- West, it also writes off the history of
the non-West. History, both History of the West and History as
perceived by the West, is
xvi BL AC K S KIN , WHIT E M A SKS
transformed into a mighty river into which all Other histories flow
and merge as mere minor and irrelevant tributaries. What Fanon detects
in human sciences applies equally to social sciences.  Anthropology
was developed specifically to describe, manage and contain the black
man. Political science places white man at the apex and is deeply
Eurocentric. Science and Empire went hand in hand: the consequent
racial economy of science, where its benefits accrue primarily to the
rich developed nations and its negative consequences are suffered
largely by the developing countries, are patently plain. What Fanon
says about the comics of the 1950s, the magazines are put together by
white men for little white men, with their white heroes and evil black
villains, works just as effectively in the way disciplines are taught,
discourses are promoted, and knowledge is advanced. In all these areas
there is a constellation of postulates, a series of propositions that
slowly and subtly … work their way into one’s mind and shape one’s
view of the world. All these disciplines and discourses are the
products of a culture which sees itself hierarchically at the top of
the ladder of civilization; they postulate all that the world contains
and all that the world has produced and produces, is by and for the
white man. This is why it is taken as an a priori given that the white
man is the predestined master of this world.  But the dominance of
western culture, and its globalization through this dominance, should
not be confused with universalism.  Just because a particular
discipline or a discourse is accepted or practiced throughout the
world, it does not mean that discipline or discourse is universally
valid and applicable to all societies. After all, as I have written
elsewhere,4 burgers and coke are eaten and drunk throughout the world
but one would hardly classify them as universally embraced, healthy
and acceptable food: what the presence of burgers and coke in every
city and town in the world demonstrate is not their universality but
the power and dominance of the culture that produced them. The same
logic applies to disciplines and discourses. When Fanon talks of
universalism he is not talking of the alleged universalism of western
dominance which is a product of European history, emerges from western
discourses, or is the gift of liberal humanists of the Enlightenment.
His thinking lies elsewhere.  So what does Fanon mean when he wants to
transcend his ethnic perspectives and affiliation and wage his
anti-colonial struggle in the name of universal human values? What are
we to make of the fact that he also sometimes roundly denounces this
universalism? Some postcolonial theorists have seen this as two
different varieties of Fanon. Nicolas Harrison, for example, suggests
the way to reconcile “these two distinct strains within Fanon’s
writing, which is at times anti-universal and at times pro- universal
(and anti-pseudo-universal) is to relativize/historicize them in terms
of personal history and the changes in opinion that his experiences
produced. Another would be to treat his varied claims as a writer’s
rhetorical and/or strategic gestures, and to consider their efficacy
in mobilizing opinion, generating solidarity, etc.”5 But Fanon is not
anti-universal per se—he is only anti a particular kind of
universalism, one based on the notion of superiority which projects
that superiority as a universal discourse. His stated purpose in
examining (western) universalism is clear: I hope by analyzing it to
destroy it. There are not two contradictory but one single, unified
position here. Moreover, Fanon is not concerned at all with postmodern
ambiguity; it could hardly be so given the devastating dominance of
the colonizer he experienced firsthand. For him, the nuances in the
relationship between the colonizer and the colonized are irrelevant
given the fact that the colonizer is totally deaf to the political
condition of the colonized and what the colonized has to say.  Fanon’s
idea of universalism is based on the notions of dignity, equality and
equity: on a concrete and ever new understanding of man. It is a
universalism that does not exist as yet, it cannot emerge from the
dominant discourse, and it cannot be seen as a grand narrative that
privileges a particular culture and its rep- resentatives. It is the
universalism we need to struggle for and build. That is why Fanon is
not content simply with knowledge and criticism. He wants man—and here
he does mean man as the universal person—to be actional. Having
thought, we must prepare to act. Our prime task as humans, he asserts,
is to
xviii BL AC K S KIN , WHITE M A SKS
preserve in all our relationships the respect for the basic values
that constitute a human world. The world is not human. Don’t believe
that appeals to reason or to respect for human dignity can alter
reality, Fanon asserts. If you want a different reality, a different
world, you have to change the one you have.
5. What matters is not to know the world but to change it
Fanon was not a postmodern theorist. His ideas emerged in the crucible
of colonial experience, were put into practice, and used to aid the
anti-colonial struggle. Indeed, by the time Fanon wrote Black Skin,
White Masks, he had already fought for the French resistance in the
Caribbean and against the Germans in France. He had lived in a racist
society and felt its dark side; he spoke with knowledge and
experience. He is thus quite different from most postcolonial
writers. But can we see him as the intellectual father of postcolonial
studies? As Jenny Sharpe notes, Fanon and other anti-colonial writers,
such as C.L.R. James, Aimé Césaire, Amilcar Cabral, Ngugi wa Thiong
and Albert Memmi, “were geographi- cally and historically removed from
the institutional development of postcolonial studies. Unlike the
literature of decolonization, which was bound up with Third World
national liberation movements of the sixties and seventies,
postcolonial studies is primarily a First World academic discourse of
the eighties and nineties.”6 Fanon did not have the luxury for
theorizing for the sake of theorizing. And unlike many postcolonial
texts, Black Skin, White Masks is not a technical manual of theory
full of esoteric—but ultimately futile—jargon. Rather, it is a text
full of passion, argument, analysis and anecdotes. Fanon wants to show
that action does not follow automatically from understanding or
theorizing. Action requires aspiration and desire. That’s what he
seeks to communicate; that’s what he tries to promote.  A great deal
has changed since Fanon’s time. But the underlying structures of
oppression and injustice remain the same. Empire shaped the current
national identity of Britain, France, Spain, Portugal and the
Netherlands. And Empire continues to play a key role in the
psychological makeup, political and cultural
outlook of Africa and Asia. The old European empires have been
replaced by a new Empire, a hyperpower that wants to rule and mould
the world in its own image. Its “war on terror” has become a license
to flout every international law and notion of human rights. Racism,
both in its most blatant and incipient forms, is the foundation of
Fortress Europe—as is so evident in the re- emergence of the extreme
right in Germany and Holland, France and Belgium, as well as
Scandinavia, and the discourse of refugees, immigrants, asylum seekers
and the Muslim population of Europe.  Direct colonial rule may have
disappeared; but colonialism, in its many disguises as cultural,
economic, political and knowledge- based oppression, lives on.  So
Fanon’s voice is as important and relevant today as it was during the
1950s and 1960s. Indeed, in many respects it is even more so. For
Fanon, the nature and mode of operation of oppression is
irrelevant. It is utopian to try to ascertain in what ways one kind of
inhuman behavior differs from another kind of inhuman behavior. The
inhumanity of today is not different from the inhumanity of
yesteryears for all sources of exploitation resemble one another; they
are all applied against the same “object”: man. We need to do much
more, Fanon insists, than simply be aware of this reality: we need to
take continuous action to transform and transcend this reality.  As a
critique of the West, Black Skin, White Masks has few equals. But its
true value is as a clarion call against complacency.  Fanon warns us
to be perpetually on guard against the European unconscious where the
most shameful desires lie dormant; against modern society where life
has no taste, in which the air is tainted, in which ideas and men are
corrupt, and which spells death; against the idea of progress where
everyone climbs up towards whiteness and light and is engulfed by a
single, monolithic notion of what it means to be human. And, most of
all, he warns us to be vigilant to the constant and perpetual
refashioning of hate: hate is not inborn; it has to be constantly
cultivated, to be brought into being, in conflict with more or less
recognized guilt complexes. Hate demands existence, and he who hates
has to
xx BL AC K S KI N, WHI TE M A SKS
show his hate in appropriate actions and behavior; in a sense, he has
to become hate.  This message is as fresh today as when it was
written. Fanon was far, far ahead of his time. This is why he is
disliked by some.  This is why he is misunderstood by others. This is
exactly why you should know him and listen to what he says. And if you
recognize yourself in his words, then like him, I say, you have made a
step forward.
Notes 1. Malek Bennabi, Islam in History and Society (Islamabad,
Islamic Research Institute, 1987), p. 53.  2. Ashis Nandy, The
Intimate Enemy (Delhi, Oxford University Press, 1983), p. 30.  3. Bart
Moore-Gilbert, Postcolonial Theory (London, Verso, 1997), p. 145.
4. For a more detailed discussion of this see my essay “Beyond
development: an Islamic perspective,” in Islam, Postmodernism and
Other Futures: A Ziauddin Sardar Reader, edited by Sohail Inayatullah
and Gail Boxwell (London, Pluto Press, 2003); and Vinay Lal, Empire of
Knowledge (London, Pluto Press, 2002).  5. Nicolas Harrison,
Postcolonial Criticism (Oxford, Polity, 2003), p. 158.  6. Jenny
Sharpe, “US Multiculturalism,” in Postcolonial Studies, edited by
Henry Schwarz and Sangeeta Ray (Oxford, Blackwell, 2000), p. 114.
FOREWORD TO THE 1986 EDITION Homi K. Bhabha
Remembering Fanon: Self, Psyche and the Colonial Condition O my body,
make of me always a man who questions!  Black Skin, White Masks
In the popular memory of English socialism the mention of Frantz Fanon
stirs a dim, deceiving echo. Black Skin, White Masks, The Wretched of
the Earth, Toward the African Revolution— these memorable titles
reverberate in the self-righteous rhetoric of “resistance” whenever
the English left gathers, in its narrow church or its Trotskyist
camps, to deplore the immiseration of the colonized world. Repeatedly
used as the idioms of simple moral outrage, Fanon’s titles emptily
echo a political spirit that is far from his own; they sound the
troubled conscience of a socialist vision that extends, in the main,
from an ethnocentric little Englandism to a large trade union
internationalism. When that laborist line of vision is challenged by
the “autonomous” struggles of the politics of race and gender, or
threatened by problems of human psychology or cultural representation,
it can only make an empty gesture of solidarity. Whenever questions of
race and sexuality make their own organizational and theoretical
demands on the primacy of “class,” “state” and “party” the language of
traditional socialism is quick to describe those urgent, “other”
questions as symptoms of petty-bourgeois deviation, signs of the bad
faith of socialist intellectuals. The ritual respect accorded to the
name of Fanon, the currency of his titles in the common language of
liberation, are part of the ceremony of a polite, English refusal.
xxii BL AC K S KI N, WHI TE M A SKS
There has been no substantial work on Fanon in the history of the New
Left Review; one piece in the New Statesman; one essay in Marxism
Today; one article in Socialist Register; one short book by an English
author. Of late, the memory of Fanon has been kept alive in the
activist traditions of Race and Class, by A. Sivanandan’s stirring
indictments of state racism. Edward Said, himself a scholar engage,
has richly recalled the work of Fanon in his important T.S.  Eliot
memorial lectures, Culture and Imperialism. And finally, Stephan
Feuchtwang’s fine, far-reaching essay, “Fanon’s Politics of Culture”
(Economy and Society) examines Fanon’s concept of culture with its
innovatory insights for a non-deterministic political organization of
the psyche. Apart from these exceptions, in Britain today Fanon’s
ideas are effectively “out of print.”  Memories of Fanon tend to the
mythical. He is either revered as the prophetic spirit of Third World
Liberation or reviled as an exterminating angel, the inspiration to
violence in the Black Power movement. Despite his historic
participation in the Algerian revolution and the influence of his
ideas on the race politics of the 1960s and 1970s, Fanon’s work will
not be possessed by one political moment or movement, nor can it be
easily placed in a seamless narrative of liberationist history. Fanon
refuses to be so completely claimed by events or eventualities. It is
the sustaining irony of his work that his severe commitment to the
political task in hand, never restricted the restless, inquiring
movement of his thought.  It is not for the finitude of philosophical
thinking nor for the finality of a political direction that we turn to
Fanon. Heir to the ingenuity and artistry of Toussaint and Senghor, as
well as the iconoclasm of Nietzsche, Freud and Sartre, Fanon is the
purveyor of the transgressive and transitional truth. He may yearn for
the total transformation of Man and Society, but he speaks most
effectively from the uncertain interstices of historical change: from
the area of ambivalence between race and sexuality; out of an
unresolved contradiction between culture and class; from deep within
the struggle of psychic representation and social reality.  To read
Fanon is to experience the sense of division that prefigures—and
fissures—the emergence of a truly radical thought
that never dawns without casting an uncertain dark. His voice is most
clearly heard in the subversive turn of a familiar term, in the
silence of a sudden rupture: “The Negro is not. Any more than the
white man.” The awkward division that breaks his line of thought keeps
alive the dramatic and enigmatic sense of the process of change. That
familiar alignment of colonial subjects— Black/White, Self/Other—is
disturbed with one brief pause and the traditional grounds of racial
identity are dispersed, whenever they are found to rest in the
narcissistic myths of Negritude or White cultural supremacy. It is
this palpable pressure of division and displacement that pushes
Fanon’s writing to the edge of things; the cutting edge that reveals
no ultimate radiance but, in his words, “exposes an utterly naked
declivity where an authentic upheaval can be born.”  The psychiatric
hospital at Blida-Joinville is one such place where, in the divided
world of French Algeria, Fanon discovered the impossibility of his
mission as a colonial psychiatrist:
If psychiatry is the medical technique that aims to enable man no
longer to be a stranger to his environment, I owe it to myself to
afﬁrm that the Arab, permanently an alien in his own country, lives in
a state of absolute depersonalization ... The social structure
existing in Algeria was hostile to any attempt to put the individual
back where he belonged.
The extremity of this colonial alienation of the person—this end of
the “idea” of the individual—produces a restless urgency in Fanon’s
search for a conceptual form appropriate to the social antagonism of
the colonial relation. The body of his work splits between a
Hegelian–Marxist dialectic, a phenomenological affirmation of Self and
Other and the psychoanalytic ambivalence of the Unconscious, its
turning from love to hate, mastery to servitude. In his desperate,
doomed search for a dialectic of deliverance Fanon explores the edge
of these modes for thought: his Hegelianism restores hope to history;
his existentialist evocation of the “I” restores the presence of the
marginalized; and his psy- choanalytic framework illuminates the
“madness” of racism, the pleasure of pain, the agonistic fantasy of
political power.
xxiv BL AC K S KI N, WHI TE M A SKS
As Fanon attempts such audacious, often impossible, trans- formations
of truth and value, the jagged testimony of colonial dislocation, its
displacement of time and person, its defilement of culture and
territory, refuses the ambition of any “total” theory of colonial
oppression. The Antillean evolué cut to the quick by the glancing look
of a frightened, confused, White child; the stereotype of the native
fixed at the shifting boundaries between barbarism and civility; the
insatiable fear and desire for the Negro: “Our women are at the mercy
of Negroes ... God knows how they make love”; the deep cultural fear
of the Black figured in the psychic trembling of Western sexuality—it
is these signs and symptoms of the colonial condition that drive Fanon
from one conceptual scheme to another, while the colonial relation
takes shape in the gaps between them, articulated in the intrepid
engagements of his style. As Fanon’s text unfolds, the “scientific”
fact comes to be aggressed by the experience of the street;
sociological observations are intercut with literary artefacts, and
the poetry of liberation is brought up short against the leaden,
deadening prose of the colonized world ...  What is this distinctive
force of Fanon’s vision that has been forming even as I write about
the division, the displacement, the cutting edge of his thought? It
comes, I believe, from the tradition of the oppressed, as Walter
Benjamin suggests; it is the language of a revolutionary awareness
that “the state of emergency in which we live is not the exception but
the rule. We must attain to a concept of history that is in keeping
with this insight.”  And the state of emergency is also always a state
of emergence.  The struggle against colonial oppression changes not
only the direction of Western history, but challenges its historicist
“idea” of time as a progressive, ordered whole. The analysis of
colonial de-personalization alienates not only the Enlightenment idea
of “Man,” but challenges the transparency of social reality, as a
pre-given image of human knowledge. If the order of Western
historicism is disturbed in the colonial state of emergency, even more
deeply disturbed is the social and psychic representation of the human
subject. For the very nature of humanity becomes estranged in the
colonial condition and from that “naked declivity”
it emerges, not as an assertion of will nor as an evocation of
freedom, but as an enigmatic questioning. With a question that echoes
Freud’s what does woman want?, Fanon turns to confront the colonized
world. “What does a man want?” he asks, in the introduction to Black
Skin, White Masks, “What does the black man want?”  To this loaded
question where cultural alienation bears down on the ambivalence of
psychic identification, Fanon responds with an agonizing performance
of self-images: I had to meet the white man’s eyes. An unfamiliar
weight burdened me. In the white world the man of color encounters
difﬁculties in the development of his bodily schema ... I was battered
down by tom-toms, cannibalism, intellectual deﬁciency, fetishism,
racial defects ... I took myself far off from my own presence ... What
else could it be for me but an amputation, an excision, a haemorrhage
that spattered my whole body with black blood?
From within the metaphor of vision complicit with a Western metaphysic
of Man emerges the displacement of the colonial relation. The Black
presence ruins the representative narrative of Western personhood: its
past tethered to treacherous stereotypes of primitivism and degeneracy
will not produce a history of civil progress, a space for the Socius;
its present, dismembered and dislocated, will not contain the image of
identity that is questioned in the dialectic of mind/body and resolved
in the epistemology of “appearance and reality.” The White man’s eyes
break up the Black man’s body and in that act of epistemic violence
its own frame of reference is transgressed, its field of vision
disturbed.  “What does the black man want?” Fanon insists and in
privileging the psychic dimension he changes not only what we
understand by a political demand but transforms the very means by
which we recognize and identify its human agency. Fanon is not
principally posing the question of political oppression as the
violation of a human essence, although he lapses into such a lament in
his more existential moment. He is not raising the question of
colonial man in the universalist terms of the liberal- humanist (“How
does colonialism deny the Rights of Man?”);
nor is he posing an ontological question about Man’s being (“Who is
the alienated colonial man?”). Fanon’s question is not addressed to
such a unified notion of history nor such a unitary concept of Man. It
is one of the original and disturbing qualities of Black Skin, White
Masks that it rarely historicizes the colonial experience. There is no
master narrative or realist perspective that provide a background of
social and historical facts against which emerge the problems of the
individual or collective psyche.  Such a traditional sociological
alignment of Self and Society or History and Psyche is rendered
questionable in Fanon’s identifi- cation of the colonial subject who
is historicized as it comes to be heterogeneously inscribed in the
texts of history, literature, science, myth. The colonial subject is
always “overdetermined from without,” Fanon writes. It is through
image and fantasy— those orders that figure transgressively on the
borders of history and the unconscious—that Fanon most profoundly
evokes the colonial condition.  In articulating the problem of
colonial cultural alienation in the psychoanalytic language of demand
and desire, Fanon radically questions the formation of both individual
and social authority as they come to be developed in the discourse of
Social Sovereignity.  The social virtues of historical rationality,
cultural cohesion, the autonomy of individual consciousness assume an
immediate, Utopian identity with the subjects upon whom they confer a
civil status. The civil state is the ultimate expression of the innate
ethical and rational bent of the human mind; the social instinct is
the progressive destiny of human nature, the necessary transition from
Nature to Culture. The direct access from individual interests to
social authority is objectified in the representative structure of a
General Will—Law or Culture—where Psyche and Society mirror each
other, transparently translating their difference, without loss, into
a historical totality. Forms of social and psychic alienation and
aggression—madness, self-hate, treason, violence—can never be
acknowledged as determinate and constitutive conditions of civil
authority, or as the ambivalent effects of the social instinct itself.
They are always explained away as alien presences, occlusions of
historical progress, the ultimate misrecognition of Man.
For Fanon such a myth of Man and Society is fundamentally undermined
in the colonial situation where everyday life exhibits a
“constellation of delirium” that mediates the normal social relations
of its subjects: “The Negro enslaved by his inferiority, the white man
enslaved by his superiority alike behave in accordance with a neurotic
orientation.” Fanon’s demand for a psychoana- lytic explanation
emerges from the perverse reflections of “civil virtue” in the
alienating acts of colonial governance: the visibility of cultural
“mummification” in the colonizer’s avowed ambition to civilize or
modernize the native which results in “archaic inert institutions
[that function] under the oppressor’s supervision like a caricature of
formerly fertile institutions”; or the validity of violence in the
very definition of the colonial social space; or the viability of the
febrile, fantasmatic images of racial hatred that come to be absorbed
and acted out in the wisdom of the West.  These interpositions, indeed
collaborations of political and psychic violence within civic virtue,
alienation within identity, drive Fanon to describe the splitting of
the colonial space of consciousness and society as marked by a
“Manichean delirium.”  The representative figure of such a perversion,
I want to suggest, is the image of post-Enlightenment man tethered to,
not confronted by, his dark reflection, the shadow of colonized man,
that splits his presence, distorts his outline, breaches his
boundaries, repeats his action at a distance, disturbs and divides the
very time of his being.  This ambivalent identification of the racist
world—moving on two planes without being in the least embarrassed by
it, as Sartre says of the anti-Semitic consciousness—turns on the idea
of Man as his alienated image, not Self and Other but the “Other-ness”
of the Self inscribed in the perverse palimpsest of colonial identity.
And it is that bizarre figure of desire, which splits along the axis
on which it turns, that compels Fanon to put the psychoanalytic
question of the desire of the subject to the historic condition of
colonial man.  “What is often called the black soul is a white man’s
artefact,” Fanon writes. This transference, I’ve argued, speaks
otherwise.  It reveals the deep psychic uncertainty of the colonial
relation itself; its split representations stage that division of
“body” and
“soul” which enacts the artifice of “identity”; a division which cuts
across the fragile skin – black and white—of individual and social
authority. What emerges from the figurative language I have used to
make such an argument are three conditions that underlie an
understanding of the process of identification in the analytic of
desire.  First: to exist is to be called into being in relation to an
Otherness, its look or locus. It is a demand that reaches outward to
an external object and as J. Rose writes, “it is the relation of this
demand to the place of the object it claims that becomes the basis for
identification.” This process is visible in that exchange of looks
between native and settler that structures their psychic relation in
the paranoid fantasy of boundless possession and its familiar language
of reversal: “when their glances meet he [the settler] ascertains
bitterly, always on the defensive, “They want to take our place.” It
is true for there is no native who does not dream at least once a day
of setting himself up in the settler’s place.” It is always in
relation to the place of the Other that colonial desire is
articulated: that is, in part, the fantasmatic space of possession”
that no one subject can singly occupy which permits the dream of the
inversion of roles.  Second: the very place of identification, caught
in the tension of demand and desire, is a space of splitting. The
fantasy of the native is precisely to occupy the master’s place while
keeping his place in the slave’s avenging anger. “Black skins, white
masks” is not, for example, a neat division; it is a doubling,
dissembling image of being in at least two places at once which makes
it impossible for the devalued, insatiable evolué (an abandonment
neurotic, Fanon claims) to accept the colonizer’s invitation to
identity: “You’re a doctor, a writer, a student, you’re different
you’re one of us.” It is precisely in that ambivalent use of
“different”—to be different from those that are different makes you
the same—that the Unconscious speaks of the form of Otherness, the
tethered shadow of deferral and displacement. It is not the
Colonialist Self or the Colonized Other, but the disturbing distance
in-between that constitutes the figure of colonial otherness—the White
man’s artifice inscribed on the black man’s body. It is in relation to
this
impossible object that emerges the liminal problem of colonial
identity and its vicissitudes.  Finally, as has already been disclosed
by the rhetorical figures of my account of desire and Otherness, the
question of identi- fication is never the affirmation of a pre-given
identity, never a self-fulfilling prophecy—it is always the production
of an “image” of identity and the transformation of the subject in
assuming that image. The demand of identification—that is, to be for
an Other—entails the representation of the subject in the differenti-
ating order of Otherness. Identification, as we inferred from the
illustrations above, is always the return of an image of identity
which bears the mark of splitting in that “Other” place from which it
comes. For Fanon, like Lacan, the primary moments of such a repetition
of the self lie in the desire of the look and the limits of
language. The “atmosphere of certain uncertainty” that surrounds the
body certifies its existence and threatens its dismemberment.  Look a
Negro ... Mama, see the Negro! I’m frightened ... I could no longer
laugh, because I already know there were legends, stories, history and
above all historicity ... Then assailed at various points, the
corporal schema crumbled its place taken by a racial epidermal schema
... It was no longer a question of being aware of my body in the third
person but in a triple person ... I was responsible for my body, for
my race, for my ancestors.
In reading Black Skin, White Masks it is crucial to respect the
difference between “personal identity” as an intimation of reality, or
an intuition of being, and the psychoanalytic problem of
identification that, in a sense, always begs the question of the
subject—“What does a man want?” The emergence of the human subject as
socially and psychically authenticated depends upon the negation of an
originary narrative of fulfilment or an imaginary coincidence between
individual interest or instinct and the General Will. Such binary,
two-part, identities function in a kind of narcissistic reflection of
the One in the Other which is confronted in the language of desire by
the psychoanalytic process of identification. For identification,
identity is never an a priori, nor a finished product; it is only ever
the problematic process of access
to an “image” of totality. The discursive conditions of this psychic
image of identification will be clarified if we think of the perilous
perspective of the concept of the image itself. For the image—as point
of identification—marks the site of an ambivalence. Its rep-
resentation is always spatially split—it makes present something that
is absent—and temporally deferred—it is the representation of a time
that is always elsewhere, a repetition. The image is only ever an
appurtenance to authority and identity; it must never be read
mimetically as the “appearance” of a “reality.” The access to the
image of identity is only ever possible in the negation of any sense
of originality or plenitude, through the principle of displacement and
differentiation (absence/presence; representa- tion/repetition) that
always renders it a liminal reality. The image is at once a metaphoric
substitution, an illusion of presence and by that same token a
metonym, a sign of its absence and loss. It is precisely from this
edge of meaning and being, from this shifting boundary of otherness
within identity, that Fanon asks: “What does a black man want?”  When
it encounters resistance from the other, self-consciousness undergoes
the experience of desire ... As soon as I desire I ask to be
considered. I am not merely here and now, sealed into thingness. I am
for somewhere else and for something else. I demand that notice be
taken of my negating activity—in so far as I pursue something other
than life ...  I occupied space. I moved towards the other ... and the
evanescent other, hostile but not opaque, transparent, not there,
disappeared. Nausea.
From that overwhelming emptiness of nausea Fanon makes his answer: the
black man wants the objectifying confrontation with otherness; in the
colonial psyche there is an unconscious disavowal of the negating,
splitting moment of desire. The place of the Other must not be imaged
as Fanon sometimes suggests as a fixed phenomenological point, opposed
to the self, that represents a culturally alien consciousness. The
Other must be seen as the necessary negation of a primordial
identity—cultural or psychic—that introduces the system of
differentiation which enables the “cultural” to be signified as a
linguistic, symbolic, historic reality. If, as I have suggested, the
subject of desire is
never simply a Myself, then the Other is never simply an It-self, a
font of identity, truth, or misrecognition.  As a principle of
identification, the Other bestows a degree of objectivity but its
representation—be it the social process of the Law or the psychic
process of the Oedipus—is always ambivalent, disclosing a lack. For
instance, the common, conversational distinction between “the letter
and spirit” of the Law displays the otherness of Law itself; the
ambiguous gray area between “Justice” and judicial procedure is, quite
literally, a conflict of judgment. In the language of psychoanalysis,
the Law of the Father or the paternal metaphor, again, cannot be taken
at its word. It is a process of substitution and exchange that
inscribes a normative, normalizing place for the subject; but that
metaphoric access to identity is exactly the place of prohibition and
repression, precisely a conflict of authority. Identification, as it
is spoken in the desire of the Other, is always a question of
interpretation for it is the elusive assignation of myself with a
one-self, the elision of person and place.  If the differentiating
force of the Other is the process of the subject’s signification in
language and society’s objectification in Law, then how can the Other
disappear? Can desire, the moving spirit of the subject, ever
evanesce?  In his more analytic mode Fanon can impede the exploration
of these ambivalent, uncertain questions of colonial desire.  The
state of emergency from which he writes demands more insurgent
answers, more immediate identifications. At times Fanon attempts too
close a correspondence between the mise- en-scène of unconscious
fantasy and the phantoms of racist fear and hate that stalk the
colonial scene, he turns too hastily from the ambivalences of
identification to the antagonistic identities of political alienation
and cultural discrimination; he is too quick to name the Other, to
personalize its presence in the language of colonial racism—“the real
Other for the white man is and will continue to be the black man. And
conversely.” These attempts, in Fanon’s words, to restore the dream to
its proper political time and cultural space, can, at times, blunt the
edge of Fanon’s brilliant illustrations of the complexity of psychic
projections in
the pathological colonial relation. Jean Veneuse, the Antillean
evolué, desires not merely to be in the place of the White man but
compulsively seeks to look back and down on himself from that
position. The White man does not merely deny what he fears and desires
by projecting it on “them”; Fanon sometimes forgets that paranoia
never preserves its position of power for the compulsive
identification with a persecutory “They” is always an evacuation and
emptying of the “I”.  Fanon’s sociodiagnostic psychiatry tends to
explain away the ambivalent turns and returns of the subject of
colonial desire, its masquerade of Western Man and the “long”
historical perspective.  It is as if Fanon is fearful of his most
radical insights: that the space of the body and its identification is
a representational reality; that the politics of race will not be
entirely contained within the humanist myth of man or economic
necessity or historical progress, for its psychic affects questions
such forms of determinism; that social sovereignity and human
subjectivity are only realizable in the order of Otherness. It is as
if the question of desire that emerged from the traumatic tradition of
the oppressed has to be denied, at the end of Black Skin, White Masks,
to make way for an existentialist humanism that is as banal as it is
beatific: Why not the quite simple attempt to touch the other to feel
the other, to explain the other to myself? ... At the conclusion of
this study, I want the world to recognize, with me, the open door of
every consciousness.
Such a deep hunger for humanism, despite Fanon’s insight into the dark
side of Man, must be an overcompensation for the closed consciousness
or “dual narcissism” to which he attributes the depersonalization of
colonial man: “There one lies body to body, with one’s blackness or
one’s whiteness in full narcissistic cry, each sealed into his own
particularity—with, it is true, now and then a flash or so.” It is
this flash of “recognition”—in its Hegelian sense with its
transcendental, sublative spirit—that fails to ignite in the colonial
relation where there is only narcissistic indifference: “And yet the
Negro knows there is a difference. He wants it ... The former slave
needs a challenge to his humanity.” In the absence of such a
challenge, Fanon argues, the colonized can only imitate,
never identify, a distinction nicely made by the psychoanalyst Annie
Reich: “It is imitation ... when the child holds the newspaper like
his father. It is identification when the child learns to read.” In
disavowing the culturally differentiated condition of the colonial
world—in demanding Turn White or disappear—the colonizer is himself
caught in the ambivalence of paranoic identification, alternating
between fantasies of megalomania and persecution.  However Fanon’s
Hegelian dream for a human reality in-itself- for itself is ironized,
even mocked, by his view of the Manichean structure of colonial
consciousness and its non-dialectical division.  What he says in The
Wretched of the Earth of the demography of the colonial city reflects
his view of the psychic structure of the colonial relation. The native
and settler zones, like the juxtaposition of black and white bodies,
are opposed, but not in the service of “a higher unity.” No
concilation is possible, he concludes, for of the two terms one is
superfluous.  No, there can be no reconciliation, no Hegelian
“recognition,” no simple, sentimental promise of a humanistic “world
of the You.” Can there be life without transcendence? Politics without
the dream of perfectibility? Unlike Fanon, I think the non-
dialectical moment of Manicheanism suggests an answer. By following
the trajectory of colonial desire—in the company of that bizarre
colonial figure, the tethered shadow—it becomes possible to cross,
even to shift the Manichean boundaries. Where there is no human nature
hope can hardly spring eternal; but it emerges surely and
surreptitiously in the strategic return of that difference that
informs and deforms the image of identity, in the margin of Otherness
that displays identification. There may be no Hegelian negation but
Fanon must sometimes be reminded that the disavowal of the Other
always exacerbates the “edge” of identification, reveals that
dangerous place where identity and aggressivity are twinned. For
denial is always a retroactive process; a half acknowledgment of that
Otherness which has left its traumatic mark. In that uncertainty lurks
the white masked black man; and from such ambivalent
identification—black skin, white masks—it is possible, I believe, to
redeem the pathos of cultural confusion into a strategy of political
subversion. We cannot agree
with Fanon that “since the racial drama is played out in the open the
black man has no time to make it unconscious,” but that is a
provocative thought. In occupying two places at once—or three in
Fanon’s case—the depersonalized, dislocated colonial subject can
become an incalculable object, quite literally, difficult to place.
The demand of authority cannot unify its message nor simply identify
its subjects. For the strategy of colonial desire is to stage the
drama of identity at the point at which the black mask slips to reveal
the white skin. At that edge, in between the black body and the white
body, there is a tension of meaning and being, or some would say
demand and desire, which is the psychic counterpart to that “muscular
tension” that inhabits the native body: The symbols of social
order—the police, the bugle calls in the barracks, military parades
and the waving ﬂags—are at one and the same time inhibitory and
stimulating: for they do not convey the message “Don’t dare to budge”;
rather, they cry out “Get ready to attack”.
It is from that tension—both psychic and political—that a strategy of
subversion emerges. It is a mode of negation that seeks not to unveil
the fullness of Man but to manipulate his representation. It is a form
of power that is exercised at the very limits of identity and
authority, in the mocking spirit of mask and image; it is the lesson
taught by the veiled Algerian woman in the course of the Revolution as
she crossed the Manichean lines to claim her liberty. In Fanon’s essay
Algeria Unveiled the colonizer’s attempt to unveil the Algerian woman
does not simply turn the veil into a symbol of resistance; it becomes
a technique of camouflage, a means of struggle—the veil conceals
bombs.  The veil that once secured the boundary of the home—the limits
of woman—now masks the woman in her revolutionary activity, linking
the Arab city and the French quarter, transgressing the familial and
colonial boundary. As the “veil” is liberated in the public sphere,
circulating between and beyond cultural and social norms and spaces,
it becomes the object of paranoid surveillance and
interrogation. Every veiled woman, writes Fanon, became suspect. And
when the veil is shed in order to penetrate deeper into the European
quarter, the colonial police see everything and
nothing. An Algerian woman is only, after all, a woman. But the
Algerian fidai is an arsenal and in her handbag she carries her
hand-grenades.  Remembering Fanon is a process of intense discovery
and diso- rientation. Remembering is never a quiet act of
introspection or retrospection. It is a painful re-membering, a
putting together of the dismembered past to make sense of the trauma
of the present.  It is such a memory of the history of race and
racism, colonialism and the question of cultural identity, that Fanon
reveals with greater profundity and poetry than any other writer. What
he achieves, I believe, is something far greater: for in seeing the
phobic image of the Negro, the native, the colonized, deeply woven
into the psychic pattern of the West, he offers the master and slave a
deeper reflection of their interpositions, as well as the hope of a
difficult, even dangerous, freedom: “It is through the effort to
recapture the self and to scrutinize the self, it is through the
lasting tension of their freedom that men will be able to create the
ideal conditions of existence for a human world.” Nobody writes with
more honesty and insight of this lasting tension of freedom in which
the self—the peremptory self of the present— disavows an image of
itself as an orginary past or an ideal future and confronts the
paradox of its own making.  For Fanon, in Black Skin, White Masks,
there is the intricate irony of turning the European existentialist
and psychoana- lytic traditions to face the history of the Negro which
they had never contemplated, to face the reality of Fanon
himself. This leads to a meditation on the experience of dispossession
and dislocation—psychic and social—which speaks to the condition of
the marginalized, the alienated, those who have to live under the
surveillance of a sign of identity and fantasy that denies their
difference. In shifting the focus of cultural racism from the politics
of nationalism to the politics of narcissism, Fanon opens up a margin
of interrogation that causes a subversive slippage of identity and
authority. Nowhere is this slippage more visible than in his work
itself where a range of texts and traditions—from the classical
repertoire to the quotidien, conversational culture of racism—vie to
utter that last word which remains unspoken.
Nowhere is this slippage more significantly experienced than in the
impossibility of inferring from the texts of Fanon a pacific image of
“society” or the “state” as a homogeneous philosophical or
representational unity. The “social” is always an unresolved ensemble
of antagonistic interlocutions between positions of power and poverty,
knowledge and oppression, history and fantasy, surveillance and
subversion. It is for this reason—above all else—in the twenty-fifth
anniversary of his death, that we should turn to Fanon.  In Britain,
today, as a range of culturally and racially marginalized groups
readily assume the mask of the Black not to deny their diversity but
to audaciously announce the important artifice of cultural identity
and its difference, the need for Fanon becomes urgent. As political
groups from different directions gather under the banner of the Black,
not to homogenize their oppression but to make of it a common cause, a
public image of the identity of otherness, the need for Fanon becomes
urgent. Urgent, in order to remind us of that crucial engagement
between mask and identity, image and identification, from which comes
the lasting tension of our freedom and the lasting impression of
ourselves as others.  In the case of display ... the play of combat in
the form of intimidation, the being gives of himself, or receives from
the other, something that is like a mask, a double, an envelope, a
thrown-off skin, thrown off in order to cover the frame of a
shield. It is through this separated form of himself that the being
comes into play in his effects of life and death. [Jacques Lacan]
The time has come to return to Fanon; as always, I believe, with a
question: How can the human world live its difference?  how can a
human being live Other-wise?  London 1986
Note Fanon’s use of the word “man” usually connotes a phenomeno-
logical quality of humanness, inclusive of man and woman and, for that
very reason, ignores the question of gender difference.  The problem
stems from Fanon’s desire to site the question of
sexual difference within the problematic of cultural difference— to
give them a shared origin—which is suggestive, but often simplifies
the question of sexuality. His portrayals of white women often collude
with their cultural stereotypes and reduce the “desire” of sexuality
to the desire for sex, leaving unexplored the elusive function of the
“object” of desire. In chapter 6 he attempts a somewhat more complex
reading of masochism but in making the Negro the “predestined
depository of this aggression” [my emphasis] he again pre-empts a
fuller psycho- analytic discussion of the production of psychic
aggressivity in identification and its relation to cultural
difference, by citing the cultural stereotype as the predestined aim
of the sexual drive. Of the woman of color he has very little to
say. “I know nothing about her,” he writes in Black Skin, White
Masks. This crucial issue requires an order of psychoanalytic argument
that goes well beyond the scope of my foreword. I have therefore
chosen to note the importance of the problem rather than to elide it
in a facile charge of “sexism.”
Acknowledgments Thanks to Stephan Feuchtwang for shepherding these
ideas; Stuart Hall for discussing them; A. Sivanandan and Hazel
Walters for their archival assistance at the Institute of Race
Relations; Pete Ayrton for his patience; and Jackie Bhabha for the
engaged combat of comrades.
TRANSLATOR’S NOTE
I would like to acknowledge the contributions made to this translation
by André Leveillé of Rome, Italy, and Doctors Ruth M.  and William
F. Murphy of Lincoln and Boston, Massachusetts. To M. Leveillé I am
indebted for many clarifications of French terms and slang, on certain
events of the postwar period that received more attention in France
than in America, on relevant details of daily life in France, and on
matters Antillean and Algerian. To the Doctors Murphy I am grateful
for help with the terminology of psychology and psychiatry and
elucidations on European practices in the field.  —C.L.M.
I am talking of millions of men who have been skillfully injected with
fear, inferiority complexes, trepidation, servility, despair,
abasement.  —Aimé Césaire, Discours sur le Colonialisme
The explosion will not happen today. It is too soon . . . or too late.
I do not come with timeless truths.  My consciousness is not
illuminated with ultimate radiances.  Nevertheless, in complete
composure, I think it would be good if certain things were said.
These things I am going to say, not shout. For it is a long time since
shouting has gone out of my life.  So very long. . . .  Why write this
book? No one has asked me for it.  Especially those to whom it is
directed.  Well? Well, I reply quite calmly that there are too many
idiots in this world. And having said it, I have the burden of proving
it.  Toward a new humanism. . . .  Understanding among men. . . .  Our
colored brothers. . . .  Mankind, I believe in you. . . .  Race
prejudice. . . .  To understand and to love. . . .  From all sides
dozens and hundreds of pages assail me and try to impose their wills
on me. But a single line would be enough.  Supply a single answer and
the color problem would be stripped of all its importance.  What does
a man want?  What does the black man want?  At the risk of arousing
the resentment of my colored brothers, I will say that the black is
not a man.
There is a zone of nonbeing, an extraordinarily sterile and arid
region, an utterly naked declivity where an authentic upheaval can be
born. In most cases, the black man lacks the advantage of being able
to accomplish this descent into a real hell Man is not merely a
possibility of recapture or of negation. If it is true that
consciousness is a process of transcendence, we have to see too that
this transcendence is haunted by the problems of love and
understanding. Man is a yes that vibrates to cosmic
harmonies. Uprooted, pursued, baffled, doomed to watch the dissolution
of the truths that he has worked out for himself one after another, he
has to give up projecting onto the world an antinomy that coexists
with him.  The black is a black man; that is, as the result of a
series of aberrations of affect, he is rooted at the core of a
universe from which he must be extricated.  The problem is
important. I propose nothing short of the liberation of the man of
color from himself. We shall go very slowly, for there are two camps:
the white and the black.  Stubbornly we shall investigate both
metaphysics and we shall find that they are often quite fluid.  We
shall have no mercy for the former governors, the former
missionaries. To us, the man who adores the Negro is as “sick” as the
man who abominates him.  Conversely, the black man who wants to turn
his race white is as miserable as he who preaches hatred for the
whites.  In the absolute, the black is no more to be loved than the
Czech, and truly what is to be done is to set man free.  This book
should have been written three years ago. . . . But these truths were
a fire in me then. Now I can tell them without being burned. These
truths do not have to be hurled in men’s faces.  They are not intended
to ignite fervor. I do not trust fervor.  Every time it has burst out
somewhere, it has brought fire, famine, misery. . . . And contempt for
man.  Fervor is the weapon of choice of the impotent.  Of those who
heat the iron in order to shape it at once. I should prefer to warm
man’s body and leave him. We might reach this result: mankind
retaining this fire through self-combustion.
Mankind set free of the trampoline that is the resistance of others,
and digging into its own flesh to find a meaning.  Only a few of those
who read this book will understand the problems that were encountered
in its composition.  In an age when skeptical doubt has taken root in
the world, when in the words of a gang of salauds it is no longer
possible to find the sense of non-sense, it becomes harder to
penetrate to a level where the categories of sense and non-sense are
not yet invoked.  The black man wants to be white. The white man
slaves to reach a human level.  In the course of this essay we shall
observe the development of an effort to understand the black-white
relation.  The white man is sealed in his whiteness.  The black man in
his blackness.  We shall seek to ascertain the directions of this dual
narcissism and the motivations that inspire it.  At the beginning of
my speculations it seems inappropriate to elaborate the conclusions
that the reader will find.  Concern with the elimination of a vicious
circle has been the only guide-line for my efforts.  There is a fact:
White men consider themselves superior to black men.  There is another
fact: Black men want to prove to white men, at all costs, the richness
of their thought, the equal value of their intellect.  How do we
extricate ourselves?  A moment ago I spoke of narcissism. Indeed, I
believe that only a psychoanalytical interpretation of the black
problem can lay bare the anomalies of affect that are responsible for
the structure of the complex. I shall attempt a complete lysis of this
morbid body. I believe that the individual should tend to take on the
universality inherent in the human condition. And when I say this, I
am thinking impartially of men like Gobineau or women like Mayotte
Capécia. But, in order to arrive at this judgment, it is imperative to
eliminate a whole set of defects left over from childhood.
Man’s tragedy, Nietzsche said, is that he was once a child. None the
less, we cannot afford to forget that, as Charles Odier has shown us,
the neurotic’s fate remains in his own hands.  However painful it may
be for me to accept this conclusion, I am obliged to state it: For the
black man there is only one destiny.  And it is white.  Before
beginning the case, I have to say certain things. The analysis that I
am undertaking is psychological. In spite of this it is apparent to me
that the effective disalienation of the black man entails an immediate
recognition of social and economic realities. If there is an
inferiority complex, it is the outcome of a double process:
—primarily, economic; —subsequently, the internalization—or, better,
the epi- dermalization—of this inferiority.  Reacting against the
constitutionalist tendency of the late nineteenth century, Freud
insisted that the individual factor be taken into account through
psychoanalysis. He substituted for a phylogenetic theory the
ontogenetic perspective. It will be seen that the black man’s
alienation is not an individual question.  Beside phylogeny and
ontogeny stands sociogeny. In one sense, conforming to the view of
Leconte and Damey,1 let us say that this is a question of a
sociodiagnostic.  What is the prognosis?  But society, unlike
biochemical processes, cannot escape human influences. Man is what
brings society into being. The prognosis is in the hands of those who
are willing to get rid of the worm- eaten roots of the structure.  The
black man must wage his war on both levels: Since historically they
influence each other, any unilateral liberation is incomplete, and the
gravest mistake would be to believe in their automatic
interdependence. Besides, such a systematic tendency is contrary to
the facts. This will be proved.  Reality, for once, requires a total
understanding. On the objective level as on the subjective level, a
solution has to be supplied.
1. M. Leconte and A. Damey, Essai critique des nosographies
psychiatriques actuelles.
And to declare in the tone of “it’s-all-my-fault” that what matters is
the salvation of the soul is not worth the effort.  There will be an
authentic disalienation only to the degree to which things, in the
most materialistic meaning of the word, will have been restored to
their proper places.  It is good form to introduce a work in
psychology with a statement of its methodological point of view. I
shall be derelict.  I leave methods to the botanists and the
mathematicians. There is a point at which methods devour themselves.
I should like to start from there. I shall try to discover the various
attitudes that the Negro adopts in contact with white civilization.
The “jungle savage” is not what I have in mind. That is because for
him certain factors have not yet acquired importance.  I believe that
the fact of the juxtaposition of the white and black races has created
a massive psychoexistential complex. I hope by analyzing it to destroy
it.  Many Negroes will not find themselves in what follows.  This is
equally true of many whites.  But the fact that I feel a foreigner in
the worlds of the schizophrenic or the sexual cripple in no way
diminishes their reality.  The attitudes that I propose to describe
are real. I have encountered them innumerable times.  Among students,
among workers, among the pimps of Pigalle or Marseille, I have been
able to isolate the same components of aggressiveness and passivity.
This book is a clinical study. Those who recognize themselves in it, I
think, will have made a step forward. I seriously hope to persuade my
brother, whether black or white, to tear off with all his strength the
shameful livery put together by centuries of incomprehension.  The
architecture of this work is rooted in the temporal. Every human
problem must be considered from the standpoint of time.  Ideally, the
present will always contribute to the building of the future.
And this future is not the future of the cosmos but rather the future
of my century, my country, my existence. In no fashion should I
undertake to prepare the world that will come later. I belong
irreducibly to my time.  And it is for my own time that I should
live. The future should be an edifice supported by living men. This
structure is connected to the present to the extent that I consider
the present in terms of something to be exceeded.  The first three
chapters deal with the modern Negro. I take the black man of today and
I try to establish his attitudes in the white world. The last two
chapters are devoted to an attempt at a psychopathological and
philosophical explanation of the state of being a Negro.  The analysis
is, above all, regressive.  The fourth and fifth chapters rest on a
fundamentally different basis.  In the fourth chapter I examine a
work2 that in my opinion is dangerous. The author, O. Mannoni, is,
moreover, aware of the ambiguity of his position. That perhaps is one
of the merits of his evidence. He has tried to account for a
situation. It is our right to say that we are not satisfied. It is our
duty to show the author how we differ from him.  The fifth chapter,
which I have called The Fact of Blackness, is important for more than
one reason. It portrays the Negro face to face with his race. It will
be observed that there is no common link between the Negro of this
chapter and the Negro who wants to go to bed with a white woman. In
the latter there is clearly a wish to be white. A lust for revenge, in
any case. Here, in contrast, we observe the desperate struggles of a
Negro who is driven to discover the meaning of black identity. White
civilization and European culture have forced an existential deviation
on the Negro. I shall demonstrate elsewhere that what is often called
the black soul is a white man’s artifact.
2. [Dominique] O. Mannoni, Prospero and Caliban: The Psychology of
Colonization (New York, Praeger, 1964). Originally Psychologie de la
Colonisation (Paris, Editions du Seuil, 1950).
The educated Negro, slave of the spontaneous and cosmic Negro myth,
feels at a given stage that his race no longer understands him.  Or
that he no longer understands it.  Then he congratulates himself on
this, and enlarging the difference, the incomprehension, the
disharmony, he finds in them the meaning of his real humanity. Or more
rarely he wants to belong to his people. And it is with rage in his
mouth and abandon in his heart that he buries himself in the vast
black abyss. We shall see that this attitude, so heroically absolute,
renounces the present and the future in the name of a mystical past.
Since I was born in the Antilles, my observations and my conclusions
are valid only for the Antilles—at least concerning the black man at
home. Another book could be dedicated to explaining the differences
that separate the Negro of the Antilles from the Negro of
Africa. Perhaps one day I shall write it. Perhaps too it will no
longer be necessary—a fact for which we could only congratulate
ourselves.
I ascribe a basic importance to the phenomenon of language.  That is
why I find it necessary to begin with this subject, which should
provide us with one of the elements in the colored man’s comprehension
of the dimension of the other. For it is implicit that to speak is to
exist absolutely for the other.  The black man has two dimensions. One
with his fellows, the other with the white man. A Negro behaves
differently with a white man and with another Negro. That this
self-division is a direct result of colonialist subjugation is beyond
question. . . . No one would dream of doubting that its major artery
is fed from the heart of those various theories that have tried to
prove that the Negro is a stage in the slow evolution of monkey into
man.  Here is objective evidence that expresses reality.  But when one
has taken cognizance of this situation, when one has understood it,
one considers the job completed. How can one then be deaf to that
voice rolling down the stages of history: “What matters is not to know
the world but to change it.”  This matters appallingly in our
lifetime.  To speak means to be in a position to use a certain syntax,
to grasp the morphology of this or that language, but it means above
all to assume a culture, to support the weight of a civilization.
Since the situation is not one-way only, the statement of it should
reflect the fact. Here the reader is asked to concede certain points
that, however unacceptable they may seem in the beginning, will find
the measure of their validity in the facts.  The problem that we
confront in this chapter is this: The Negro of the Antilles will be
proportionately whiter—that is, he will come closer to being a real
human being—in direct ratio to his mastery of the French language. I
am not unaware that this is
one of man’s attitudes face to face with Being. A man who has a
language consequently possesses the world expressed and implied by
that language. What we are getting at becomes plain: Mastery of
language affords remarkable power. Paul Valery knew this, for he
called language “the god gone astray in the flesh.”1 In a work now in
preparation I propose to investigate this phenomenon.2 For the moment
I want to show why the Negro of the Antilles, whoever he is, has
always to face the problem of language.  Furthermore, I will broaden
the field of this description and through the Negro of the Antilles
include every colonized man.  Every colonized people—in other words,
every people in whose soul an inferiority complex has been created by
the death and burial of its local cultural originality—finds itself
face to face with the language of the civilizing nation; that is, with
the culture of the mother country. The colonized is elevated above his
jungle status in proportion to his adoption of the mother country’s
cultural standards. He becomes whiter as he renounces his blackness,
his jungle. In the French colonial army, and particularly in the
Senegalese regiments, the black officers serve first of all as
interpreters. They are used to convey the master’s orders to their
fellows, and they too enjoy a certain position of honor.  There is the
city, there is the country. There is the capital, there is the
province. Apparently the problem in the mother country is the
same. Let us take a Lyonnais in Paris: He boasts of the quiet of his
city, the intoxicating beauty of the quays of the Rhône, the splendor
of the plane trees, and all those other things that fascinate people
who have nothing to do. If you meet him again when he has returned
from Paris, and especially if you do not know the capital, he will
never run out of its praises: Paris-city-of-light, the Seine, the
little garden restaurants, know Paris and die. . . .  The process
repeats itself with the man of Martinique. First of all on his island:
Basse-Pointe, Marigot, Gros-Morne, and, opposite, the imposing
Fort-de-France. Then, and this is the important point, beyond his
island. The Negro who knows the mother country is a demigod. In this
connection I offer a fact that must have struck 1. Charmes (Paris,
Gallimard, 1952).  2. Le langage et l’agressivité.
my compatriots. Many of them, after stays of varying length in
metropolitan France, go home to be deified. The most eloquent form of
ambivalence is adopted toward them by the native, the-
one-who-never-crawled-out-of-his-hole, the bitaco. The black man who
has lived in France for a length of time returns radically changed. To
express it in genetic terms, his phenotype undergoes a definitive, an
absolute mutation.3 Even before he had gone away, one could tell from
the almost aerial manner of his carriage that new forces had been set
in motion. When he met a friend or an acquaintance, his greeting was
no longer the wide sweep of the arm: With great reserve our “new man”
bowed slightly. The habitually raucous voice hinted at a gentle inner
stirring as of rustling breezes. For the Negro knows that over there
in France there is a stereotype of him that will fasten on to him at
the pier in Le Havre or Marseille: “Ah come fom Mahtinique, it’s the
fuhst time Ah’ve eveh come to Fance.” He knows that what the poets
call the divine gurgling (listen to Creole) is only a halfway house
between pidgin-nigger and French. The middle class in the Antilles
never speak Creole except to their servants. In school the children of
Martinique are taught to scorn the dialect. One avoids Creolisms. Some
families completely forbid the use of Creole, and mothers ridicule
their children for speaking it.  My mother wanting a son to keep in
mind if you do not know your history lesson you will not go to mass on
Sunday in your Sunday clothes that child will be a disgrace to the
family that child will be our curse shut up I told you you must speak
French the French of France the Frenchman’s French French French4
3. By that I mean that Negroes who return to their original
environments convey the impression that they have completed a cycle,
that they have added to themselves something that was lacking. They
return literally full of themselves.  4. Léon-G. Damas, “Hoquet,” in
Pigments, in Leopold S.-Senghor, ed., Anthologie de la nouvetie poésie
nègre et malgache (Paris, Presses Universitaires de France, 1948),
pp. 15–17.
Yes, I must take great pains with my speech, because I shall be more
or less judged by it. With great contempt they will say of me, “He
doesn’t even know how to speak French.”  In any group of young men in
the Antilles, the one who expresses himself well, who has mastered the
language, is inordinately feared; keep an eye on that one, he is
almost white. In France one says, “He talks like a book.” In
Martinique, “He talks like a white man.”  The Negro arriving in France
will react against the myth of the R-eating man from Martinique. He
will become aware of it, and he will really go to war against it. He
will practice not only rolling his R but embroidering it. Furtively
observing the slightest reactions of others, listening to his own
speech, suspicious of his own tongue—a wretchedly lazy organ—he will
lock himself into his room and read aloud for hours—desperately
determined to learn diction.  Recently an acquaintance told me a
story. A Martinique Negro landed at Le Havre and went into a bar. With
the utmost self- confidence he called, “Waiterrr! Bing me a beeya.”
Here is a genuine intoxication. Resolved not to fit the myth of the
nigger- who-eats his-R’s, he had acquired a fine supply of them but
allocated it badly.  There is a psychological phenomenon that consists
in the belief that the world will open to the extent to which
frontiers are broken down. Imprisoned on his island, lost in an
atmosphere that offers not the slightest outlet, the Negro breathes in
this appeal of Europe like pure air. For, it must be admitted, Aimé
Césaire was generous—in his Cahier d’un retour au pays natal. This
town of Fort-de-France is truly flat, stranded. Lying there naked to
the sun, that “flat, sprawling city, stumbling over its own common
sense, winded by its load of endlessly repeated crosses, pettish at
its destiny, voiceless, thwarted in every direction, incapable of
feeding on the juices of its soil, blocked, cut off, confined,
divorced from fauna and flora.”5 Césaire’s description of it is
anything but poetic. It is under- standable, then, when at the news
that he is getting into France
5. Cahiers (Paris, Présence Africaine, 1956), p. 30.
(quite like someone who, in the colloquial phrase, is “getting a start
in life”) the black man is jubilant and makes up his mind to
change. There is no thematic pattern, however; his structure changes
independently of any reflective process. In the United States there is
a center directed by Pearce and Williamson; it is called
Peckham. These authors have shown that in married couples a
biochemical alteration takes place in the partners, and, it seems,
they have discovered the presence of certain hormones in the husband
of a pregnant woman. It would be equally interesting—and there are
plenty of subjects for the study—to investigate the modifications of
body fluids that occur in Negroes when they arrive in France. Or
simply to study through tests the psychic changes both before they
leave home and after they have spent a month in France.  What are by
common consent called the human sciences have their own drama. Should
one postulate a type for human reality and describe its psychic
modalities only through deviations from it, or should one not rather
strive unremittingly for a concrete and ever new understanding of man?
When one reads that after the age of twenty-nine a man can no longer
love and that he must wait until he is forty-nine before his capacity
for affect revives, one feels the ground give way beneath one. The
only possibility of regaining one’s balance is to face the whole
problem, for all these discoveries, all these inquiries lead only in
one direction: to make man admit that he is nothing, absolutely
nothing—and that he must put an end to the narcissism on which he
relies in order to imagine that he is different from the other
“animals.”  This amounts to nothing more nor less than man’s
surrender.  Having reflected on that, I grasp my narcissism with both
hands and I turn my back on the degradation of those who would make
man a mere mechanism. If there can be no discussion on a philosophical
level—that is, the plane of the basic needs of human reality—I am
willing to work on the psychoanalytical level—in other words, the
level of the “failures,” in the sense in which one speaks of engine
failures.
The black man who arrives in France changes because to him the country
represents the Tabernacle; he changes not only because it is from
France that he received his knowledge of Montesquieu, Rousseau, and
Voltaire, but also because France gave him his physicians, his
department heads, his innumerable little functionaries—from the
sergeant-major “fifteen years in the service” to the policeman who was
born in Panissières. There is a kind of magic vault of distance, and
the man who is leaving next week for France creates round himself a
magic circle in which the words Paris, Marseille, Sorbonne, Pigalle
become the keys to the vault. He leaves for the pier, and the
amputation of his being diminishes as the silhouette of his ship grows
clearer. In the eyes of those who have come to see him off he can read
the evidence of his own mutation, his power. “Good-by bandanna,
good-by straw hat. . . .”  Now that we have got him to the dock, let
him sail; we shall see him again. For the moment, let us go to welcome
one of those who are coming home. The “newcomer” reveals himself at
once; he answers only in French, and often he no longer understands
Creole. There is a relevant illustration in folklore. After several
months of living in France, a country boy returns to his family.
Noticing a farm implement, he asks his father, an old don’t-pull-
that-kind-of-thing-on-me peasant, “Tell me, what does one call that
apparatus?” His father replies by dropping the tool on the boy’s feet,
and the amnesia vanishes. Remarkable therapy.  There is the newcomer,
then. He no longer understands the dialect, he talks about the Opéra,
which he may never have seen except from a distance, but above all he
adopts a critical attitude toward his compatriots. Confronted with the
most trivial occurrence, he becomes an oracle. He is the one who
knows.  He betrays himself in his speech. At the Savannah, where the
young men of Fort-de-France spend their leisure, the spectacle is
revealing: Everyone immediately waits for the newcomer to speak.  As
soon as the school day ends, they all go to the Savannah. This
Savannah seems to have its own poetry. Imagine a square about 600 feet
long and 125 feet wide, its sides bounded by worm-eaten tamarind
trees, one end marked by the huge war memorial (the
nation’s gratitude to its children), the other by the Central Hotel; a
miserable tract of uneven cobbles, pebbles that roll away under one’s
feet; and, amid all this, three or four hundred young fellows walking
up and down, greeting one another, grouping—no, they never form
groups, they go on walking.  “How’s it going?”  “O.K. How’s it with
you?”  “O.K.”  And that goes on for fifty years. Yes, this city is
deplorably played out. So is its life.  They meet and talk. And if the
newcomer soon gets the floor, it is because they were waiting for
him. First of all to observe his manner: The slightest departure is
seized on, picked apart, and in less than forty-eight hours it has
been retailed all over Fort-de-France. There is no forgiveness when
one who claims a superiority falls below the standard. Let him say,
for instance, “It was not my good fortune, when in France, to observe
mounted policemen,” and he is done for. Only one choice remains to
him: throw off his “Parisianism” or die of ridicule. For there is also
no forgetting: When he marries, his wife will be aware that she is
marrying a joke, and his children will have a legend to face and to
live down.  What is the origin of this personality change? What is the
source of this new way of being? Every dialect is a way of thinking,
Damourette and Pichon said. And the fact that the newly returned Negro
adopts a language different from that of the group into which he was
born is evidence of a dislocation, a separation.  Professor
D. Westermann, in The African Today (p. 331), says that the Negroes’
inferiority complex is particularly intensified among the most
educated, who must struggle with it unceasingly. Their way of doing
so, he adds, is frequently naive: “The wearing of European clothes,
whether rags or the most up-to-date style; using European furniture
and European forms of social intercourse; adorning the Native language
with European expressions; using bombastic phrases in speaking or
writing a European language; all these contribute to a feeling of
equality with the European and his achievements.”
On the basis of other studies and my own personal observations, I want
to try to show why the Negro adopts such a position, peculiar to him,
with respect to European languages. Let me point out once more that
the conclusions I have reached pertain to the French Antilles; at the
same time, I am not unaware that the same behavior patterns obtain in
every race that has been subjected to colonization.  I have known—and
unfortunately I still know—people born in Dahomey or the Congo who
pretend to be natives of the Antilles; I have known, and I still know,
Antilles Negroes who are annoyed when they are suspected of being
Senegalese. This is because the Antilles Negro is more “civilized”
than the African, that is, he is closer to the white man; and this
difference prevails not only in back streets and on boulevards but
also in public service and the army. Any Antilles Negro who performed
his military service in a Senegalese infantry regiment is familiar
with this disturbing climate: On one side he has the Europeans,
whether born in his own country or in France, and on the other he has
the Senegalese.  I remember a day when, in the midst of combat, we had
to wipe out a machine-gun nest. The Senegalese were ordered to attack
three times, and each time they were forced back. Then one of them
wanted to know why the toubabs6 did not go into action.  At such
times, one no longer knows whether one is toubab or “native.” And yet
many Antilles Negroes see nothing to upset them in such European
identification; on the contrary, they find it altogether normal. That
would be all we need, to be taken for niggers! The Europeans despise
the Senegalese, and the Antilles Negro rules the black roost as its
unchallenged master. Admittedly as an extreme example, I offer a
detail that is at least amusing.  I was talking recently with someone
from Martinique who told me with considerable resentment that some
Guadeloupe Negroes were trying to “pass” as Martinicans. But, he
added, the lie was rapidly discovered, because they are more savage
than we are; which, again, means they are farther away from the white
man.  It is said that the Negro loves to jabber; in my own case, when
6. Literally, this dialect word means European; by extension it was
applied to any officer. (Translator’s note.)
I think of the word jabber I see a gay group of children calling and
shouting for the sake of calling and shouting—children in the midst of
play, to the degree to which play can be considered an initiation into
life. The Negro loves to jabber, and from this theory it is not a long
road that leads to a new proposition: The Negro is just a child. The
psychoanalysts have a fine start here, and the term orality is soon
heard.  But we have to go farther. The problem of language is too
basic to allow us to hope to state it all here. Piaget’s remarkable
studies have taught us to distinguish the various stages in the
mastery of language, and Gelb and Goldstein have shown us that the
function of language is also broken into periods and steps. What
interests us here is the black man confronted by the French
language. We are trying to understand why the Antilles Negro is so
fond of speaking French.  Jean-Paul Sartre, in Orphée Noir, which
prefaces the Anthology de la nouvelle poésie nègre et malgache, tells
us that the black poet will turn against the French language; but that
does not apply in the Antilles. Here I share the opinion of Michel
Leiris, who, discussing Creole, wrote not so long ago: Even now,
despite the fact that it is a language that everyone knows more or
less, though only the illiterate use it to the exclusion of French,
Creole seems already predestined to become a relic eventually, once
public education (however slow its progress, impeded by the
insufﬁciency of school facilities everywhere, the paucity of reading
matter available to the public, and the fact that the physical scale
of living is often too low) has become common enough among the
disinherited classes of the population.
And, the author adds: In the case of the poets that I am discussing
here, there is no question of their deliberately becoming
“Antilleans”—on the Provençal picturesque model—by employing a dead
language which, furthermore, is utterly devoid of all external
radiance regardless of its intrinsic qualities; it is rather a matter
of their asserting, in opposition to white men ﬁlled with the worst
racial prejudices, whose arrogance is more and more plainly
demonstrated to be unfounded, the integrity of their personalities.7
7. “Martinique-Guadeloupe-Haiti,” Les Temps Modernes, February, 1950,
p. 1347.
If there is, for instance, a Gilbert Gratiant who writes in dialect,
it must be admitted that he is a rarity. Let us point out,
furthermore, that the poetic merit of such creation is quite
dubious. There are, in contrast, real works of art translated from the
Peul and Wolof dialects of Senegal, and I have found great interest in
following the linguistic studies of Sheik Anta Diop.  Nothing of the
sort in the Antilles. The language spoken officially is French;
teachers keep a close watch over the children to make sure they do not
use Creole. Let us not mention the ostensible reasons. It would seem,
then, that the problem is this: In the Antilles, as in Brittany, there
is a dialect and there is the French language. But this is false, for
the Bretons do not consider themselves inferior to the French
people. The Bretons have not been civilized by the white man.  By
refusing to multiply our elements, we take the risk of not setting a
limit to our field; for it is essential to convey to the black man
that an attitude of rupture has never saved anyone. While it is true
that I have to throw off an attacker who is strangling me, because I
literally cannot breathe, the fact remains solely on the physiological
foundation. To the mechanical problem of respiration it would be
unsound to graft a psychological element, the impossibility of
expansion.  What is there to say? Purely and simply this: When a
bachelor of philosophy from the Antilles refuses to apply for
certification as a teacher on the ground of his color, I say that
philosophy has never saved anyone. When someone else strives and
strains to prove to me that black men are as intelligent as white men,
I say that intelligence has never saved anyone; and that is true, for,
if philosophy and intelligence are invoked to proclaim the equality of
men, they have also been employed to justify the extermination of men.
Before going any farther I find it necessary to say certain things.  I
am speaking here, on the one hand, of alienated (duped) blacks, and,
on the other, of no less alienated (duping and duped) whites.  If one
hears a Sartre or a Cardinal Verdier declare that the outrage of the
color problem has survived far too long, one can conclude only that
their position is normal. Anyone can amass references
and quotations to prove that “color prejudice” is indeed an imbecility
and an iniquity that must be eliminated.  Sartre begins Orphée Noir
thus: “What then did you expect when you unbound the gag that had
muted those black mouths?  That they would chant your praises? Did you
think that when those heads that our fathers had forcibly bowed down
to the ground were raised again, you would find adoration in their
eyes?”8 I do not know; but I say that he who looks into my eyes for
anything but a perpetual question will have to lose his sight; neither
recognition nor hate. And if I cry out, it will not be a black
cry. No, from the point of view adopted here, there is no black
problem. Or at any rate if there is one it concerns the whites only
accidentally. It is a story that takes place in darkness, and the sun
that is carried within me must shine into the smallest crannies.
Dr. H. L. Gordon, attending physician at the Mathari Mental Hospital
in Nairobi, declared in an article in The East African Medical Journal
(1943): “A highly technical skilled examination of a series of 100
brains of normal Natives has found naked eye and microscopic facts
indicative of inherent new brain inferiority.  . . . Quantitatively,”
he added, “the inferiority amounts to 14.8 percent.”9 It has been said
that the Negro is the link between monkey and man—meaning, of course,
white man. And only on page 108 of his book does Sir Alan Burns come
to the conclusion that “we are unable to accept as scientifically
proved the theory that the black man is inherently inferior to the
white, or that he comes from a different stock. . . .” Let me add that
it would be easy to prove the absurdity of statements such as this:
“It is laid down in the Bible that the separation of the white and
black races will be continued in heaven as on earth, and those blacks
who are admitted into the Kingdom of Heaven will find themselves
separately lodged in certain of those many mansions of Our Father that
are mentioned in the New Testament.” Or this: “We are the chosen
people—look
8. Jean-Paul Sartre, Orphée Noir, in Anthologie de la nouvelle poésie
nègre et malgache, p. ix.  9. Quoted in Sir Alan Burns, Colour
Prejudice (London, Allen & Unwin, 1948), p. 101.
at the color of our skins. The others are black or yellow: That is
because of their sins.”  Ah, yes, as you can see, by calling on
humanity, on the belief in dignity, on love, on charity, it would be
easy to prove, or to win the admission, that the black is the equal of
the white. But my purpose is quite different: What I want to do is
help the black man to free himself of the arsenal of complexes that
has been developed by the colonial environment. M. Achille, who
teaches at the Lycée du Parc in Lyon, once during a lecture told of a
personal experience. It is a universally known experience. It is a
rare Negro living in France who cannot duplicate it. Being a Catholic,
Achille took part in a student pilgrimage. A priest, observing the
black face in his flock, said to him, “You go ’way big Savannah what
for and come ’long us?” Very politely Achille gave him a truthful
answer, and it was not the young fugitive from the Savannah who came
off the worse. Everyone laughed at the exchange and the pilgrimage
proceeded. But if we stop right here, we shall see that the fact that
the priest spoke pidgin-nigger leads to certain observations: 1. “Oh,
I know the blacks. They must be spoken to kindly; talk to them about
their country; it’s all in knowing how to talk to them. For
instance. . . .” I am not at all exaggerating: A white man addressing
a Negro behaves exactly like an adult with a child and starts
smirking, whispering, patronizing, cozening. It is not one white man I
have watched, but hundreds; and I have not limited my investigation to
any one class but, if I may claim an essentially objective position, I
have made a point of observing such behavior in physicians, policemen,
employers. I shall be told, by those who overlook my purpose, that I
should have directed my attention elsewhere, that there are white men
who do not fit my description.  To these objections I reply that the
subject of our study is the dupes and those who dupe them, the
alienated, and that if there are white men who behave naturally when
they meet Negroes, they certainly do not fall within the scope of our
examination. If my patient’s liver is functioning as it should, I am
not going to take it for granted that his kidneys are sound. Having
found the liver
normal, I leave it to its normality, which is normal, and turn my
attention to the kidneys: As it happens, the kidneys are diseased.
Which means simply that, side by side with normal people who behave
naturally in accordance with a human psychology, there are others who
behave pathologically in accordance with an inhuman psychology. And it
happens that the existence of men of this sort has determined a
certain number of realities to the elimination of which I should like
to contribute here.  Talking to Negroes in this way gets down to their
level, it puts them at ease, it is an effort to make them understand
us, it reassures them. . . .  The physicians of the public health
services know this very well.  Twenty European patients, one after
another, come in: “Please sit down. . . . Why do you wish to consult
me? . . . What are your symptoms? . . .” Then comes a Negro or an
Arab: “Sit there, boy.  . . . What’s bothering you? . . . Where does
it hurt, huh? . . .”  When, that is, they do not say: “You not feel
good, no?”  2. To speak pidgin to a Negro makes him angry, because he
himself is a pidgin-nigger-talker. But, I will be told, there is no
wish, no intention to anger him. I grant this; but it is just this
absence of wish, this lack of interest, this indifference, this
automatic manner of classifying him, imprisoning him, primitivizing
him, decivilizing him, that makes him angry.  If a man who speaks
pidgin to a man of color or an Arab does not see anything wrong or
evil in such behavior, it is because he has never stopped to think. I
myself have been aware, in talking to certain patients, of the exact
instant at which I began to slip. . . .  Examining this
seventy-three-year-old farm woman, whose mind was never strong and who
is now far gone in dementia, I am suddenly aware of the collapse of
the antennae with which I touch and through which I am touched. The
fact that I adopt a language suitable to dementia, to
feeble-mindedness; the fact that I “talk down” to this poor woman of
seventy-three; the fact that I condescend to her in my quest for a
diagnosis, are the stigmata of a dereliction in my relations with
other people.
What an idealist, people will say. Not at all: It is just that the
others are scum. I make it a point always to talk to the so-called
bicots10 in normal French, and I have always been understood.  They
answer me as well as their varying means permit; but I will not allow
myself to resort to paternalistic “understanding.”  “G’morning,
pal. Where’s it hurt? Huh? Lemme see—belly ache? Heart pain?”  With
that indefinable tone that the hacks in the free clinics have mastered
so well.  One feels perfectly justified when the patient answers in
the same fashion. “You see? I wasn’t kidding you. That’s just the way
they are.”  When the opposite occurs, one must retract one’s
pseudopodia and behave like a man. The whole structure crumbles. A
black man who says to you: “I am in no sense your boy,
Monsieur. . . .”  Something new under the sun.  But one must go
lower. You are in a bar, in Rouen or Strasbourg, and you have the
misfortune to be spotted by an old drunk. He sits down at your table
right off. “You—Africa? Dakar, Rufisque, whorehouse, dames, café,
mangoes, bananas. . . .” You stand up and leave, and your farewell is
a torrent of abuse: “You didn’t play big shot like that in your
jungle, you dirty nigger!”  Mannoni has described what he calls the
Prospero complex. We shall come back to these discoveries, which will
make it possible for us to understand the psychology of
colonialism. But we can already state that to talk pidgin-nigger is to
express this thought: “You’d better keep your place.”  I meet a
Russian or a German who speaks French badly. With gestures I try to
give him the information that he requests, but at the same time I can
hardly forget that he has a language of his own, a country, and that
perhaps he is a lawyer or an engineer there. In any case, he is
foreign to my group, and his standards must be different.  When it
comes to the case of the Negro, nothing of the kind.  He has no
culture, no civilization, no “long historical past.”
10. Vulgar French for Arab. (Translator’s note.)
This may be the reason for the strivings of contemporary Negroes: to
prove the existence of a black civilization to the white world at all
costs.  Willy-nilly, the Negro has to wear the livery that the white
man has sewed for him. Look at children’s picture magazines: Out of
every Negro mouth comes the ritual “Yassuh, boss.” It is even more
remarkable in motion pictures. Most of the American films for which
French dialogue is dubbed in offer the type-Negro: “Sho’ good!”  In
one of these recent films, Requins d’acier, one character was a Negro
crewman in a submarine who talked in the most classic dialect
imaginable. What is more, he was all nigger, walking backward, shaking
at the slightest sign of irritation on the part of a petty officer;
ultimately he was killed in the course of the voyage. Yet I am
convinced that the original dialogue did not resort to the same means
of expression. And, even if it did, I can see no reason why, in a
democratic France that includes sixty million citizens of color,
dubbing must repeat every stupidity that crosses the ocean. It is
because the Negro has to be shown in a certain way; and from the Negro
in Sans Pitié—“Me work hard, me never lie, me never steal”—to the
servant girl of Duel in the Sun one meets the same stereotype.  Yes,
the black man is supposed to be a good nigger; once this has been laid
down, the rest follows of itself. To make him talk pidgin is to fasten
him to the effigy of him, to snare him, to imprison him, the eternal
victim of an essence, of an appearance for which he is not
responsible. And naturally, just as a Jew who spends money without
thinking about it is suspect, a black man who quotes Montesquieu had
better be watched. Please understand me: watched in the sense that he
is starting something. Certainly I do not contend that the black
student is suspect to his fellows or to his teachers. But outside
university circles there is an army of fools: What is important is not
to educate them, but to teach the Negro not to be the slave of their
archetypes.  That these imbeciles are the product of a psychological-
economic system I will grant. But that does not get us much farther
along.
When a Negro talks of Marx, the first reaction is always the same: “We
have brought you up to our level and now you turn against your
benefactors. Ingrates! Obviously nothing can be expected of you.” And
then too there is that bludgeon argument of the plantation-owner in
Africa: Our enemy is the teacher.  What I am asserting is that the
European has a fixed concept of the Negro, and there is nothing more
exasperating than to be asked: “How long have you been in France? You
speak French so well.”  It can be argued that people say this because
many Negroes speak pidgin. But that would be too easy. You are on a
train and you ask another passenger: “I beg your pardon, sir, would
you mind telling me where the dining-car is?”  “Sure, fella. You go
out door, see, go corridor, you go straight, go one car, go two car,
go three car, you there.”  No, speaking pidgin-nigger closes off the
black man; it perpetuates a state of conflict in which the white man
injects the black with extremely dangerous foreign bodies. Nothing is
more astonishing than to hear a black man express himself properly,
for then in truth he is putting on the white world. I have had
occasion to talk with students of foreign origin. They speak French
badly: Little Crusoe, alias Prospero, is at ease then. He explains,
informs, interprets, helps them with their studies. But with a Negro
he is completely baffled; the Negro has made himself just as
knowledgeable. With him this game cannot be played, he is a complete
replica of the white man. So there is nothing to do but to give in.11
After all that has just been said, it will be understood that the
first impulse of the black man is to say no to those who attempt to
build a definition of him. It is understandable that the first action
of the black man is a reaction, and, since the Negro is appraised
11. “1 knew some Negroes in the School of Medicine ... in a word, they
were a disappointment; the color of their skin should have permitted
them to give us the opportunity to be charitable, generous, or
scientifically friendly. They were derelict in this duty, this claim
on our good will. All our tearful tenderness, all our calculated
solicitude were a drug on the market. We had no Negroes to condescend
to, nor did we have anything to hate them for; they counted for
virtually as much as we in the scale of the little jobs and petty
chicaneries of daily life.” Michel Salomon, “D’un juif à des nègres,”
Présence Africaine, No. 5, p. 776.
in terms of the extent of his assimilation, it is also understandable
why the newcomer expresses himself only in French. It is because he
wants to emphasize the rupture that has now occurred. He is
incarnating a new type of man that he imposes on his associates and
his family. And so his old mother can no longer understand him when he
talks to her about his duds, the family’s crummy joint, the dump
. . . all of it, of course, tricked out with the appropriate accent.
In every country of the world there are climbers, “the ones who forget
who they are,” and, in contrast to them, “the ones who remember where
they came from.” The Antilles Negro who goes home from France
expresses himself in dialect if he wants to make it plain that nothing
has changed. One can feel this at the dock where his family and his
friends are waiting for him. Waiting for him not only because he is
physically arriving, but in the sense of waiting for the chance to
strike back. They need a minute or two in order to make their
diagnosis. If the voyager tells his acquaintances, “I am so happy to
be back with you. Good Lord, it is hot in this country, I shall
certainly not be able to endure it very long,” they know: A European
has got off the ship.  In a more limited group, when students from the
Antilles meet in Paris, they have the choice of two possibilities:
—either to stand with the white world (that is to say, the real
world), and, since they will speak French, to be able to confront
certain problems and incline to a certain degree of universality in
their conclusions; —or to reject Europe, “Yo,”12 and cling together in
their dialect, making themselves quite comfortable in what we shall
call the Umwelt of Martinique; by this I mean—and this applies
particularly to my brothers of the Antilles—that when one of us tries,
in Paris or any other university city, to study a problem seriously,
he is accused of self-aggrandizement, and the surest way of cutting
him down is to remind him of the Antilles by exploding into
dialect. This must be recognized as one of the
12. A generic term for other people, applied especially to Europeans.
reasons why so many friendships collapse after a few months of life in
Europe.  My theme being the disalienation of the black man, I want to
make him feel that whenever there is a lack of understanding between
him and his fellows in the presence of the white man there is a lack
of judgment.  A Senegalese learns Creole in order to pass as an
Antilles native: I call this alienation.  The Antilles Negroes who
know him never weary of making jokes about him: I call this a lack of
judgment.
It becomes evident that we were not mistaken in believing that a study
of the language of the Antilles Negro would be able to show us some
characteristics of his world. As I said at the start, there is a
retaining-wall relation between language and group.  To speak a
language is to take on a world, a culture. The Antilles Negro who
wants to be white will be the whiter as he gains greater mastery of
the cultural tool that language is. Rather more than a year ago in
Lyon, I remember, in a lecture I had drawn a parallel between Negro
and European poetry, and a French acquaintance told me
enthusiastically, “At bottom you are a white man.” The fact that I had
been able to investigate so interesting a problem through the white
man’s language gave me honorary citizenship.  Historically, it must be
understood that the Negro wants to speak French because it is the key
that can open doors which were still barred to him fifty years ago. In
the Antilles Negro who comes within this study we find a quest for
subtleties, for refinements of language—so many further means of
proving to himself that he has measured up to the culture.13 It has
been said that the orators of the Antilles have a gift of eloquence
that would leave any European breathless. I am reminded of a relevant
story: In the election campaign of 1945, Aimé Césaire, who was seeking
13. Compare for example the almost incredible store of anecdotes to
which the election of any candidate gives rise. A filthy newspaper
called the Canard Déchainé could not get its fill of overwhelming
Monsieur B. with devastating Creolisms. This is indeed the bludgeon of
the Antilles: He can’t express himself in French.
a deputy’s seat, addressed a large audience in the boys’ school in
Fort-de-France. In the middle of his speech a woman fainted. The next
day, an acquaintance told me about this, and commented: “Français a té
tellement chaud que la femme là tombé malcadi.14 The power of
language!  Some other facts are worth a certain amount of attention:
for example, Charles-André Julien introducing Aimé Césaire as “a Negro
poet with a university degree,” or again, quite simply, the
expression, “a great black poet.”  These ready-made phrases, which
seem in a common-sense way to fill a need—for Aimé Césaire is really
black and a poet— have a hidden subtlety, a permanent rub. I know
nothing of Jean Paulhan except that he writes very interesting books;
I have no idea how old Roger Caillois is, since the only evidence I
have of his existence are the books of his that streak across my
horizon.  And let no one accuse me of affective allergies; what I am
trying to say is that there is no reason why André Breton should say
of Césaire, “Here is a black man who handles the French language as no
white man today can.”15 And, even though Breton may be stating a fact,
I do not see why there should be any paradox, anything to underline,
for in truth M. Aimé Césaire is a native of Martinique and a
university graduate.  Again we find this in Michel Leiris: If in the
writers of the Antilles there does exist a desire to break away from
the literary forms associated with formal education, such a desire,
oriented toward a purer future, could not take on an aspect of
folklore.  Seeking above all, in literature, to formulate the message
that is properly theirs, and in the case of some of them at least, to
be the spokesmen of an authentic race whose potentials have never been
acknowledged, they scorn such devices. Their intellectual growth took
place almost exclusively within the framework of the French language,
and it would be artiﬁce for
14. “Le français (l’élégance de la forme) était tellement chaud que la
femme est tombée en transes” [His French (the refinement of his style)
was so exciting that the woman swooned away].  15. Introduction to
Cahier d’un retour au pays natal, p. 14.
them to resort to a mode of speech that they virtually never use now
except as something learned.16
But we should be honored, the blacks will reproach me, that a white
man like Breton writes such things.  Let us go on. . . .
16. Michel Leiris, op. cit.
Man is motion toward the world and toward his like. A movement of
aggression, which leads to enslavement or to conquest; a movement of
love, a gift of self, the ultimate stage of what by common accord is
called ethical orientation. Every consciousness seems to have the
capacity to demonstrate these two components, simultaneously or
alternatively. The person I love will strengthen me by endorsing my
assumption of my manhood, while the need to earn the admiration or the
love of others will erect a value- making superstructure on my whole
vision of the world.  In reaching an understanding of phenomena of
this sort, the analyst and the phenomenologist are given a difficult
task. And, if a Sartre has appeared to formulate a description of love
as frustration, his Being and Nothingness amounting only to an
analysis of dishonesty and inauthenticity, the fact remains that true,
authentic love—wishing for others what one postulates for oneself,
when that postulation unites the permanent values of human
reality—entails the mobilization of psychic drives basically freed of
unconscious conflicts.  Left far, far behind, the last sequelae of a
titanic struggle carried on against the other have been dissipated.
Today I believe in the possibility of love; that is why I endeavor to
trace its imperfections, its perversions.  In this chapter devoted to
the relations between the woman of color and the European, it is our
problem to ascertain to what extent authentic love will remain
unattainable before one has purged oneself of that feeling of
inferiority or that Adlerian
exaltation, that overcompensation, which seem to be the indices of the
black Weltanschauung.  For after all we have a right to be perturbed
when we read, in Je suis Martiniquaise: “I should have liked to be
married, but to a white man. But a woman of color is never altogether
respectable in a white man’s eyes. Even when he loves her. I knew
that.”1 This passage, which serves in a way as the conclusion of a
vast delusion, prods one’s brain. One day a woman named Mayotte
Capécia, obeying a motivation whose elements are difficult to detect,
sat down to write 202 pages—her life—in which the most ridiculous
ideas proliferated at random. The enthusiastic reception that greeted
this book in certain circles forces us to analyze it.  For me, all
circumlocution is impossible: Je suis Martiniquaise is cut-rate
merchandise, a sermon in praise of corruption.  Mayotte loves a white
man to whom she submits in everything.  He is her lord. She asks
nothing, demands nothing, except a bit of whiteness in her life. When
she tries to determine in her own mind whether the man is handsome or
ugly, she writes, “All I know is that he had blue eyes, blond hair,
and a light skin, and that I loved him.” It is not difficult to see
that a rearrangement of these elements in their proper hierarchy would
produce something of this order: “I loved him because he had blue
eyes, blond hair, and a light skin.” We who come from the Antilles
know one thing only too well: Blue eyes, the people say, frighten the
Negro.  When I observed in my introduction that, historically,
inferiority has been felt economically, I was hardly mistaken.  There
were evenings, unhappily, when he had to leave me alone in order to
fulﬁll his social obligations. He would go to Didier, the fashionable
part of Fort-de-France inhabited by the “Martinique whiteys,” who are
perhaps not too pure racially but who are often very rich (it is
understood that one is white above a certain ﬁnancial level), and the
“France whiteys,” most of them government people and military ofﬁcers.
Among André’s colleagues, who like him had been marooned in the
Antilles by the war, some had managed to have their wives join them. I
understood that André could not always hold himself aloof from them. I
1. Mayotte Capécia, Je suis Martiniquaise (Paris, Corréa, 1948),
p. 202.
also accepted the fact that I was barred from this society because I
was a woman of color; but I could not help being jealous. It was no
good his explaining to me that his private life was something that
belonged to him alone and that his social and military life was
something else, which was not within his control; I nagged so much
that one day he took me to Didier.  We spent the evening in one of
those little villas that I had admired since my childhood, with two
ofﬁcers and their wives. The women kept watching me with a
condescension that I found unbearable. I felt that I was wearing too
much makeup, that I was not properly dressed, that I was not doing
André credit, perhaps simply because of the color of my skin—in short,
I spent so miserable an evening that I decided I would never again ask
André to take me with him.2
It was Didier, the preserve of the richest people in Martinique, that
magnetized all the girl’s wishes. And she makes the point herself: One
is white above a certain financial level. The houses in this section
had long dazzled the lady. I have the feeling, however, that Mayotte
Capécia is laying it on: She tells us that she did not go to
Fort-de-France until she was grown, at about the age of eighteen; and
yet the mansions of Didier had beguiled her childhood. There is an
inconsistency here that becomes under- standable when one grasps the
background. It is in fact customary in Martinique to dream of a form
of salvation that consists of magically turning white. A house in
Didier, acceptance into that high society (Didier is on a hill that
dominates the city), and there you have Hegel’s subjective certainty
made flesh. And in another way it is quite easy to see the place that
the dialectic of being and having3 would occupy in a description of
this behavior.  Such, however, is not the case with Mayotte. She is
looked at with distaste. Things begin their usual course. . . . It is
because she is a woman of color that she is not accepted in this
society. Her resentment feeds on her own artificiality. We shall see
why love is beyond the reach of the Mayotte Capécias of all
nations. For the beloved should not allow me to turn my infantile
fantasies into reality: On the contrary, he should help me to go
beyond them.
2. Ibid., p. 150.  3. Gabriel Marcel, Être et Avoir (Paris, Aubier,
1935).
The childhood of Mayotte Capécia shows us a certain number of
characteristics that illustrate the line of orientation she follows as
an adult. And each time there is a movement or a contact, it will have
a direct relation to her goal. It would seem indeed that for her white
and black represent the two poles of a world, two poles in perpetual
conflict: a genuinely Manichean concept of the world; the word has
been spoken, it must be remembered—white or black, that is the
question.  I am white: that is to say that I possess beauty and
virtue, which have never been black. I am the color of the
daylight. . . .  I am black: I am the incarnation of a complete fusion
with the world, an intuitive understanding of the earth, an
abandonment of my ego in the heart of the cosmos, and no white man, no
matter how intelligent he may be, can ever understand Louis Armstrong
and the music of the Congo. If I am black, it is not the result of a
curse, but it is because, having offered my skin, I have been able to
absorb all the cosmic effluvia. I am truly a ray of sunlight under the
earth. . . .  And there one lies body to body with one’s blackness or
one’s whiteness, in full narcissistic cry, each sealed into his own
peculiarity—with, it is true, now and then a flash or so, but these
are threatened at their source.  From the first this is how the
problem appears to Mayotte—at the fifth year of her age and the third
page of her book: “She took her inkwell out of the desk and emptied it
over his head.” This was her own way of turning whites into
blacks. But she quite soon recognized the futility of such attempts;
and then there were Lou-louze and her mother, who told her that life
was difficult for a woman of color. So, since she could no longer try
to blacken, to negrify the world, she was going to try, in her own
body and in her own mind, to bleach it. To start, she would become a
laundress: “I charged high prices, higher than elsewhere, but I worked
better, and since people in Fort-de-France like their linens clean,
they came to me. In the end, they were proud to have their laundry
done by Mayotte.”4
4. Capécia, op. cit., p. 131.
I am sorry that Mayotte Capécia has told us nothing about her
dreams. That would have made it easier to reach her unconscious.
Instead of recognizing her absolute blackness, she proceeds to turn it
into an accident. She learns that her grandmother was white.  I found
that I was proud of it. I was certainly not the only one who had white
blood, but a white grandmother was not so ordinary as a white
grandfather.5 So my mother, then, was a mixture? I should have guessed
it when I looked at her light color. I found her prettier than ever,
and cleverer, and more reﬁned. If she had married a white man, do you
suppose I should have been completely white? . . . And life might not
have been so hard for me?  . . . I daydreamed about this grandmother
whom I had never known and who had died because she had loved a
colored man of Martinique. . . . How could a Canadian woman have loved
a man of Martinique? I could never stop thinking of our priest, and I
made up my mind that I could never love anyone but a white man, a
blue-eyed blonde, a Frenchman.6
5. Since he is the master and more simply the male, the white man can
allow himself the luxury of sleeping with many women. This is true in
every country and especially in colonies. But when a white woman
accepts a black man there is automatically a romantic aspect. It is a
giving, not a seizing. In the colonies, in fact, even though there is
little marriage or actual sustained cohabitation between whites and
blacks, the number of hybrids is amazing. This is because the white
men often sleep with their black servants. None the less, that does
not provide any foundation for this passage from Mannoni: Thus one
part of our drives would quite naturally impel us toward the most
alien types. That is no mere literary illusion; there was no question
of literature, and the illusion was probably very slight when
Galliéni’s soldiers chose young ramatoa as their more or less
temporary wives. In fact these first contacts presented no
difficulties at all. This was in part due to the healthy sex life of
the Malagasies, which was unmarred by complexes. But this only goes to
show that racial conflicts develop gradually and do not arise
spontaneously. (Prospero and Caliban, p. 112).  Let us not
exaggerate. When a soldier of the conquering army went to bed with a
young Malagasy girl, there was undoubtedly no tendency on his part to
respect her entity as another person. The racial conflicts did not
come later, they coexisted. The fact that Algerian colonists go to bed
with their fourteen-year-old housemaids in no way demonstrates a lack
of racial conflicts in Algeria. No, the problem is more
complicated. And Mayotte Capécia is right: It is an honor to be the
daughter of a white woman. That proves that one was not “made in the
bushes.” (This expression is applied exclusively to all the
illegitimate children of the upper class in Martinique; they are known
to be extremely numerous: Aubery, for example, is supposed to have
fathered almost fifty.)  6. Capécia, op. cit., p. 59.
We are thus put on notice that what Mayotte wants is a kind of
lactification. For, in a word, the race must be whitened; every woman
in Martinique knows this, says it, repeats it. Whiten the race, save
the race, but not in the sense that one might think: not “preserve the
uniqueness of that part of the world in which they grew up,” but make
sure that it will be white. Every time I have made up my mind to
analyze certain kinds of behavior, I have been unable to avoid the
consideration of certain nauseating phenomena. The number of sayings,
proverbs, petty rules of conduct that govern the choice of a lover in
the Antilles is astounding. It is always essential to avoid falling
back into the pit of niggerhood, and every woman in the Antilles,
whether in a casual flirtation or in a serious affair, is determined
to select the least black of the men. Sometimes, in order to justify a
bad investment, she is compelled to resort to such arguments as this:
“X is black, but misery is blacker.” I know a great number of girls
from Martinique, students in France, who admitted to me with complete
candor—completely white candor—that they would find it impossible to
marry black men. (Get out of that and then deliberately go back to it?
Thank you, no.) Besides, they added, it is not that we deny that
blacks have any good qualities, but you know it is so much better to
be white. I was talking only recently to one such woman. Breathless
with anger, she stormed at me, “If Césaire makes so much display about
accepting his race, it is because he really feels it as a curse. Do
the whites boast like that about theirs? Every one of us has a white
potential, but some try to ignore it and others simply reverse it. As
far as I am concerned, I wouldn’t marry a Negro for anything in the
world.” Such attitudes are not rare, and I must confess that they
disturb me, for in a few years this young woman will have finished her
examinations and gone off to teach in some school in the Antilles. It
is not hard to guess what will come of that.  An enormous task
confronts the Antillean who has begun by carefully examining the
objectivity of the various prejudices prevailing in his
environment. When I began this book, having completed my medical
studies, I thought of presenting it as my thesis. But dialectic
required the constant adoption of positions.
Although I had more or less concentrated on the psychic alienation of
the black man, I could not remain silent about certain things which,
however psychological they may be, produce consequences that extend
into the domains of other sciences.  Every experience, especially if
it turns out to be sterile, has to become a component of reality and
thus play a part in the restructuring of reality. That is to say that
the patriarchal European family with its flaws, its failures, its
vices, closely linked to the society that we know, produces about 30
per cent neurotics.  The problem is to create, with the help of
psychoanalytical, sociological, political lessons, a new family
environment capable of reducing, if not of eliminating, the proportion
of waste, in the asocial sense of the word.  In other words, the
question is whether basic personality is a constant or a variable.
All these frantic women of color in quest of white men are
waiting. And one of these days, surely, they will be surprised to find
that they do not want to go back, they will dream of “a wonderful
night, a wonderful lover, a white man.” Possibly, too, they will
become aware, one day, that “white men do not marry black women.” But
they have consented to run this risk; what they must have is whiteness
at any price. For what reason? Nothing could be simpler. Here is a
story that suits their minds: One day St. Peter saw three men arrive
at the gate of heaven: a white man, a mulatto, and a Negro.  “What do
you want most?” he asked the white man.  “Money.”  “And you?” he asked
the mulatto.  “Fame.”  St. Peter turned then to the Negro, who said
with a wide smile:7 “I’m just carrying these gentlemen’s bags.”
7. The smile of the black man, the grin [in English in the original],
seems to have captured the interest of a number of writers. Here is
what Bernard Wolfe says about it: “It pleases us to portray the Negro
showing us all his teeth in a smile made for us. And his smile as we
see it—as we make it—always means a gift. . . .”  Gifts without end,
in every advertisement, on every screen, on every food-product
label. . . . The black man gives Madame the new “dark Creole colors”
for her pure nylons, courtesy of the House of Vigny; her “imaginative,
coil-like” bottles of
Not long ago Etiemble described one of his disillusionments: “I was
stupefied, as an adolescent, when a girl who knew me quite well jumped
up in anger because I had said to her, in a situation where the word
was not only appropriate but the one word that suited the occasion:
‘You, as a Negress—.’ ‘Me? a Negress? Can’t you see I’m practically
white? I despise Negroes. Niggers stink.  They’re dirty and
lazy. Don’t ever mention niggers to me.’”8 I knew another black girl
who kept a list of Parisian dance-halls
“where-there-was-no-chance-of-running-into-niggers.”  We must see
whether it is possible for the black man to overcome his feeling of
insignificance, to rid his life of the compulsive quality that makes
it so like the behavior of the phobic. Affect is exacerbated in the
Negro, he is full of rage because he feels small, he suffers from an
inadequacy in all human communication, and all these factors chain him
with an unbearable insularity.  Describing the phenomenon of
ego-withdrawal, Anna Freud writes: As a method of avoiding “pain,”
ego-restriction, like the various forms of denial, does not come under
the heading of the psychology of neurosis but is a normal stage in the
development of the ego. When the ego is young and plastic, its
withdrawal from one ﬁeld of activity is sometimes compensated for by
excellence in another, upon which it concentrates.  But, when it has
become rigid or has already acquired an intolerance of “pain” and so
is obsessionally ﬁxated to a method of ﬂight, such withdrawal is
punished by impaired development. By abandoning one position after
another it becomes one-sided, loses too many interests and can show
but a meagre achievement.9
Golliwog toilet water and perfume. Shoeshines, clothes white as snow,
comfortable lower berths, quick baggage-handling; jazz, jitterbug,
jive, jokes, and the wonderful stories of Br’er Rabbit to amuse the
little children. Service with a smile, every time.  . . . “The
blacks,” writes anthropologist Geoffrey Gorer in The American Spirit:
A Study in National Character, “are kept in their obsequious attitude
by the extreme penalties of fear and force, and this is common
knowledge to both the whites and the blacks. Nevertheless, the whites
demand that the blacks be always smiling, attentive, and friendly in
all their relationships with them. . . .” (“L’oncle Rémus et son
lapin,” by Bernard Wolfe, Les Temps Modernes, May, 1949, p. 888.)
8. “Sur le Martinique de M. Michel Cournot,” Les Temps Modernes,
February, 1950.  9. Anna Freud, The Ego and the Mechanism of Defence
(New York, International Universities Press, 1946), p. 111.
We understand now why the black man cannot take pleasure in his
insularity. For him there is only one way out, and it leads into the
white world. Whence his constant preoccupation with attracting the
attention of the white man, his concern with being powerful like the
white man, his determined effort to acquire protective qualities—that
is, the proportion of being or having that enters into the composition
of an ego. As I said earlier, it is from within that the Negro will
seek admittance to the white sanctuary. The attitude derives from the
intention.  Ego-withdrawal as a successful defense mechanism is
impossible for the Negro. He requires a white approval.  In the midst
of her mystical euphoria and her rhapsodic canticles, it seems to
Mayotte Capécia that she is an angel and that she soars away “all pink
and white.” Nevertheless, in the film, Green Pastures, God and the
angels are black, but the film was a brutal shock to our author: “How
is it possible to imagine God with Negro characteristics? This is not
my vision of paradise.  But, after all, it was just an American
film.”10 Indeed no, the good and merciful God cannot be black: He is a
white man with bright pink cheeks. From black to white is the course
of mutation. One is white as one is rich, as one is beautiful, as one
is intelligent.  Meanwhile, André has departed to carry the white
message to other Mayottes under other skies: delightful little genes
with blue eyes, bicycling the whole length of the chromosome
corridor. But, as a good white man, he has left instructions behind
him. He is speaking of his and Mayotte’s child: “You will bring him
up, you will tell him about me, you will say, ‘He was a superior
person.  You must work hard to be worthy of him.’”11 What about
dignity? He had no need now to achieve it: It was injected now into
the labyrinth of his arteries, entrenched in his little pink
fingernails, a solidly rooted, white dignity.  And what about the
father? This is what Etiemble has to say about him: “A fine specimen
of his kind; he talked about the family, work, the nation, our good
Pétain and our good God, all of which 10. Capécia, op. cit., p. 65.
11. Ibid., p. 185.
allowed him to make her pregnant according to form. God has made use
of us, said the handsome swine, the handsome white man, the handsome
officer. After which, under the same Godfearing Pétainist proprieties,
I shove her over to the next man.”  Before we have finished with her
whose white lord is “like one dead” and who surrounds herself with
dead men in a book crowded with deplorably dead things, we feel that
we should like to ask Africa to send us a special envoy.12 Nor are we
kept waiting. Abdoulaye Sadji, in Nini,13 offers us a description of
how black men can behave in contact with Europeans. I have said that
Negrophobes exist. It is not hatred of the Negro, however, that
motivates them; they lack the courage for that, or they have lost
it. Hate is not inborn; it has to be constantly cultivated, to be
brought into being, in conflict with more or less recognized guilt
complexes. Hate demands existence, and he who hates has to show his
hate in appropriate actions and behavior; in a sense, he has to become
hate. That is why the Americans have substituted discrimination for
lynching. Each to his own side of the street. Therefore we are not
surprised that in the cities of (French?) black Africa there are
European quarters.  Mournier’s work, L’éveil de l’Afrique noire, had
already attracted my interest, but I was impatiently awaiting an
African voice.  Thanks to Alioune Diop’s magazine, I have been able to
coordinate the psychological motivations that govern men of color.
12. After Je suis Martiniquaise, Mayotte Capécia wrote another book,
La négresse blanche. She must have recognized her earlier mistakes,
for in this book one sees an attempt to re-evaluate the Negro. But
Mayotte Capécia did not reckon with her own unconscious. As soon as
the novelist allows her characters a little freedom, they use it to
belittle the Negro. All the Negroes whom she describes are in one way
or another either semi-criminals or “sho’ good” niggers.  In
addition—and from this one can foresee what is to come—it is
legitimate to say that Mayotte Capécia has definitively turned her
back on her country. In both her books only one course is left for her
heroines: to go away. This country of niggers is decidedly
accursed. In fact, there is an aura of malediction surrounding Mayotte
Capécia. But she is centrifugal. Mayotte Capécia is barred from
herself.  May she add no more to the mass of her imbecilities.  Depart
in peace, mudslinging storyteller. . . . But remember that, beyond
your 500 anemic pages, it will always be possible to regain the
honorable road that leads to the heart.  In spite of you.  13. In
Présence Africaine, 1–2–3.
There is wonder, in the most religious sense of the word, in this
passage: M. Campian is the only white man in Saint-Louis who goes
regularly to the Saint-Louis Club14—a man of a certain social
standing, for he is an engineer with the Department of Bridges and
Highways, as well as deputy director of Public Works in Senegal. He is
said to be very much of a Negrophile, much more so than M. Roddin, who
teaches at the Lycée Faidherbe and who gave a lecture on the equality
of the laces in the Saint-Louis Club itself. The good character of the
one or the other is a constant theme for vehement discussions. In any
event, M. Campian goes to the club more often, and there he has made
the acquaintance of very well-behaved natives who show him much
deference, who like him and who feel honored by his presence among
them.15
The author, who is a teacher in black Africa, feels obligated to
M. Roddin for his lecture on racial equality. I call this an outrage.
One can understand the complaints that Mounier heard from the young
Africans whom he had occasion to meet: “What we need here are
Europeans like you.” One is constantly aware that for the black man
encountering a toubab with understanding offers a new hope of harmony.
Analyzing various passages of Abdoulaye Sadji’s story, I shall attempt
to grasp the living reactions of the woman of color to the
European. First of all, there are two such women: the Negress and the
mulatto. The first has only one possibility and one concern: to turn
white. The second wants not only to turn white but also to avoid
slipping back. What indeed could be more illogical than a mulatto
woman’s acceptance of a Negro husband? For it must be understood once
and for all that it is a question of saving the race.  Hence Nini’s
great problem: A Negro has had the gall to go so far as to ask her to
marry him. A Negro had the gall to write to her:
14. A club frequented by the local young men. It stands across the
street from the Civil Club, which is exclusively European.  15. Sadji,
op. cit., in Présence Africaine, no. 2, p. 280.
The love that I offer you is pure and strong, it has nothing of a
false tenderness intended to lull you with lies and illusions. . . . I
want to see you happy, completely happy, in a setting to frame your
qualities, which I believe I know how to appreciate. . . . I should
consider it the highest of honors and the greatest of joys to have you
in my house and to dedicate myself to you, body and soul. Your graces
would illuminate my home and radiate light to the darkest
corners. . . . Furthermore, I consider you too civilized and reﬁned to
reject brutally the offer of a devoted love concerned only with
reassuring your happiness.16
This final sentence should not surprise us. Normally, the mulatto
woman should refuse the presumptuous Negro without mercy. But, since
she is civilized, she will not allow herself to see her lover’s color,
so that she can concentrate her attention on his devotion. Describing
Mactar, Abdoulaye Sadji writes: “An idealist and a convinced advocate
of unlimited progress, he still believed in the good faith of men, in
their honesty, and he readily assumed that in everything merit alone
must triumph.”17 Who is Mactar? He has passed his baccalaureate, he is
an accountant in the Department of Rivers, and he is pursuing a
perfectly stupid little stenographer, who has, however, the least
disputable quality: She is almost white. Therefore one must apologize
for taking the liberty of sending her a letter: “the utmost insolence,
perhaps the first that any Negro had dared to attempt.”18 One must
apologize for daring to offer black love to a white soul. This we
encounter again in René Maran: the fear, the timorousness, the
humility of the black man in his relations with the white woman, or in
any case with a woman whiter than he.  Just as Mayotte Capécia
tolerates anything from her lord, André, Mactar makes himself the
slave of Nini, the mulatto. Prepared to sell his soul. But what is
waiting for this boor is the law of plea in bar. The mulatto considers
his letter an insult, an outrage to her honor as a “white lady.” This
Negro is an idiot, a scoundrel,
16. Ibid., p. 286.  17. Ibid., p. 281–282.  18. Ibid., p. 281.
an ignoramus who needs a lesson. That lesson she is prepared to give
him; she will teach him to be more courteous and less brazen; she will
make him understand that “white skins” are not for “bougnouls.”19
Having learned the circumstances, the whole mulatto “society” plays
chorus to her wrath. There is talk of taking the matter into court, of
having the black man brought up on criminal charges.  “There will be
letters to the head of the Department of Public Works, to the governor
of the colony, to call their attention to the black man’s behavior and
have him dismissed in recompense for the moral havoc that he has
inflicted.”20 Such an offense against principle should be punished by
castration. And ultimately a request is made that Mactar be formally
reprimanded by the police. For, “if he returns to his unhealthy
follies, we will have him brought into line by Police Inspector Dru,
whose colleagues have nicknamed him the-real- bad-white-man.”21 We
have seen here how a girl of color reacts to a declaration of love
made by one of her own. Let us inquire now what happens in the case of
a white man. Once more we resort to Sadji. The long passage that he
devotes to the reactions produced by the marriage of a white man and a
mulatto will provide the vehicle.  For some time a rumor had been
repeated all over Saint-Louis. . . . It was at ﬁrst a little whisper
that went from one to another, making the wrinkled faces of the old
“signaras” glow, putting new light into their dull eyes; then the
younger women, showing the whites of their eyes and forming their
heavy lips into circles, shouted the news, which caused amazement
everywhere. “Oh, it can’t be! . . . How do you know it’s true? Can
such things happen? . . . It’s sweet. . . . It’s such a scream.” The
news that had been running through Saint-Louis for a month was
delightful, more delightful than all the promises in the world. It
crowned a certain dream of grandeur,
19. Ibid., p. 287. Bougnoul is one of those untranslatable coinages of
the rabble like the American jigaboo. Originated by the North African
colonists, bougnoul means, generically, any “native” of a race
inferior to that of the person using the word.  (Translator’s note.)
20. Ibid., p. 288.  21. Ibid., p. 289.
of distinction, which was common to all the mulatto women. The Ninis,
the Nanas, and the Nénettes live wholly outside the natural conditions
of their country. The great dream that haunts every one of them is to
be the bride of a white man from Europe. One could say that all their
efforts are directed to this end, which is almost never
attained. Their need to gesticulate, their love of ridiculous
ostentation, their calculated, theatrical, revolting attitudes, are
just so many effects of the same mania for grandeur. They must have
white men, completely white, and nothing else will do. Almost all of
them spend their entire lives waiting for this stroke of luck, which
is anything but likely. And they are still waiting when old age
overtakes them and forces them deep into dark refuges where the dream
ﬁnally grows into a haughty resignation. . . .  Very delightful
news. . . . M. Darrivey, a completely white European employed in the
civil service, had formally requested the hand of Dédée, a mulatto who
was only half-Negro. It was unbelievable.22
Something remarkable must have happened on the day when the white man
declared his love to the mulatto. There was recognition, incorporation
into a group that had seemed hermetic.  The psychological minus-value,
this feeling of insignificance and its corollary, the impossibility of
reaching the light, totally vanished. From one day to the next, the
mulatto went from the class of slaves to that of masters.  She had
been recognized through her overcompensating behavior. She was no
longer the woman who wanted to be white; she was white. She was
joining the white world.  In Magie noire, Paul Morand described a
similar phenomenon, but one has since learned to be leery of Paul
Morand. From the psychological point of view, it may be interesting to
consider the following problem. The educated mulatto woman, especially
if she is a student, engages in doubly equivocal behavior. She says,
“I do not like the Negro because he is savage. Not savage in a
cannibal way, but lacking refinement.” An abstract point of view.  And
when one points out to her that in this respect some black people may
be her superiors, she falls back on their “ugliness.” A factitious
point of view. Faced with the proofs of a genuine black 22. Ibid.,
p. 489.
esthetic, she professes to be unable to understand it; one tries then
to explain its canon to her; the wings of her nose flare, there is a
sharp intake of breath, “she is free to choose her own husband.”  As a
last resort, the appeal to subjectivity. If, as Anna Freud says, the
ego is driven to desperation by the amputation of all its defense
mechanisms, “in so far as the bringing of the unconscious activities
of the ego into consciousness has the effect of disclosing the
defensive processes and rendering them inoperative, the result of
analysis is to weaken the ego still further and to advance the
pathological process.”23 But in Dédée’s case the ego does not have to
defend itself, since its claims have been officially recognized: She
is marrying a white man. Every coin, however, has two sides; whole
families have been made fools of. Three or four mulatto girls had
acquired mulatto admirers, while all their friends had white
men. “This was looked on particularly as an insult to the family as a
whole; an offense, moreover, that required amends.”24 For these
families had been humiliated in their most legitimate ambitions; the
mutilation that they had suffered affected the very movement of their
lives, the rhythm of their existence. . . .  In response to a profound
desire they sought to change, to “evolve.” This right was denied to
them. At any rate, it was challenged.  What is there to say, after
these expositions?  Whether one is dealing with Mayotte Capécia of
Martinique or with Nini of Saint-Louis, the same process is to be
observed. A bilateral process, an attempt to acquire—by internalizing
them— assets that were originally prohibited. It is because the
Negress feels inferior that she aspires to win admittance into the
white world. In this endeavor she will seek the help of a phenomenon
that we shall call affective erethism.  This work represents the sum
of the experiences and observations of seven years; regardless of the
area I have studied, one thing has struck me: The Negro enslaved by
his inferiority, the white man enslaved by his superiority alike
behave in accordance with 23. Anna Freud, op. cit., p. 70.  24. Sadji,
op. cit., p. 498.
a neurotic orientation. Therefore I have been led to consider their
alienation in terms of psychoanalytical classifications. The Negro’s
behavior makes him akin to an obsessive neurotic type, or, if one
prefers, he puts himself into a complete situational neurosis. In the
man of color there is a constant effort to run away from his own
individuality, to annihilate his own presence. Whenever a man of color
protests, there is alienation. Whenever a man of color rebukes, there
is alienation. We shall see later, in Chapter Six, that the Negro,
having been made inferior, proceeds from humiliating insecurity
through strongly voiced self-accusation to despair. The attitude of
the black man toward the white, or toward his own race, often
duplicates almost completely a constellation of delirium, frequently
bordering on the region of the pathological.  It will be objected that
there is nothing psychotic in the Negroes who are discussed
here. Nevertheless I should like to cite two highly significant
instances. A few years ago I knew a Negro medical student. He had an
agonizing conviction that he was not taken at his true worth—not on
the university level, he explained, but as a human being. He had an
agonizing conviction that he would never succeed in gaining
recognition as a colleague from the whites in his profession and as a
physician from his European patients. In such moments of fantasy
intuition,25 the times most favorable26 to psychosis, he would get
drunk. Finally, he enlisted one day in the army as a medical officer;
and, he added, not for anything in the world would he agree to go to
the colonies or to serve in a colonial unit. He wanted to have white
men under his command. He was a boss; as such he was to be feared or
respected. That was just what he wanted, what he strove for: to make
white men adopt a Negro attitude toward him. In this way he was
obtaining revenge for the imago that had always obsessed him: the
frightened, trembling Negro, abased before the white overlord.  I had
another acquaintance, a customs inspector in a port on the French
mainland, who was extremely severe with tourists or 25. Dublineau,
L’intuition délirante.  26. Jacques Lacan.
travelers in transit. “Because,” he explained to me, “if you aren’t a
bastard they take you for a poor shit. Since I’m a Negro, you can
imagine how I’m going to get it either way. . . .”  In Understanding
Human Nature, Adler says: When we demonstrate cases . . . it is
frequently convenient to show relationships between the childhood
impressions and the actual complaint . . . this is best done by a
graph. . . . We will succeed in many cases in being able to plot this
graph of life, the spiritual curve along which the entire movement of
an individual has taken place. The equation of the curve is the
behavior pattern which this individual has followed since earliest
childhood.  . . . Actually we see this behavior pattern, whose ﬁnal
conﬁguration is subject to some few changes, but whose essential
content, whose energy and meaning remain unchanged from earliest
childhood, is the determining factor, even though the relations to the
adult environment . . . may tend to modify it in some instances.27
We are anticipating, and it is already clear that the individual
psychology of Adler will help us to understand the conception of the
world held by the man of color. Since the black man is a former slave,
we will turn to Hegel too; and, to conclude, Freud should be able to
contribute to our study.  Nini and Mayotte Capécia: two types of
behavior that move us to thought.  Are there no other possibilities?
But those are pseudo-questions that do not concern us. I will say,
however, that every criticism of that which is implies a solution, if
indeed one can propose a solution to one’s fellow—to a free being.
What I insist on is that the poison must be eliminated once and for
all.
27. Alfred Adler, Understanding Human Nature (New York, Greenberg,
1927), p. 80.
Out of the blackest part of my soul, across the zebra striping of my
mind, surges this desire to be suddenly white.  I wish to be
acknowledged not as black but as white.  Now—and this is a form of
recognition that Hegel had not envisaged—who but a white woman can do
this for me? By loving me she proves that I am worthy of white love. I
am loved like a white man.  I am a white man.  Her love takes me onto
the noble road that leads to total realization. . . .  I marry white
culture, white beauty, white whiteness.  When my restless hands caress
those white breasts, they grasp white civilization and dignity and
make them mine.  Some thirty years ago, a coal-black Negro, in a Paris
bed with a “maddening” blonde, shouted at the moment of orgasm,
“Hurrah for Schoelcher!” When one recalls that it was Victor
Schoelcher who persuaded the Third Republic to adopt the decree
abolishing slavery, one understands why it is necessary to elaborate
somewhat on the possible aspects of relations between black men and
white women.  It will be argued that this little tale is not
authenticated; but simply that it could be born and survive through
the years is an indication: It is no fallacy. For the anecdote renews
a conflict that, active or dormant, is always real. Its persistence
attests to the black world’s endorsement. To say it another way, when
a story
flourishes in the heart of a folklore, it is because in one way or
another it expresses an aspect of “the spirit of the group.”  In
analyzing Je suis Martiniquaise and Nini, we have seen how the Negress
behaves with the white man. Through a novel by René Maran—which seems
to be autobiographical—let us try to understand what happens when the
man is black and the woman white.  The problem is admirably laid out,
for the character of Jean Veneuse will make it possible for us to go
much more deeply into the attitude of the black man. What are the
terms of this problem?  Jean Veneuse is a Negro. Born in the Antilles,
he has lived in Bordeaux for years; so he is a European. But he is
black; so he is a Negro. There is the conflict. He does not understand
his own race, and the whites do not understand him. And, he observes,
“The Europeans in general and the French in particular, not satisfied
with simply ignoring the Negro of the colonies, repudiate the one whom
they have shaped into their own image.”1 The personality of the author
does not emerge quite so easily as one might wish. An orphan sent to a
provincial boarding- school, he is compelled to spend his vacations
there. His friends and acquaintances scatter all over France on the
slightest pretext, whereas the little Negro is forced into the habit
of solitude, so that his best friends are his books. At the extreme, I
should say there is a certain accusatory character, a certain
resentment, an ill-disciplined aggression, in the long list—too
long—of “traveling companions” that the author offers us: at the
extreme, I say, but it is exactly to the extreme that we have to go.
Unable to be assimilated, unable to pass unnoticed, he consoles
himself by associating with the dead, or at least the absent. And his
associations, unlike his life, ignore the barriers of centuries and
oceans. He talks with Marcus Aurelius, Joinville, Pascal, Pérez
Galdós, Rabindranath Tagore. If we were compelled to hang a label on
Jean Veneuse, we should have to call him an introvert; others might
call him a sentimentalist, but a sentimen- talist who is always
careful to contrive a way of winning out on
1. Un homme pared aux autres (Paris, Editions Arc-en-Ciel, 1947),
p. 11.
the level of ideas and knowledge. As a matter of fact, his friends and
schoolmates hold him in high regard: “What a perpetual dreamer! You
know, my old pal, Veneuse, is really a character.  He never takes his
nose out of his books except to scribble all over his notebooks.”2 But
a sentimentalist who goes nonstop from singing Spanish songs to
translating into English. Shy, but uneasy as well: “As I was leaving
them, I heard Divrande say to him: ‘A good kid, that Veneuse—he seems
to like being sad and quiet, but he’s always helpful. You can trust
him. You’ll see. He’s the kind of Negro that a lot of white guys ought
to be like.’ ”3 Uneasy and anxious indeed. An anxious man who cannot
escape his body. We know from other sources that René Maran cherished
an affection for André Gide. It seems possible to find a resemblance
between the ending of Un homme pareil aux autres and that of Gide’s
Strait is the Gate. This departure, this tone of emotional pain, of
moral impossibility, seems an echo of the story of Jérôme and Alissa.
But there remains the fact that Veneuse is black. He is a bear who
loves solitude. He is a thinker. And when a woman tries to start a
flirtation with him, he says, “Are you trying to smoke out an old bear
like me? Be careful, my dear. Courage is a fine thing, but you’re
going to get yourself talked about if you go on attracting attention
this way. A Negro? Shameful—it’s beneath contempt. Associating with
anybody of that race is just utterly disgracing yourself.”4 Above all,
he wants to prove to the others that he is a man, their equal. But let
us not be misled: Jean Veneuse is the man who has to be convinced. It
is in the roots of his soul, as complicated as that of any European,
that the doubt persists. If the expression may be allowed, Jean
Veneuse is the lamb to be slaughtered. Let us make the effort.  After
having quoted Stendhal and mentioned the phenomenon of
“crystallization,” he declares that he loves
2. Ibid., p. 87.  3. Ibid., pp. 18–19.  4. Ibid., pp. 45–46.
Andrée spiritually in Mme. Coulanges and physically in Clarisse. It is
insane.  But that is how it is: I love Clarisse. I love
Mme. Coulanges, even though I never really think of either of
them. All they are for me is an excuse that makes it possible for me
to delude myself. I study Andrée in them and I begin to know her by
heart. . . . I don’t know. I know nothing. I have no wish to try to
know anything; or, rather, I know nothing any more except one thing:
that the Negro is a man like the rest, the equal of the others, and
that his heart, which only the ignorant consider simple, can be as
complicated as the heart of the most complicated of Europeans.5
For the simplicity of the Negro is a myth created by superficial
observers. “I love Clarisse, I love Mme. Coulanges, and it is Andrée
Marielle whom I really love. Only she, no one else.”6 Who is Andrée
Marielle? You know who she is, the daughter of the poet, Louis
Marielle. But now you see that this Negro, “who has raised himself
through his own intelligence and his assiduous labors to the level of
the thought and the culture of Europe,”7 is incapable of escaping his
race.  Andrée Marielle is white; no solution seems possible. Yet,
association with Payot, Gide, Moréas, and Voltaire seemed to have
wiped out all that. In all good faith, Jean Veneuse “believed in that
culture and set himself to love this new world he had discovered and
conquered for his own use. What a blunder he had made! Arriving at
maturity and going off to serve his adopted country in the land of his
ancestors was enough to make him wonder whether he was not being
betrayed by everything about him, for the white race would not accept
him as one of its own and the black virtually repudiated him.”8 Jean
Veneuse, feeling that existence is impossible for him without love,
proceeds to dream it into being. He proceeds to dream it alive and to
produce verses: When a man loves he must not speak; Best that he hide
it from himself.
5.  Ibid., p. 83.  6.  Ibid., p. 83.  7.  Ibid., p. 36.  8.  Ibid.,
p. 36.
Andrée Marielle has written to him that she loves him, but Jean
Veneuse needs authorization. It is essential that some white man say
to him, “Take my sister.” Veneuse has put a certain number of
questions to his friend, Coulanges. Here, more or less in extenso, is
what Coulanges answers:
Old boy [Coulanges uses the English expression], Once again you bring
me your problem, once again I will give you my opinion—once and for
all. Let us proceed in an orderly fashion. Your situation as you have
explained it to me is as clear as it can be. Allow me nevertheless to
clear the ground before me. It will be all to your good.  How old were
you, anyway, when you left home to go to France? Three or four, I
think. You have never seen your native island since, and you have not
the slightest interest in seeing it again. You have lived in Bordeaux
ever since. And ever since you became a colonial ofﬁcial, Bordeaux is
where you have spent the greatest part of your leaves. In short, you
are really one of us. Perhaps you are not altogether aware of the
fact. In that case, accept the fact that you are a Frenchman from
Bordeaux. Get that into your thick head. You know nothing of your
compatriots of the Antilles. I should be amazed, in fact, if you could
even manage to communicate with them. The ones I know, furthermore,
have no resemblance to you.  In fact you are like us—you are “us.”
Your thoughts are ours. You behave as we behave, as we would
behave. You think of yourself—others think of you—as a Negro? Utterly
mistaken! You merely look like one. As for everything else, you think
as a European. And so it is natural that you love as a European. Since
European men love only European women, you can hardly marry anyone but
a woman of the country where you have always lived, a woman of our
good old France, your real and only country. This being the case, let
us get on to the subject of your latest letter. On the one hand we
have one Jean Veneuse, who resembles you like a brother; on the other
hand we have Mlle. Andrée Marielle. Andrée Marielle, whose skin is
white, loves Jean Veneuse, who is extremely brown and who adores
Andrée Marielle. But that does not stop you from asking me what must
be done.  You magniﬁcent idiot! . . .  As soon as you are back in
France, rush to the father of the girl who already belongs to you in
spirit and strike your ﬁst savagely on your heart
as you shout at him: “I love her. She loves me. We love each
other. She must marry me. Otherwise I will kill myself here and now.”9
When the question is put directly, then, the white man agrees to give
his sister to the black—but on one condition: You have nothing in
common with real Negroes. You are not black, you are “extremely
brown.”  This procedure is quite familiar to colored students in
France.  Society refuses to consider them genuine Negroes. The Negro
is a savage, whereas the student is civilized. “You’re ‘us,’”
Coulanges tells him; and if anyone thinks you are a Negro he is
mistaken, because you merely look like one. But Jean Veneuse does not
want this. He cannot accept it, because he knows.  He knows that,
“enraged by this degrading ostracism, mulattoes and Negroes have only
one thought from the moment they land in Europe: to gratify their
appetite for white women.”  The majority of them, including those of
lighter skin who often go to the extreme of denying both their
countries and their mothers, tend to marry in Europe not so much out
of love as for the satisfaction of being the master of a European
woman; and a certain tang of proud revenge enters into this.  And so I
wonder whether in my case there is any difference from theirs;
whether, by marrying you, who are a European, I may not appear to be
making a show of contempt for the women of my own race and, above all,
to be drawn on by desire for that white ﬂesh that has been forbidden
to us Negroes as long as white men have ruled the world, so that
without my knowledge I am attempting to revenge myself on a European
woman for everything that her ancestors have inflicted on mine
throughout the centuries.10
What a struggle to free himself of a purely subjective conflict.  I am
a white man, I was born in Europe, all my friends are white. There are
not eight Negroes in the city where I live. I think in French, France
is my religion. I am a European, do you understand? I am not a Negro,
and in order to prove it to you, I as a public employe am going to
show the genuine Negroes the
9. Ibid., pp. 152–154.  10. Ibid., p. 185.
differences that separate me from them. Indeed, read the book again
and you will be convinced: Who knocked at the door? Ah, yes, of
course.  “Is that you, Soua?”  “Yes, major.”  “What do you want?”
“Roll call, major. Five men guard. Seventeen men prisoners—everybody
here.”  “Anything else new? Any word from the runner?”  “No, suh,
major.”11 Monsieur Veneuse has native bearers. He has a young Negro
girl in his house. And to the Negroes who seem downcast that he is
leaving, he feels that the only thing for him to say is, “Please go
away. Please go away. You see . . . how unhappy it makes me to leave
you. Please go now. I will not forget you. I am leaving you only
because this is not my country and I feel too alone here, too empty,
too deprived of all the comfort that I need but that you, luckily for
you, do not yet require.”12 When we read such passages we cannot help
thinking of Félix Eboué, unquestionably a Negro, who saw his duty
quite differently in the same circumstances. Jean Veneuse is not a
Negro and does not wish to be a Negro. And yet, without his knowledge,
a gulf has been created. There is something indefinable, irreversible,
there is indeed the that within of Harold Rosenberg.13
Louis-T. Achille said in his report to the Interracial Conferences of
1949: Insofar as truly interracial marriage is concerned, one can
legitimately wonder to what extent it may not represent for the
colored spouse a kind of subjective consecration to wiping out in
himself and in his own mind the color prejudice from which he has
suffered so long. It would be interesting to investigate this in a
given number of cases and perhaps to seek in this clouded motivation
the underlying reason for certain interracial marriages entered into
outside the normal conditions of a happy household. Some men or some
women, in effect, by choosing partners of another race, marry
11. Ibid., p. 162.  12. Ibid., p. 213.  13. “Du Jeu au Je, Esquisse
d’une géographie de l’action,” Les Temps Modernes, April, 1948,
p. 1732.
persons of a class or a culture inferior to their own whom they would
not have chosen as spouses in their own race and whose chief asset
seems to be the assurance that the partner will achieve
denaturalization and (to use a loathsome word) “deracialization.”
Among certain people of color, the fact that they are marrying someone
of the white race seems to have overridden every other
consideration. In this fact they ﬁnd access to complete equality with
that illustrious race, the master of the world, the ruler of the
peoples of color. . . .14
We know historically that the Negro guilty of lying with a white woman
is castrated. The Negro who has had a white woman makes himself taboo
to his fellows. It is easy for the mind to formulate this drama of
sexual preoccupation. And that is exactly the ultimate goal of the
archetype of Uncle Remits: Br’er Rabbit, who represents the black
man. Will he or will he not succeed in going to bed with the two
daughters of Mrs. Meadows? There are ups and downs, all told by a
laughing, good-natured, easygoing Negro, a Negro who serves with a
smile.  During the time when I was slowly being jolted alive into
puberty, I had the honor of being able to look in wonder on one of my
older friends who had just come back from France and who had held a
Parisian girl in his arms. I shall try to analyze this problem in a
special chapter.  Talking recently with several Antilleans, I found
that the dominant concern among those arriving in France was to go to
bed with a white woman. As soon as their ships docked in Le Havre,
they were off to the houses. Once this ritual of initiation into
“authentic” manhood had been fulfilled, they took the train for Paris.
But what is important here is to examine Jean Veneuse. To this end, I
shall resort in considerable measure to a study by Germaine Guex, La
névrose d’abandon.  Contrasting what she calls the abandonment
neurosis, which is pre-Oedipal in nature, to the real post-Oedipal
conflicts described by orthodox Freudians, Dr. Guex analyzes two
types, the first of which seems to illustrate the plight of Jean
Veneuse: “It is this tripod—the anguish created by every abandonment,
the 14. Rythmes du Monde, 1949, p. 113.
aggression to which it gives rise, and the devaluation of self that
flows out of it—that supports the whole symptomatology of this
neurosis.”15 We made an introvert of Jean Veneuse. We know character-
ologically—or, better, phenomenologically—that autistic thinking can
be made dependent on a primary introversion.16 In a patient of the
negative-aggressive type, obsession with the past and with its
frustrations, its gaps, its defeats, paralyzes his enthusiasm for
living. Generally more introverted than the positive-loving type, he
has a tendency to go back over his past and present disappointments,
building up in himself a more or less secret area of bitter,
disillusioned resentments that often amounts to a kind of autism. But,
unlike the genuine autistic person, the abandonment-neurotic is aware
of this secret zone, which he cultivates and defends against every
intrusion. More egocentric than the neurotic of the second type
(positive-loving), he views everything in terms of himself. He has
little capacity for disinterestedness: His aggressions and a constant
need for vengeance inhibit his impulses. His retreat into himself does
not allow him to have any positive experience that would compensate
for his past. Hence the lack of self-esteem and therefore of affective
security is virtually total in such cases; and as a result there is an
overwhelming feeling of impotence in relation to life and to people,
as well as a complete rejection of the feeling of
responsibility. Others have betrayed him and thwarted him, and yet it
is only from these others that he expects any improvement in his
lot.17
A magnificent description, into which the character of Jean Veneuse
fits perfectly. For, he tells us, “arriving at maturity and going off
to serve my adopted country in the land of my ancestors was enough to
make me wonder whether I was not being betrayed18 by everything about
me, for the white race would not accept me as one of its own and the
black virtually repudiated me. That is precisely my position.”19
15. G. Guex, La Névrose d’abandon (Paris, Presses Universitaires de
France, 1950), p. 13.  16. E. Minkowski, La Schizophrénie (Paris,
Payot, 1927).  17. Guex, op. cit., pp. 27–28.  18. My italics—F.F.
19. Maran, op. cit., p. 36.
The attitude is one of recrimination toward the past, devaluation of
self, incapability of being understood as he would like to be.  Listen
again to Jean Veneuse: Who can describe the desperation of the little
Hottentots whose parents, in the hope of making real Frenchmen of
them, transplant them to France too early? From one day to the next
they are locked into boarding schools, these free, joyful children,
“for your own good,” as their weeping parents tell them.  I was one of
these intermittent orphans, and I shall suffer for it throughout my
life. At the age of seven I and my introduction to learning were
turned over to a gloomy school far out in the country. . . . The
thousand games that are supposed to enliven childhood and adolescence
could not make me forget how painful mine were. It is to this
schooling that my character owes its inner melancholy and that fear of
social contact that today inhibits even my slightest impulses. . . .20
And yet he would have liked to be surrounded, enclosed. He did not
like to be abandoned. When school vacations came, all the other boys
went home; alone—note that word alone—he remained in the big empty
white school. . . .  Oh, those tears of a child who had no one to wipe
them. . . . He will never forget that he was apprenticed so young to
loneliness. . . . A cloistered existence, a withdrawn, secluded
existence in which I learned too soon to meditate and to reﬂect. A
solitary life that in the end was profoundly moved by triﬂes—it has
made me hypersensitive within myself, incapable of externalizing my
joys or my sorrows, so that I reject everything that I love and I turn
my back in spite of myself on everything that attracts me.21
What is going on here? Two processes. I do not want to be loved. Why
not? Because once, very long ago, I attempted an object relation and I
was abandoned. I have never forgiven my mother. Because I was
abandoned, I will make someone else suffer, and desertion by me will
be the direct expression of my need for revenge. I will go to Africa:
I do not wish to be loved and I will flee from love-objects. That,
Germaine Guex says, is called “putting 20. Ibid., p. 227.  21. Ibid.,
p. 228.
oneself to the proof in order to prove something.” I do not wish to be
loved, I adopt a defensive position. And if the love-object insists, I
will say plainly, “I do not wish to be loved.” Devaluation of self?
Indeed yes.  This lack of esteem of self as an object worthy of love
has grave consequences. For one thing, it keeps the individual in a
state of profound inner insecurity, as a result of which it inhibits
or falsiﬁes every relation with others. It is as something that has
the right to arouse sympathy or love that the individual is uncertain
of himself. The lack of affective self-valuation is to be found only
in persons who in their early childhood suffered from a lack of love
and understanding.22
Jean Veneuse would like to be a man like the rest, but he knows that
this position is a false one. He is a beggar. He looks for
appeasement, for permission in the white man’s eyes. For to him there
is “The Other.”  Affective self-rejection invariably brings the
abandonment-neurotic to an extremely painful and obsessive feeling of
exclusion, of having no place anywhere, of being superﬂuous everywhere
in an affective sense. . . . “I am The Other” is an expression that I
have heard time and again in the language of the
abandonment-neurotic. To be “The Other” is to feel that one is always
in a shaky position, to be always on guard, ready to be rejected and
. . . unconsciously doing everything needed to bring about exactly
this catastrophe.  It would be impossible to overestimate the
intensity of the suffering that accompanies such desertion states, a
suffering that in one way is connected to the ﬁrst experiences of
rejection in childhood and that brings them back in all their
strength. . . .23
The abandonment-neurotic demands proofs. He is not satisfied with
isolated statements. He has no confidence. Before he forms an
objective relation, he exacts repeated proofs from his partner.  The
essence of his attitude is “not to love in order to avoid being
abandoned.” The abandonment-neurotic is insatiable. That is
22. Guex, op. cit., pp. 31–32.  23. Ibid., pp. 35–36.
because he claims the right to constant amends. He wants to be loved
completely, absolutely and forever. Listen: My dearest Jean, I got
your letter of last July only today. It is completely mad. Why torture
me this way? You—are you aware of the fact?—you are incomparably
cruel.  You give me happiness mixed with anxiety. You make me the
happiest and at the same time the unhappiest of women. How many times
shall I have to tell you that I love you, that I belong to you, that I
am waiting for you? Come.24
The abandonment-neurotic has finally deserted. He is called back. He
is needed. He is loved. And yet what fantasies! Does she really love
me? Does she look at me objectively?  “One day a man came, a great
friend of Daddy Ned who had never seen Pontaponte. He came from
Bordeaux. But good God, he was dirty! God, how ugly he was, this man
who was such a good friend of Daddy Ned! He had a hideous black face,
completely black, which showed that he must not wash very often.”25
Looking eagerly for external reasons for his Cinderella complex, Jean
Veneuse projects the entire arsenal of racial stereotypes onto a child
of three or four years. And to Andrée he says, “Tell me, Andrée
darling . . . in spite of my color, would you agree to marry me if I
asked you?”26 He is frightfully full of doubt. Here is Germaine Guex
on that subject: The ﬁrst characteristic seems to be the dread of
showing oneself as one actually is. This is a broad ﬁeld of various
fears: fear of disappointing, fear of displeasing, of boring, of
wearying . . . and consequently of losing the chance to create a bond
of sympathy with others or if this bond does exist of doing damage to
it. The abandonment-neurotic doubts whether he can be loved as he is,
for he has had the cruel experience of being abandoned when he offered
himself to the tenderness of others as a little child and hence
without artiﬁce.27
24.  Maran, op. cit, pp. 203–204.  25.  Ibid., pp. 84–85.  26.  Ibid.,
pp. 247–248.  27.  Guex, op. cit., p. 39.
Jean Veneuse does not, however, lead a life devoid of
compensations. He flirts with art. His reading list is impressive, his
essay on Suarès is quite perceptive. That too is analyzed by Germaine
Guex: “Imprisoned in himself, locked into his artificial reserve, the
negative-aggressive feeds his feeling of irreparable loss with
everything that he continues to lose or that his passivity makes him
lack. . . . Therefore, with the exception of such privileged sectors
as his intellectual life or his profession,28 he cherishes a
deep-seated feeling of worthlessness.”29 Where does this analysis lead
us? To nothing short of proving to Jean Veneuse that in fact he is not
like the rest. Making people ashamed of their existence, Jean-Paul
Sartre said. Yes: teaching them to become aware of the potentials they
have forbidden themselves, of the passivity they have paraded in just
those situations in which what is needed is to hold oneself, like a
sliver, to the heart of the world, to interrupt if necessary the
rhythm of the world, to upset, if necessary, the chain of command, but
in any case, and most assuredly, to stand up to the world.  Jean
Veneuse is the crusader of the inner life. When he sees Andrée again,
when he is face to face with this woman whom he has wanted for months
and months, he takes refuge in silence, the eloquent silence of those
who “know the artificiality of words and acts.”  Jean Veneuse is a
neurotic, and his color is only an attempt to explain his psychic
structure. If this objective difference had not existed, he would have
manufactured it out of nothing.  Jean Veneuse is one of those
intellectuals who try to take a position solely on the level of
ideas. Incapable of realizing any concrete contact with his fellow
man. Is he treated decently, kindly, humanly? Only because he has
stumbled on some servant secrets.  He “knows those people,” and he is
on guard against them. “My vigilance, if one can call it that, is a
safety-catch. Politely and artlessly I welcome the advances that are
made to me. I accept and repay the drinks that are bought for me, I
take part in the little social games that are played on deck, but I do
not allow 28. My italics—F.F.  29. Guex, op. cit., p. 44.
myself to be taken in by the good will shown me, suspicious as I am of
this excessive cordiality that has rather too quickly taken the place
of the hostility in the midst of which they formerly tried to isolate
me.”30 He accepts the drinks, but he buys others in return. He does
not wish to be obligated to anyone. For if he does not buy back, he is
a nigger, as ungrateful as all the others.  Is someone mean? It is
simply because he is a nigger. For it is impossible not to despise
him. Well, it is clear to me that Jean Veneuse, alias René Maran, is
neither more nor less than a black abandonment-neurotic. And he is put
back into his place, his proper place. He is a neurotic who needs to
be emancipated from his infantile fantasies. And I contend that Jean
Veneuse represents not an example of black-white relations, but a
certain mode of behavior in a neurotic who by coincidence is black. So
the purpose of our study becomes more precise: to enable the man of
color to understand, through specific examples, the psychological
elements that can alienate his fellow Negroes. I will emphasize this
further in the chapter devoted to phenomenological description, but
let us remember that our purpose is to make possible a healthy
encounter between black and white.  Jean Veneuse is ugly. He is
black. What more is needed? If one rereads the various observations of
Germaine Guex, one will be convinced by the evidence: Un homme pareil
aux autres is a sham, an attempt to make the relations between two
races dependent on an organic unhealthiness. There can be no argument:
In the domain of psychoanalysis as in that of philosophy, the organic,
or constitutional, is a myth only for him who can go beyond it. If
from a heuristic point of view one must totally deny the existence of
the organic, the fact remains, and we can do nothing about it, that
some individuals make every effort to fit into pre-established
categories. Or, rather, yes, we can do something about it.  Earlier I
referred to Jacques Lacan; it was not by accident. In his thesis,
presented in 1932, he violently attacked the idea of the
constitutional. Apparently I am departing from his conclusions,
30. Maran, op. cit., p. 103.
but my dissent will be understood when one recalls that for the idea
of the constitutional as it is understood by the French school I am
substituting that of structure—“embracing unconscious psychic life, as
we are able to know it in part, especially in the form of repression
and inhibition, insofar as these elements take an active part in the
organization peculiar to each psychic individuality.”3l As we have
seen, on examination Jean Veneuse displays the structure of an
abandonment-neurotic of the negative-aggressive type. One can attempt
to explain this reactionally—that is, through the interaction of
person and environment—and prescribe, for example, a new environment,
“a change of air.” It will properly be observed that in this case the
structure has remained constant.  The change of air that Jean Veneuse
prescribed for himself was not undertaken in order to find himself as
a man; he did not have as his purpose the formulation of a healthy
outlook on the world; he had no striving toward the productiveness
that is characteristic of psychosocial equilibrium, but sought rather
to corroborate his externalizing neurosis.  The neurotic structure of
an individual is simply the elaboration, the formation, the eruption
within the ego, of conflictual clusters arising in part out of the
environment and in part out of the purely personal way in which that
individual reacts to these influences.  Just as there was a touch of
fraud in trying to deduce from the behavior of Nini and Mayotte
Capécia a general law of the behavior of the black woman with the
white man, there would be a similar lack of objectivity, I believe, in
trying to extend the attitude of Veneuse to the man of color as
such. And I should like to think that I have discouraged any endeavors
to connect the defeats of Jean Veneuse with the greater or lesser
concentration of melanin in his epidermis.  This sexual myth—the quest
for white flesh—perpetuated by alienated psyches, must no longer be
allowed to impede active understanding.  In no way should my color be
regarded as a flaw. From the moment the Negro accepts the separation
imposed by the
31. Guex, op. cit., p. 54.
European he has no further respite, and “is it not understand- able
that thenceforward he will try to elevate himself to the white man’s
level? To elevate himself in the range of colors to which he
attributes a kind of hierarchy?”32 We shall see that another solution
is possible. It implies a restructuring of the world.
32. Claude Nordey, L’homme de couleur (Paris, Collection “Présences,”
Plon, 1939).
THE SO-CALLED DEPENDENCY
In the whole world no poor devil is lynched, no wretch is tortured, in
whom I too am not degraded and murdered.  —Aimé Césaire, Et les chiens
se taisent
When I embarked on this study, only a few essays by Mannoni, published
in a magazine called Psyché, were available to me. I was thinking of
writing to M. Mannoni to ask about the conclusions to which his
investigations had led him. Later I learned that he had gathered his
reflections in a forthcoming book. It has now been published: Prospero
and Caliban: Psychology of Colonization.  Let us examine it.  Before
going into details, I should like to say that its analytic thought is
honest. Having lived under the extreme ambivalence inherent in the
colonial situation, M. Mannoni has managed to achieve a
grasp—unfortunately too exhaustive—of the psychological phenomena that
govern the relations between the colonized and the colonizer.  The
basic characteristic of current psychological research seems to be the
achievement of a certain exhaustiveness. But one should not lose sight
of the real.  I propose to show that, although he has devoted 225
pages to the study of the colonial situation, M. Mannoni has not
understood its real coordinates.  When one approaches a problem as
important as that of taking inventory of the possibilities for
understanding between two different peoples, one should be doubly
careful.
Mr. Mannoni deserves our thanks for having introduced into the
procedure two elements whose importance can never again escape anyone.
A quick analysis had seemed to avoid subjectivity in this field.
M. Mannoni’s study is sincere in purpose, for it proposes to prove the
impossibility of explaining man outside the limits of his capacity for
accepting or denying a given situation. Thus the problem of
colonialism includes not only the interrelations of objective
historical conditions but also human attitudes toward these
conditions.  Similarly, I can subscribe to that part of M. Mannoni’s
work that tends to present the pathology of the conflict—that is, to
show that the white colonial is motivated only by his desire to put an
end to a feeling of unsatisfaction, on the level of Adlerian
overcompensation.  At the same time, I find myself opposing him when I
read a sentence like this: “The fact that when an adult Malagasy is
isolated in a different environment he can become susceptible to the
classical type of inferiority complex proves almost beyond doubt that
the germ of the complex was latent in him from childhood.”1 In reading
this one feels something turn upside down, and the author’s
“objectivity” threatens to lead one into error.  Nevertheless, I have
tried zealously to retrace his line of orientation, the fundamental
theme of his book: “The central idea is that the confrontation of
‘civilized’ and ‘primitive’ men creates a special situation—the
colonial situation—and brings about the emergence of a mass of
illusions and misunderstandings that only a psychological analysis can
place and define.”2 Now, since this is M. Mannoni’s point of
departure, why does he try to make the inferiority complex something
that antedates colonization? Here one perceives the mechanism of
explanation that, in psychiatry, would give us this: There are latent
forms of psychosis that become overt as the result of a traumatic
experience.
1. [Dominique] O. Mannoni, Prospero and Caliban: The Psychology of
Colonization (New York, Praeger, 1964), p. 40.  2. My italics—F.F.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
Or, in somatic medicine, this: The appearance of varicose veins in a
patient does not arise out of his being compelled to spend ten hours a
day on his feet, but rather out of the constitutional weakness of his
vein walls; his working conditions are only a complicating factor. And
the insurance compensation expert to whom the case is submitted will
find the responsibility of the employer extremely limited.  Before
taking up M. Mannoni’s conclusions in detail, I should like to make my
position clear. Once and for all I will state this principle: A given
society is racist or it is not. Until all the evidence is available, a
great number of problems will have to be put aside.  Statements, for
example, that the north of France is more racist than the south, that
racism is the work of underlings and hence in no way involves the
ruling class, that France is one of the least racist countries in the
world are the product of men incapable of straight thinking.  In order
to show us that racism does not reflect an economic situation,
M. Mannoni reminds us that “in South Africa the white labourers are
quite as racialist as the employers and managers and very often a good
deal more so.”3 I hope I may be forgiven for asking that those who
take it on themselves to describe colonialism remember one thing: that
it is utopian to try to ascertain in what ways one kind of inhuman
behavior differs from another kind of inhuman behavior. I have no
desire to add to the problems of the world, but I should simply like
to ask M. Mannoni whether he does not think that for a Jew the
differences between the anti-Semitism of Maurras and that of Goebbels
are imperceptible.  After a presentation of The Respectful Prostitute
in North Africa, a general remarked to Sartre: “It would be a good
thing if your play could be put on in black Africa. It shows how much
happier the black man is on French soil than his fellow Negroes are in
America.”  I sincerely believe that a subjective experience can be
understood by others; and it would give me no pleasure to announce
that the
3. Mannoni, op. cit., p. 24.
black problem is my problem and mine alone and that it is up to me to
study it. But it does seem to me that M. Mannoni has not tried to feel
himself into the despair of the man of color confronting the white
man. In this work I have made it a point to convey the misery of the
black man. Physically and affectively. I have not wished to be
objective. Besides, that would be dishonest: It is not possible for me
to be objective.  Is there in truth any difference between one racism
and another?  Do not all of them show the same collapse, the same
bankruptcy of man?  M. Mannoni believes that the contempt of the poor
whites of South Africa for the Negro has nothing to do with economic
factors. Aside from the fact that this attitude can be understood
through the analogy of the anti-Semitic mentality—“Thus I would call
anti-Semitism a poor man’s snobbery. And in fact it would appear that
the rich for the most part exploit4 this passion for their own uses
rather than abandon themselves to it—they have better things to do. It
is propagated mainly among middle classes, because they possess
neither land nor house nor castle. . . . By treating the Jew as an
inferior and pernicious being, I affirm at the same time that I belong
to the elite.”5—We could point out to M. Mannoni that the displacement
of the white proletariat’s aggression on to the black proletariat is
fundamentally a result of the economic structure of South Africa.
What is South Africa? A boiler into which thirteen million blacks are
clubbed and penned in by two and a half million whites.  If the poor
whites hate the Negroes, it is not, as M. Mannoni would have us
believe, because “racialism is the work of petty officials, small
traders, and colonials who have toiled much without great success.”6
No; it is because the structure of South Africa is a racist structure:
Negrophilism and philanthropy are pejoratives in South Africa
. . . what is proposed is the separation of the natives from the
Europeans, territorially,
4. My italics—F.F.  5. Jean-Paul Sartre, Anti-Semite and Jew (New
York, Grove Press, 1960), pp. 26–27.  Originally, Réflexions sur la
question juive (Paris, Morihien, 1946).  6. Mannoni, op. cit., p. 24.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
economically, and on the political level, allowing the blacks to build
their own civilization under the guidance and the authority of the
whites, but with a minimum of contact between the races. It is
understood that territorial reservations would be set up for the
blacks and that most of them would have to live there.  . . . Economic
competition would be eliminated and the groundwork would be laid for
the rehabilitation of the “poor whites” who constitute 50 per cent of
the European population. . . .  It is no exaggeration to say that the
majority of South Africans feel an almost physical revulsion against
anything that puts a native or a person of color on their level.7
To conclude our consideration of M. Mannoni’s thesis, let us remember
that “economic exclusion results from, among other things, the fear of
competition and the desire both to protect the poor-white class that
forms half the European population and to prevent it from sinking any
lower.”  M. Mannoni adds: “Colonial exploitation is not the same as
other forms of exploitation, and colonial racialism is different from
other kinds of racialism. . . .”8 He speaks of phenomenology, of
psychoanalysis, of human brotherhood, but we should be happier if
these terms had taken on a more concrete quality for him. All forms of
exploitation resemble one another. They all seek the source of their
necessity in some edict of a Biblical nature. All forms of
exploitation are identical because all of them are applied against the
same “object”: man. When one tries to examine the structure of this or
that form of exploitation from an abstract point of view, one simply
turns one’s back on the major, basic problem, which is that of
restoring man to his proper place.  Colonial racism is no different
from any other racism. Anti- Semitism hits me head-on: I am enraged, I
am bled white by an appalling battle, I am deprived of the possibility
of being a man. I cannot disassociate myself from the future that is
proposed for my
7. R. P. Oswin, Magrath of the Dominican Monastery of St. Nicholas,
Stallenbosch, Republic of South Africa, L’homme de couleur, p. 140. My
italics—F.F.  8. Mannoni, op. cit., p. 27.
brother. Every one of my acts commits me as a man. Every one of my
silences, every one of my cowardices reveals me as a man.9 I feel that
I can still hear Césaire: When I turn on my radio, when I hear that
Negroes have been lynched in America, I say that we have been lied to:
Hitler is not dead; when I turn on my radio, when I learn that Jews
have been insulted, mistreated, persecuted, I say that we have been
lied to: Hitler is not dead; when, ﬁnally, I turn on my radio and hear
that in Africa forced labor has been inaugurated and legalized, I say
that we have certainly been lied to: Hitler is not dead.10
Yes, European civilization and its best representatives are
responsible for colonial racism11; and I come back once more to
Césaire:
9. When I wrote this I had in mind Jaspers’ concept of metaphysical
guilt: There exists among men, because they are men, a solidarity
through which each shares responsibility for every injustice and every
wrong committed in the world, and especially for crimes that-are
committed in his presence or of which he cannot be ignorant. If I do
not do whatever I can to prevent them, I am an accomplice in them. If
I have not risked my life in order to prevent the murder of other men,
if I have stood silent, I feel guilty in a sense that cannot in any
adequate fashion be understood juridically, or politically, or
morally. . . . That I am still alive after such things have been done
weighs on me as a guilt that cannot be expiated.  Somewhere in the
heart of human relations an absolute command imposes itself: In case
of criminal attack or of living conditions that threaten physical
being, accept life only for all together, otherwise not at all. (Karl
Jaspers, La culpabilité allemande, Jeanne Hersch’s French translation,
pp. 60–61.)  Jaspers declares that this obligation stems from God. It
is easy to see that God has no business here. Unless one chooses not
to state the obligation as the explicit human reality of feeling
oneself responsible for one’s fellow man. Responsible in the sense
that the least of my actions involves all mankind. Every action is an
answer or a question. Perhaps both. When I express a specific manner
in which my being can rise above itself, I am affirming the worth of
my action for others. Conversely, the passivity that is to be seen in
troubled periods of history is to be interpreted as a default on that
obligation. Jung, in Aspects du drame contemporain, says that,
confronted by an Asiatic or a Hindu, every European has equally to
answer for the crimes perpetrated by Nazi savagery. Another writer,
Mme. Maryse Choisy, in L’Anneau de Polycrate, was able to describe the
guilt of those who remained “neutral” during the occupation of
France. In a confused way they felt that they were responsible for all
the deaths and all the Buchenwalds.  10. Quoted from memory—Discours
politiques of the election campaign of 1945, Fort-de-France.
11. “European civilization and its best representatives are not, for
instance, responsible for colonial racialism; that is the work of
petty officials, small traders, and colonials who have toiled much
without great success” (Mannoni, p. 24).
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
And then, one lovely day, the middle class is brought up short by a
staggering blow: The Gestapos are busy again, the prisons are ﬁlling
up, the torturers are once more inventing, perfecting, consulting over
their workbenches.  People are astounded, they are angry. They say:
“How strange that is.  But then it is only Nazism, it won’t last.” And
they wait, and they hope; and they hide the truth from themselves: It
is savagery, the supreme savagery, it crowns, it epitomizes the
day-to-day savageries; yes, it is Nazism, but before they became its
victims, they were its accomplices; that Nazism they tolerated before
they succumbed to it, they exonerated it, they closed their eyes to
it, they legitimated it because until then it had been employed only
against non-European peoples; that Nazism they encouraged, they were
responsible for it, and it drips, it seeps, it wells from every crack
in western Christian civilization until it engulfs that civilization
in a bloody sea.12
Whenever I see an Arab with his hunted look, suspicious, on the run,
wrapped in those long ragged robes that seem to have been created
especially for him, I say to myself, “M. Mannoni was wrong.” Many
times I have been stopped in broad daylight by policemen who mistook
me for an Arab; when they discovered my origins, they were obsequious
in their apologies; “Of course we know that a Martinican is quite
different from an Arab.” I always protested violently, but I was
always told, “You don’t know them.” Indeed, M. Mannoni, you are
wrong. For what is the meaning of this sentence: “European
civilization and its best representatives are not responsible for
colonial racialism”?  What does it mean except that colonialism is the
business of adventurers and politicians, the “best representatives”
remaining well above the battle? But, Francis Jeanson says, every
citizen of a nation is responsible for the actions committed in the
name of that nation: Day after day, that system elaborates its evil
projects in your presence, day after day its leaders betray you,
pursuing, in the name of France, a policy as foreign as possible not
only to your real interests but also to your deepest needs. . . . You
pride yourselves on keeping your distance from realities of a certain
kind: so you allow a free hand to those who are immune to the most
12. Aimé Césaire, Discours sur le colonialisme (Paris, Présence
Africaine, 1956), pp. 14–15.
unhealthy climates because they create these climates themselves
through their own conduct. And if, apparently, you succeed in keeping
yourselves unsullied, it is because others dirty themselves in your
place. You hire thugs, and, balancing the accounts, it is you who are
the real criminals: for without you, without your blind indifference,
such men could never carry out deeds that damn you as much as they
shame those men.13
I said just above that South Africa has a racist structure. Now I
shall go farther and say that Europe has a racist structure. It is
plain to see that M. Mannoni has no interest in this problem, for he
says, “France is unquestionably one of the least racialist- minded
countries in the world.”14 Be glad that you are French, my fine Negro
friends, even if it is a little hard, for your counterparts in America
are much worse off than you. . . . France is a racist country, for the
myth of the bad nigger is part of the collective unconscious. We shall
demonstrate this presently (Chapter Six).  But let us proceed with
M. Mannoni: “In practice, therefore, an inferiority complex connected
with the colour of the skin is found only among those who form a
minority within a group of another colour. In a fairly homogeneous
community like that of the Malagasies, where the social framework is
still fairly strong, an inferiority complex occurs only in very
exceptional cases.”15 Once again one asks the author to be somewhat
more careful. A white man in a colony has never felt inferior in any
respect; as M.  Mannoni expresses it so well, “He will be deified or
devoured.”  The colonial, even though he is “in the minority,” does
not feel that this makes him inferior. In Martinique there are two
hundred whites who consider themselves superior to 300,000 people of
color. In South Africa there are two million whites against almost
thirteen million native people, and it has never occurred to a single
black to consider himself superior to a member of the white minority.
While the discoveries of Adler and the no less interesting findings of
Kuenkel explain certain kinds of neurotic behavior, one 13. Francis
Jeanson, “Cette Algérie conquise et pacifiée . . . ,” in Esprit,
April, 1950, p. 624.  14. Mannoni, op. cit., p. 110.  15. Ibid.,
p. 39.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
cannot infer from them laws that would apply to immeasurably complex
problems. The feeling of inferiority of the colonized is the
correlative to the European’s feeling of superiority. Let us have the
courage to say it outright: It is the racist who creates his inferior.
This conclusion brings us back to Sartre: “The Jew is one whom other
men consider a Jew: that is the simple truth from which we must
start. . . . It is the anti-Semite who makes the Jew.”16 What becomes
of the exceptional cases of which M. Mannoni tells us? Quite simply,
they are the instances in which the educated Negro suddenly discovers
that he is rejected by a civilization which he has none the less
assimilated. So that the conclusion would come to this: To the extent
to which M. Mannoni’s real typical Malagasy takes on “dependent
behavior,” all is for the best; if, however, he forgets his place, if
he takes it into his head to be the equal of the European, then the
said European is indignant and casts out the upstart—who, in such
circumstance, in this “exceptional case,” pays for his own rejection
of dependence with an inferiority complex.  Earlier, we uncovered in
certain of M. Mannoni’s statements a mistake that is at the very least
dangerous. In effect, he leaves the Malagasy no choice save between
inferiority and dependence.  These two solutions excepted, there is no
salvation. “When he [the Malagasy] has succeeded in forming such
relations [of dependence] with his superiors, his inferiority no
longer troubles him: everything is all right. When he fails to
establish them, when his feeling of insecurity is not assuaged in this
way, he suffers a crisis.”17 The primary concern of M. Mannoni was to
criticize the methods hitherto employed by the various ethnographers
who had turned their attention to primitive peoples. But we see the
criticism that must be made of his own work.  After having sealed the
Malagasy into his own customs, after having evolved a unilateral
analysis of his view of the world, after having described the Malagasy
within a closed circle, after 16. Sartre, Anti-Semite, p. 69.
17. Mannoni, op. cit., pp. 61–62.
having noted that the Malagasy has a dependency relation toward his
ancestors—a strong tribal characteristic—M. Mannoni, in defiance of
all objectivity, applies his conclusions to a bilateral
totality—deliberately ignoring the fact that, since Galliéni,18 the
Malagasy has ceased to exist.  What we wanted from M. Mannoni was an
explanation of the colonial situation. He notably overlooked providing
it. Nothing has been lost, nothing has been gained, we
agree. Parodying Hegel, Georges Balandier said of the dynamics of the
personality, in an essay19 devoted to Kardiner and Linton: “The last
of its stages is the result of all its preceding stages and should
contain all their elements.” It is whimsical, but it is the principle
that guides many scholars. The reactions and the behavior patterns to
which the arrival of the European in Madagascar gave rise were not
tacked on to a pre-existing set. There was no addition to the earlier
psychic whole. If, for instance, Martians undertook to colonize the
earth men—not to initiate them into Martian culture but to colonize
them—we should be doubtful of the persistence of any earth
personality. Kardiner changed many opinions when he wrote: “To teach
Christianity to the people of Alor would be a quixotic
undertaking. . . . [It] would make no sense inasmuch as one would be
dealing with personalities built out of elements that are in complete
disaccord with Christian doctrine: It would certainly be starting out
at the wrong end.”20 And if Negroes are impervious to the teachings of
Christ, this is not at all because they are incapable of assimilating
them. To understand something new requires that we make ourselves
ready for it, that we prepare ourselves for it; it entails the shaping
of a new form. It is Utopian to expect the Negro or the Arab to
18. General Joseph-Simon Galliéni, “the hero of the Marne,” played a
major part in French colonial expansion. After his conquests in Africa
and his service on Martinique, he was appointed resident-general of
Madagascar in 1896, when it was made a French colony, and he later
became governor-general. According to the Encyclopaedia Britannica
(fourteenth edition), “He completed the subjugation of the island,
which was in revolt against the French. . . . His policy was directed
to the development of the economic resources of the island and was
conciliatory toward the non-French European population.” (Translator’s
note.)  19. “Où l’ethnologie retrouve 1’unité de l’homme,” in Esprit,
April, 1950.  20. Quoted by Georges Balandier, ibid., p. 610.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
exert the effort of embedding abstract values into his outlook on the
world when he has barely enough food to keep alive. To ask a Negro of
the Upper Niger to wear shoes, to say of him that he will never be a
Schubert, is no less ridiculous than to be surprised that a worker in
the Berliet truck factory does not spend his evenings studying
lyricism in Hindu literature or to say that he will never be an
Einstein.  Actually, in the absolute sense, nothing stands in the way
of such things. Nothing—except that the people in question lack the
opportunities.  But they do not complain! Here is the proof: At the
hour before dawn, on the far side of my father and my mother, the
whole hut cracking and blistered, like a sinner punished with boils,
and the weather-worn roof patched here and there with pieces of
gasoline tins, and this leaves bogs of rust in the dirty gray stinking
mud that holds the straw together, and, when the wind blows, all this
patchwork makes strange sounds, ﬁrst like something sizzling in a
frying pan and then like a ﬂaming board hurled into water in a shower
of ﬂying sparks. And the bed of planks from which my race has risen,
all my race from this bed of planks on its feet of kerosene cases, as
if the old bed had elephantiasis, covered with a goat skin, and its
dried banana leaves and its rags, the ghost of a mattress that is my
grandmother’s bed (above the bed in a pot full of oil a candle-end
whose ﬂame looks like a fat turnip, and on the side of the pot, in
letters of gold: MERCI).21
Wretchedly, this attitude, this behavior, this shackled life caught in
the noose of shame and disaster rebels, hates itself, struggles,
howls, and, my God, others ask: “What can you do about it?”  “Start
something!”  “Start what?”  “The only thing in the world that’s worth
the effort of starting: The end of the world, by God!”22
21. Aimé Césaire, Cahier d’un retour au pays natal (Paris, Présence
Africaine, 1956), p. 56.  22. Ibid.
What M. Mannoni has forgotten is that the Malagasy alone no longer
exists; he has forgotten that the Malagasy exists with the
European. The arrival of the white man in Madagascar shattered not
only its horizons but its psychological mechanisms.  As everyone has
pointed out, alterity for the black man is not the black but the white
man. An island like Madagascar, invaded overnight by “pioneers of
civilization,” even if those pioneers conducted themselves as well as
they knew how, suffered the loss of its basic structure. M. Mannoni
himself, furthermore, says as much: “The petty kings were all very
anxious to get possession of a white man.”23 Explain that as one may
in terms of magical- totemic patterns, of a need for contact with an
awesome God, of its proof of a system of dependency, the fact still
remains that something new had come into being on that island and that
it had to be reckoned with—otherwise the analysis is condemned to
falsehood, to absurdity, to nullity. A new element having been
introduced, it became mandatory to seek to understand the new
relationships.  The landing of the white man on Madagascar inflicted
injury without measure. The consequences of that irruption of
Europeans onto Madagascar were not psychological alone, since, as
every authority has observed, there are inner relationships between
consciousness and the social context.  And the economic consequences?
Why, colonization itself must be brought to trial!  Let us go on with
our study.  In other words, the Malagasy can bear not being a white
man; what hurts him cruelly is to have discovered ﬁrst (by
identiﬁcation) that he is a man and later that men are divided into
whites and blacks. If the “abandoned” or “betrayed” Malagasy continues
his identiﬁcation, he becomes clamorous; he begins to demand equality
in a way he had never before found necessary.  The equality he seeks
would have been beneﬁcial before he started asking for it, but
afterwards it proves inadequate to remedy his ills—for every increase
in equality makes the remaining differences seem the more intolerable,
for they suddenly appear agonizingly irremovable. This is the
23. Mannoni, op. cit., p. 80.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
road along which [the Malagasy] passes from psychological dependence
to psychological inferiority.24
Here again we encounter the same misapprehension. It is of course
obvious that the Malagasy can perfectly well tolerate the fact of not
being a white man. A Malagasy is a Malagasy; or, rather, no, not he is
a Malagasy but, rather, in an absolute sense he “lives” his
Malagasyhood. If he is a Malagasy, it is because the white man has
come, and if at a certain stage he has been led to ask himself whether
he is indeed a man, it is because his reality as a man has been
challenged. In other words, I begin to suffer from not being a white
man to the degree that the white man imposes discrimination on me,
makes me a colonized native, robs me of all worth, all individuality,
tells me that I am a parasite on the world, that I must bring myself
as quickly as possible into step with the white world, “that I am a
brute beast, that my people and I are like a walking dung-heap that
disgustingly fertilizes sweet sugar cane and silky cotton, that I have
no use in the world.”25 Then I will quite simply try to make myself
white: that is, I will compel the white man to acknowledge that I am
human. But, M.  Mannoni will counter, you cannot do it, because in
your depths there is a dependency complex.  “Not all peoples can be
colonized; only those who experience this need [for dependency].” And,
a little later: “Wherever Europeans have founded colonies of the type
we are considering, it can safely be said that their coming was
unconsciously expected— even desired—by the future subject
peoples. Everywhere there existed legends foretelling the arrival of
strangers from the sea, bearing wondrous gifts with them.”26 It
becomes obvious that the white man acts in obedience to an authority
complex, a leadership complex, while the Malagasy obeys a dependency
complex.  Everyone is satisfied.  When the question arises of
understanding why the European, the foreigner, was called vazaha,
which means honorable stranger;
24. Ibid., p. 84.  25. Césaire, Cahier d’un retour.  26. Mannoni,
op. cit., pp. 85–86.
when it is a matter of understanding why shipwrecked Europeans were
welcomed with open arms; why the European, the foreigner, was never
thought of as an enemy, instead of explaining these things in terms of
humanity, of good will, of courtesy, basic char- acteristics of what
Césaire calls “the old courtly civilizations,” scholars tell us that
it happened quite simply because, inscribed in “fateful
hieroglyphics”—specifically, the unconscious—there exists something
that makes the white man the awaited master.  Yes, the unconscious—we
have got to that. But one must not extrapolate. A Negro tells me his
dream: “I had been walking for a long time, I was extremely exhausted,
I had the impression that something was waiting for me, I climbed
barricades and walls, I came into an empty hall, and from behind a
door I heard noise.  I hesitated before I went in, but finally I made
up my mind and opened the door. In this second room there were white
men, and I found that I too was white.” When I try to understand this
dream, to analyze it, knowing that my friend has had problems in his
career, I conclude that this dream fulfills an unconscious wish. But
when, outside my psychoanalytic office, I have to incorporate my
conclusions into the context of the world, I will assert: 1. My
patient is suffering from an inferiority complex. His psychic
structure is in danger of disintegration. What has to be done is to
save him from this and, little by little, to rid him of this
unconscious desire.  2. If he is overwhelmed to such a degree by the
wish to be white, it is because he lives in a society that makes his
inferiority complex possible, in a society that derives its stability
from the perpetuation of this complex, in a society that proclaims the
superiority of one race; to the identical degree to which that society
creates difficulties for him, he will find himself thrust into a
neurotic situation.  What emerges then is the need for combined action
on the individual and on the group. As a psychoanalyst, I should help
my patient to become conscious of his unconscious and abandon his
attempts at a hallucinatory whitening, but also to act in the
direction of a change in the social structure.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
In other words, the black man should no longer be confronted by the
dilemma, turn white or disappear; but he should be able to take
cognizance of a possibility of existence. In still other words, if
society makes difficulties for him because of his color, if in his
dreams I establish the expression of an unconscious desire to change
color, my objective will not be that of dissuading him from it by
advising him to “keep his place”; on the contrary, my objective, once
his motivations have been brought into consciousness, will be to put
him in a position to choose action (or passivity) with respect to the
real source of the conflict—that is, toward the social structures.
Conscientious in his desire to examine the problem from every angle,
M. Mannoni has not overlooked the investigation of the unconscious of
the Malagasy. To this end he analyzes seven dreams: seven narratives
that open the unconscious to us, and in six of them we find a dominant
theme of terror. Six children and an adult tell us their dreams, and
we see them trembling, seeking flight, unhappy.  The cook’s dream. “I
was being chased by an angry black27 bull. Terriﬁed, I climbed up into
a tree and stayed there till the danger was past. I came down again,
trembling all over.” . . .  Dream of a thirteen-year-old boy,
Rahevi. “While going for a walk in the woods, I met two black28
men. ‘Oh,’ I thought, ‘I am done for!’ I tried to run away but
couldn’t. They barred my way and began jabbering in a strange
tongue. I thought they were saying, ‘We’ll show you what death is.’  I
shivered with fright and begged, ‘Please, Sirs, let me go, I’m so
frightened.’  One of them understood French but in spite of that they
said, ‘We arc going to take you to our chief.’ As we set off they made
me go in front and they showed me their riﬂes. I was more frightened
than ever, but before reaching their camp we had to cross a river. I
dived deep into the water and thanks to my presence of mind found a
rocky cave where I hid. When the two men had gone I ran back to my
parents’ house.” . . .  Josette’s dream. The dreamer, a young girl,
got lost and sat down on a fallen tree-trunk. A woman in a white dress
told her that she was in the
27. My italics—F.F.  28. My italics—F.F.
midst of a band of robbers. The account goes on: “ ‘I am a
schoolgirl,’ I said, trembling, ‘and I lost my way here when I was
going home from school,’ and she replied: ‘Follow this path, child,
and you will ﬁnd your way home.’”. . .  Dream of a fourteen-year-old
boy, Razafi. He is being chased by (Senegalese) soldiers who “make a
noise like galloping horses as they run,” and “show their riﬂes in
front of them.” The dreamer escapes by becoming invisible; he climbs a
stairway and ﬁnds the door of his home. . . .  Dream of Elphine, a
girl of thirteen or fourteen. “I dreamed that a ﬁerce black29 ox was
chasing me. He was big and strong. On his head, which was almost
mottled (sic) with white he had two long horns with sharp points.  ‘Oh
how dreadful,’ I thought. The path was getting narrower. What should I
do? I perched myself in a mango tree, but the ox rent its trunk. Alas,
I fell among the bushes. Then he pressed his horns into me; my stomach
fell out and he devoured it.” . . .  Raza’s dream. In his dream the
boy heard someone say at school that the Senegalese were coming. “I
went out of the school yard to see.” The Senegalese were indeed
coming. He ran home. “But our house had been dispersed by them too.”
. . .  Dream of a fourteen-year-old boy, Si. “I was walking in the
garden and felt something like a shadow behind me. All around me the
leaves were rustling and falling off, as if a robber was in hiding
among them, waiting to catch me. Wherever I walked, up and down the
alleys, the shadow still followed me. Suddenly I got frightened and
started running, but the shadow took great strides and stretched out
his huge hand to take hold of my clothes. I felt my shirt tearing, and
screamed. My father jumped out of bed when he heard me scream and came
over to look at me, but the big shadow?30 had disappeared and I was no
longer afraid.”31
Some ten years ago I was astonished to learn that the North Africans
despised men of color. It was absolutely impossible for me to make any
contact with the local population. I left Africa and went back to
France without having fathomed the reason for this
hostility. Meanwhile, certain facts had made me think. The Frenchman
does not like the Jew, who does not like the Arab, who does not like
the Negro. . . . The Arab is told: “If you are 29. My italics—F.F.
30. My italics—F.F.  31. Mannoni, op. cit., pp. 89–92.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
poor, it is because the Jew has bled you and taken everything from
you.” The Jew is told: “You are not of the same class as the Arab
because you are really white and because you have Einstein and
Bergson.” The Negro is told: “You are the best soldiers in the French
Empire; the Arabs think they are better than you, but they are wrong.”
But that is not true; the Negro is told nothing because no one has
anything to tell him, the Senegalese trooper is a trooper,
the-good-soldier-under-command, the brave fellow-
who-only-knows-how-to-obey.  “You no come in.”  “Why not?”  “Me not
know. You no come in.”  Unable to stand up to all the demands, the
white man sloughs off his responsibilities. I have a name for this
procedure: the racial distribution of guilt.  I have remarked that
certain things surprised me. Whenever there has been any attempt at
insurrection, the military authorities have ordered only colored
soldiers into action. They were “men of color” who nullified the
liberation efforts of other “men of color,” proof that there was no
reason to universalize the procedure: If those good-for-nothings, the
Arabs, took it into their heads to revolt, it was not in the name of
any acceptable principle but purely and simply in order to get rid of
their “bicot” unconscious.  From the African point of view, a colored
student said at the 25th Congress of Catholic Students during its
discussion of Madagascar, “I wish to protest against the dispatch of
Senegalese troops there and the misuse that is being made of them.” We
know from other sources that one of the torturers in the Tananarive
police headquarters was a Senegalese. Therefore, since we know all
this, since we know what the archetype of the Senegalese can represent
for the Malagasy, the discoveries of Freud are of no use to us
here. What must be done is to restore this dream to its proper time,
and this time is the period during which eighty thousand natives were
killed—that is to say, one of every fifty persons in the population;
and to its proper place, and this place is an island of four million
people, at the center of which no real relationship can be
established, where dissension breaks out in every direction,
where the only masters are lies and demagogy.32 One must concede that
in some circumstances the socius is more important than the
individual. I recall what Pierre Naville wrote: To speak of society’s
dreams as one speaks of the dreams of the individual, to discuss
collective will to power as one discusses individual sexual drive, is
to reverse the natural order of things once more, because, on the
contrary, it is the economic and social conditions of class conﬂicts
that
32. We bring up in this connection the following testimony given at a
trial in Tananarive.  (Session of August 9. Rakotovao states:)
M. Baron said to me, “Since you refuse to accept what I just told you,
I’m sending you to the ‘thinking room.’ ...” I was led into the
adjoining chamber. The floor of the room in question was already
covered with water. There was a pail full of dirty water, not to
mention other things. M. Baron said to me, “Now you’ll learn to agree
to what I said you should declare.” He gave an order to a Senegalese
to “do the same to me as to the others.” The Senegalese made me kneel
with my wrists facing outward; then he took wooden tongs and squeezed
my hands together; then, with me kneeling and my two hands pressed
together, he put his foot on the back of my neck and forced my head
down into the bucket. Seeing that I was on the point of fainting, he
removed his foot so that I could get some air. And this was repeated
again and again until I was completely exhausted. Then M. Baron said,
“Take him away and beat him.” The Senegalese thereupon used a
bull-whip, but M. Baron came into the torture chamber and personally
took part in the whipping.  This went on for about fifteen minutes, I
think, after which I said that I couldn’t endure any more, because in
spite of my youth it was unbearable. Then he said, “In that case you
must agree to what I told you before!”  “No, Monsieur le directeur, it
is not true.”  Thereupon he sent me back into the first torture
chamber and called in another Senegalese, since one was not enough,
and he ordered them to hold me up by the feet and lower me into the
bucket as far as my chest. This they did several times.  Finally I
told them, “It’s too much! Let me talk to M. Baron,” and to him I
said, “I request at least that I be treated in a manner befitting
France, Monsieur le directeur,” to which he replied, “You’re getting
French treatment!”  Since I could stand no more, I said to him, “All
right, I’ll accept the first part of your statement.” M. Baron
replied, “No, I don’t want the first part, I want it all.” “Am I
supposed to lie, then?” “Lie or no lie, you must agree to what I tell
you. . . .”  (The testimony went on:) Immediately M. Baron said, “Try
some other method on him.” I was then taken back into the adjoining
room, where there was a small stone stairway. My arms were tied behind
me. The two Senegalese again held me with my feet in the air and made
me go up and down the stairs in this way. This was beginning to be
unendurable, and, even if I had had any moral strength left, it was
physically too much. I said to the Senegalese, “Tell your boss I’ll
agree to what he wants me to say.”  (In the session of August 11,
Robert, a defendant, testified:) The policeman took me by my shirt
collar and kicked me in the behind and punched me in the face. Then he
forced me to kneel, and M. Baron began hitting me again.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
explain and determine the real conditions in which individual
sexuality expresses itself, and because the content of a human being’s
dreams depends also, in the last analysis, on the general conditions
of the culture in which he lives.33
The enraged black bull is not the phallus. The two black men are not
the two father figures—the one standing for the real father, the other
for the primal ancestor. Here is what a thorough analysis could have
found, on the same basis of M. Mannoni’s conclusions in his section,
“The Cult of the Dead and the Family.”  The rifle of the Senegalese
soldier is not a penis but a genuine rifle, model Lebel 1916. The
black bull and the robber are not lolos—“reincarnated souls”—but
actually the irruption of real fantasies into sleep. What does this
stereotype, this central theme of the dreams, represent if not a
return to the right road? Sometimes we have black soldiers, sometimes
black bulls speckled with white at the head, sometimes, outright, a
white woman who is quite kind. What do we find in all these dreams if
not this central idea: “To depart from routine is to wander in
pathless woods; there you will meet the bull who will send you running
helter-skelter home again.”34 Settle down, Malagasies, and stay where
you belong.
Without my knowing how he managed it, he got behind me and I felt hot
irons against the back of my neck. I tried to protect myself with my
hands and they were burned too. . . .  The third time I was knocked
down I lost consciousness and I don’t know any more what
happened. M. Baron told me to sign a paper that was all ready; I shook
my head no; then the director called the Senegalese in again and he
half-carried me into another torture chamber. “You better give in or
you’ll be dead,” the Senegalese said. The director said, “That’s his
lookout, you have to get started, Jean.” My arms were tied behind my
back, I was forced down on my knees, and my head was pushed into a
bucket full of water. Just as I was about to suffocate I was pulled
out. Then they did the same thing over and over again until I passed
out completely. . . .  Let us recall, so that no one may plead
ignorance of the fact, that the witness Rakotovao was sentenced to
death.  So, when one reads such things, it certainly seems that
M. Mannoni allowed one aspect of the phenomena that he analyzes to
escape him: The black bull and the black men are neither more nor less
than the Senegalese police torturers.  33. Psychologie, Marxisme,
Matérialisme, 2nd ed. (Paris, Marcel Riviere, 1948), p. 151.
34. Mannoni, op. cit., p. 70.
After having described the Malagasy psychology, M. Mannoni takes it
upon himself to explain colonialism’s reason for existence.  In the
process he adds a new complex to the standing catalogue: the “Prospero
complex.” It is defined as the sum of those unconscious neurotic
tendencies that delineate at the same time the “picture” of the
paternalist colonial and the portrait of “the racialist whose daughter
has suffered an [imaginary] attempted rape at the hands of an inferior
being.”35 Prospero, as we know, is the main character of Shakespeare’s
comedy, The Tempest. Opposite him we have his daughter, Miranda, and
Caliban. Toward Caliban, Prospero assumes an attitude that is well
known to Americans in the southern United States. Are they not forever
saying that the niggers are just waiting for the chance to jump on
white women? In any case, what is interesting in this part of his book
is the intensity with which M.  Mannoni makes us feel the ill-resolved
conflicts that seem to be at the root of the colonial vocation. In
effect, he tells us: What the colonial in common with Prospero lacks,
is awareness of the world of Others, a world in which Others have to
be respected. This is the world from which the colonial has ﬂed
because he cannot accept men as they are. Rejection of that world is
combined with an urge to dominate, an urge which is infantile in
origin and which social adaptation has failed to discipline. The
reason the colonial himself gives for his ﬂight—whether he says it was
the desire to travel, or the desire to escape from the cradle or from
the “ancient parapets,” or whether he says that he simply wanted a
freer life—is of no consequence. . . . It is always a question of
compromising with the desire for a world without men.36
If one adds that many Europeans go to the colonies because it is
possible for them to grow rich quickly there, that with rare
exceptions the colonial is a merchant, or rather a trafficker, one
will have grasped the psychology of the man who arouses in the
autochthonous population “the feeling of inferiority.” As for the
Malagasy “dependency complex,” at least in the only
35. Ibid., p. 110.  36. Ibid., p. 108.
TH E SO - CA LLED D EPEND ENCY CO M
form in which we can reach it and analyze it, it too proceeds from the
arrival of white colonizers on the island. From its other form, from
this original complex in its pure state that supposedly characterized
the Malagasy mentality throughout the whole precolonial period, it
appears to me that M. Mannoni lacks the slightest basis on which to
ground any conclusion applicable to the situation, the problems, or
the potentialities of the Malagasy in the present time.
“Dirty nigger!” Or simply, “Look, a Negro!”  I came into the world
imbued with the will to find a meaning in things, my spirit filled
with the desire to attain to the source of the world, and then I found
that I was an object in the midst of other objects.  Sealed into that
crushing objecthood, I turned beseechingly to others. Their attention
was a liberation, running over my body suddenly abraded into nonbeing,
endowing me once more with an agility that I had thought lost, and by
taking me out of the world, restoring me to it. But just as I reached
the other side, I stumbled, and the movements, the attitudes, the
glances of the other fixed me there, in the sense in which a chemical
solution is fixed by a dye. I was indignant; I demanded an
explanation.  Nothing happened. I burst apart. Now the fragments have
been put together again by another self.  As long as the black man is
among his own, he will have no occasion, except in minor internal
conflicts, to experience his being through others. There is of course
the moment of “being for others,” of which Hegel speaks, but every
ontology is made unattainable in a colonized and civilized society. It
would seem that this fact has not been given sufficient attention by
those who have discussed the question. In the Weltanschauung of a
colonized people there is an impurity, a flaw that outlaws any
ontological explanation. Someone may object that this is the case with
every individual, but such an objection merely conceals a basic
problem.  Ontology—once it is finally admitted as leaving existence by
the wayside—does not permit us to understand the being of the black
man. For not only must the black man be black; he must be
black in relation to the white man. Some critics will take it on
themselves to remind us that this proposition has a converse. I say
that this is false. The black man has no ontological resistance in the
eyes of the white man. Overnight the Negro has been given two frames
of reference within which he has had to place himself. His
metaphysics, or, less pretentiously, his customs and the sources on
which they were based, were wiped out because they were in conflict
with a civilization that he did not know and that imposed itself on
him.  The black man among his own in the twentieth century does not
know at what moment his inferiority comes into being through the
other. Of course I have talked about the black problem with friends,
or, more rarely, with American Negroes. Together we protested, we
asserted the equality of all men in the world. In the Antilles there
was also that little gulf that exists among the almost-white, the
mulatto, and the nigger. But I was satisfied with an intellectual
understanding of these differences. It was not really dramatic. And
then. . . .  And then the occasion arose when I had to meet the white
man’s eyes. An unfamiliar weight burdened me. The real world
challenged my claims. In the white world the man of color encounters
difficulties in the development of his bodily schema.  Consciousness
of the body is solely a negating activity. It is a third- person
consciousness. The body is surrounded by an atmosphere of certain
uncertainty. I know that if I want to smoke, I shall have to reach out
my right arm and take the pack of cigarettes lying at the other end of
the table. The matches, however, are in the drawer on the left, and I
shall have to lean back slightly. And all these movements are made not
out of habit but out of implicit knowledge. A slow composition of my
self as a body in the middle of a spatial and temporal world—such
seems to be the schema. It does not impose itself on me; it is,
rather, a definitive structuring of the self and of the
world—definitive because it creates a real dialectic between my body
and the world.  For several years certain laboratories have been
trying to produce a serum for “denegrification”; with all the
earnestness in the world, laboratories have sterilized their test
tubes, checked their
scales, and embarked on researches that might make it possible for the
miserable Negro to whiten himself and thus to throw off the burden of
that corporeal malediction. Below the corporeal schema I had sketched
a historico-racial schema. The elements that I used had been provided
for me not by “residual sensations and perceptions primarily of a
tactile, vestibular, kinesthetic, and visual character,”1 but by the
other, the white man, who had woven me out of a thousand details,
anecdotes, stories. I thought that what I had in hand was to construct
a physiological self, to balance space, to localize sensations, and
here I was called on for more.  “Look, a Negro!” It was an external
stimulus that flicked over me as I passed by. I made a tight smile.
“Look, a Negro!” It was true. It amused me.  “Look, a Negro!” The
circle was drawing a bit tighter. I made no secret of my amusement.
“Mama, see the Negro! I’m frightened!” Frightened! Frightened!  Now
they were beginning to be afraid of me. I made up my mind to laugh
myself to tears, but laughter had become impossible.  I could no
longer laugh, because I already knew that there were legends, stories,
history, and above all historicity, which I had learned about from
Jaspers. Then, assailed at various points, the corporeal schema
crumbled, its place taken by a racial epidermal schema. In the train
it was no longer a question of being aware of my body in the third
person but in a triple person. In the train I was given not one but
two, three places. I had already stopped being amused. It was not that
I was finding febrile coordinates in the world. I existed triply: I
occupied space. I moved toward the other . . . and the evanescent
other, hostile but not opaque, transparent, not there,
disappeared. Nausea. . . .  I was responsible at the same time for my
body, for my race, for my ancestors. I subjected myself to an
objective examination, I discovered my blackness, my ethnic
characteristics; and I was battered down by tom-toms, cannibalism,
intellectual deficiency,
1. Jean Lhermitte, L’Image de notre corps (Paris, Nouvelle Revue
critique, 1939), p. 17.
fetichism, racial defects, slave-ships, and above all else, above all:
“Sho’ good eatin’.”  On that day, completely dislocated, unable to be
abroad with the other, the white man, who unmercifully imprisoned me,
I took myself far off from my own presence, far indeed, and made
myself an object. What else could it be for me but an amputation, an
excision, a hemorrhage that spattered my whole body with black blood?
But I did not want this revision, this thematization.  All I wanted
was to be a man among other men. I wanted to come lithe and young into
a world that was ours and to help to build it together.  But I
rejected all immunization of the emotions. I wanted to be a man,
nothing but a man. Some identified me with ancestors of mine who had
been enslaved or lynched: I decided to accept this.  It was on the
universal level of the intellect that I understood this inner
kinship—I was the grandson of slaves in exactly the same way in which
President Lebrun was the grandson of tax-paying, hard-working
peasants. In the main, the panic soon vanished.  In America, Negroes
are segregated. In South America, Negroes are whipped in the streets,
and Negro strikers are cut down by machine-guns. In West Africa, the
Negro is an animal. And there beside me, my neighbor in the
university, who was born in Algeria, told me: “As long as the Arab is
treated like a man, no solution is possible.”  “Understand, my dear
boy, color prejudice is something I find utterly foreign. . . . But of
course, come in, sir, there is no color prejudice among
us. . . . Quite, the Negro is a man like ourselves.  . . . It is not
because he is black that he is less intelligent than we are. . . . I
had a Senegalese buddy in the army who was really clever. . . .”
Where am I to be classified? Or, if you prefer, tucked away?  “A
Martinican, a native of ‘our’ old colonies.”  Where shall I hide?
“Look at the nigger! . . . Mama, a Negro! . . . Hell, he’s getting
mad. . . . Take no notice, sir, he does not know that you are as
civilized as we. . . .”
My body was given back to me sprawled out, distorted, recolored, clad
in mourning in that white winter day. The Negro is an animal, the
Negro is bad, the Negro is mean, the Negro is ugly; look, a nigger,
it’s cold, the nigger is shivering, the nigger is shivering because he
is cold, the little boy is trembling because he is afraid of the
nigger, the nigger is shivering with cold, that cold that goes through
your bones, the handsome little boy is trembling because he thinks
that the nigger is quivering with rage, the little white boy throws
himself into his mother’s arms: Mama, the nigger’s going to eat me up.
All round me the white man, above the sky tears at its navel, the
earth rasps under my feet, and there is a white song, a white
song. All this whiteness that burns me. . . .  I sit down at the fire
and I become aware of my uniform. I had not seen it. It is indeed
ugly. I stop there, for who can tell me what beauty is?  Where shall I
find shelter from now on? I felt an easily identifiable flood mounting
out of the countless facets of my being. I was about to be angry. The
fire was long since out, and once more the nigger was trembling.
“Look how handsome that Negro is! . . .”  “Kiss the handsome Negro’s
ass, madame!”  Shame flooded her face. At last I was set free from my
rumination. At the same time I accomplished two things: I identified
my enemies and I made a scene. A grand slam. Now one would be able to
laugh.  The field of battle having been marked out, I entered the
lists.  What? While I was forgetting, forgiving, and wanting only to
love, my message was flung back in my face like a slap. The white
world, the only honorable one, barred me from all participation. A man
was expected to behave like a man. I was expected to behave like a
black man—or at least like a nigger. I shouted a greeting to the world
and the world slashed away my joy. I was told to stay within bounds,
to go back where I belonged.  They would see, then! I had warned them,
anyway. Slavery?  It was no longer even mentioned, that unpleasant
memory. My
supposed inferiority? A hoax that it was better to laugh at. I forgot
it all, but only on condition that the world not protect itself
against me any longer. I had incisors to test. I was sure they were
strong. And besides. . . .  What! When it was I who had every reason
to hate, to despise, I was rejected? When I should have been begged,
implored, I was denied the slightest recognition? I resolved, since it
was impossible for me to get away from an inborn complex, to assert
myself as a BLACK MAN. Since the other hesitated to recognize me,
there remained only one solution: to make myself known.  In
Anti-Semite and Jew (p. 95), Sartre says: “They [the Jews] have
allowed themselves to be poisoned by the stereotype that others have
of them, and they live in fear that their acts will correspond to this
stereotype. . . . We may say that their conduct is perpetually
overdetermined from the inside.”  All the same, the Jew can be unknown
in his Jewishness. He is not wholly what he is. One hopes, one
waits. His actions, his behavior are the final determinant. He is a
white man, and, apart from some rather debatable characteristics, he
can sometimes go unnoticed. He belongs to the race of those who since
the beginning of time have never known cannibalism. What an idea, to
eat one’s father! Simple enough, one has only not to be a
nigger. Granted, the Jews are harassed—what am I thinking of? They are
hunted down, exterminated, cremated. But these are little family
quarrels.  The Jew is disliked from the moment he is tracked down. But
in my case everything takes on a new guise. I am given no chance. I am
overdetermined from without. I am the slave not of the “idea” that
others have of me but of my own appearance.  I move slowly in the
world, accustomed now to seek no longer for upheaval. I progress by
crawling. And already I am being dissected under white eyes, the only
real eyes. I am fixed. Having adjusted their microtomes, they
objectively cut away slices of my reality. I am laid bare. I feel, I
see in those white faces that it is not a new man who has come in, but
a new kind of man, a new genus. Why, it’s a Negro!  I slip into
corners, and my long antennae pick up the catch- phrases strewn over
the surface of things—nigger underwear
smells of nigger—nigger teeth are white—nigger feet are big—the
nigger’s barrel chest—I slip into corners, I remain silent, I strive
for anonymity, for invisibility. Look, I will accept the lot, as long
as no one notices me!  “Oh, I want you to meet my black
friend. . . . Aimé Césaire, a black man and a university
graduate. . . . Marian Anderson, the finest of Negro
singers. . . . Dr. Cobb, who invented white blood, is a
Negro. . . . Here, say hello to my friend from Martinique (be careful,
he’s extremely sensitive). . . .”  Shame. Shame and
self-contempt. Nausea. When people like me, they tell me it is in
spite of my color. When they dislike me, they point out that it is not
because of my color. Either way, I am locked into the infernal
circle. I turn away from these inspectors of the Ark before the Flood
and I attach myself to my brothers, Negroes like myself. To my horror,
they too reject me. They are almost white. And besides they are about
to marry white women.  They will have children faintly tinged with
brown. Who knows, perhaps little by little. . . .  I had been
dreaming.  “I want you to understand, sir, I am one of the best
friends the Negro has in Lyon.”  The evidence was there,
unalterable. My blackness was there, dark and unarguable. And it
tormented me, pursued me, disturbed me, angered me.  Negroes are
savages, brutes, illiterates. But in my own case I knew that these
statements were false. There was a myth of the Negro that had to be
destroyed at all costs. The time had long since passed when a Negro
priest was an occasion for wonder.  We had physicians, professors,
statesmen. Yes, but something out of the ordinary still clung to such
cases. “We have a Senegalese history teacher. He is quite
bright. . . . Our doctor is colored. He is very gentle.”  It was
always the Negro teacher, the Negro doctor; brittle as I was becoming,
I shivered at the slightest pretext. I knew, for instance, that if the
physician made a mistake it would be the end of him and of all those
who came after him. What could one expect, after all, from a Negro
physician? As long as everything
went well, he was praised to the skies, but look out, no nonsense,
under any conditions! The black physician can never be sure how close
he is to disgrace. I tell you, I was walled in: No exception was made
for my refined manners, or my knowledge of literature, or my
understanding of the quantum theory.  I requested, I demanded
explanations. Gently, in the tone that one uses with a child, they
introduced me to the existence of a certain view that was held by
certain people, but, I was always told, “We must hope that it will
very soon disappear.” What was it? Color prejudice.  It [colour
prejudice] is nothing more than the unreasoning hatred of one race for
another, the contempt of the stronger and richer peoples for those
whom they consider inferior to themselves, and the bitter resentment
of those who are kept in subjection and are so frequently insulted. As
colour is the most obvious outward manifestation of race it has been
made the criterion by which men are judged, irrespective of their
social or educational attainments. The light-skinned races have come
to despise all those of a darker colour, and the dark-skinned peoples
will no longer accept without protest the inferior position to which
they have been relegated.2
I had read it rightly. It was hate; I was hated, despised, detested,
not by the neighbor across the street or my cousin on my mother’s
side, but by an entire race. I was up against something unreasoned.
The psychoanalysts say that nothing is more traumatizing for the young
child than his encounters with what is rational. I would personally
say that for a man whose only weapon is reason there is nothing more
neurotic than contact with unreason.  I felt knife blades open within
me. I resolved to defend myself.  As a good tactician, I intended to
rationalize the world and to show the white man that he was mistaken.
In the Jew, Jean-Paul Sartre says, there is a sort of impassioned
imperialism of reason: for he wishes not only to convince others that
he is right; his goal is to persuade them that there is an absolute
and unconditioned value to rationalism. He feels himself to be a
missionary of the universal; against the universality of the Catholic
religion,
2. Sir Alan Burns, Colour Prejudice (London, Allen and Unwin, 1948),
p. 16.
from which he is excluded, he asserts the “catholicity” of the
rational, an instrument by which to attain to the truth and establish
a spiritual bond among men.3
And, the author adds, though there may be Jews who have made intuition
the basic category of their philosophy, their intuition has no
resemblance to the Pascalian subtlety of spirit, and it is this
latter—based on a thousand imperceptible perceptions—which to the Jew
seems his worst enemy. As for Bergson, his philosophy offers the
curious appearance of an anti-intellectualist doctrine constructed
entirely by the most rational and most critical of intelligences. It
is through argument that he establishes the existence of pure
duration, of philosophic intuition; and that very intuition which
discovers duration or life, is itself universal, since anyone may
practice it, and it leads toward the universal, since its objects can
be named and conceived.4
With enthusiasm I set to cataloguing and probing my surroundings. As
times changed, one had seen the Catholic religion at first justify and
then condemn slavery and prejudices. But by referring everything to
the idea of the dignity of man, one had ripped prejudice to
shreds. After much reluctance, the scientists had conceded that the
Negro was a human being; in vivo and in vitro the Negro had been
proved analogous to the white man: the same morphology, the same
histology. Reason was confident of victory on every level. I put all
the parts back together. But I had to change my tune.  That victory
played cat and mouse; it made a fool of me. As the other put it, when
I was present, it was not; when it was there, I was no longer. In the
abstract there was agreement: The Negro is a human being. That is to
say, amended the less firmly convinced, that like us he has his heart
on the left side. But on certain points the white man remained
intractable. Under no conditions did he wish any intimacy between the
races, for it is a truism that “crossings between widely different
races can lower the physical and mental level. . . . Until we have a
more definite knowledge
3. Anti-Semite and Jew (New York, Grove Press, 1960), pp. 112–113.
4. Ibid., p. 115.
of the effect of race-crossings we shall certainly do best to avoid
crossings between widely different races.”5 For my own part, I would
certainly know how to react. And in one sense, if I were asked for a
definition of myself, I would say that I am one who waits; I
investigate my surroundings, I interpret everything in terms of what I
discover, I become sensitive.  In the first chapter of the history
that the others have compiled for me, the foundation of cannibalism
has been made eminently plain in order that I may not lose sight of
it. My chromosomes were supposed to have a few thicker or thinner
genes representing cannibalism. In addition to the sex-linked, the
scholars had now discovered the racial-linked.6 What a shameful
science!  But I understand this “psychological mechanism.” For it is a
matter of common knowledge that the mechanism is only
psychological. Two centuries ago I was lost to humanity, I was a slave
forever. And then came men who said that it all had gone on far too
long. My tenaciousness did the rest; I was saved from the civilizing
deluge. I have gone forward.  Too late. Everything is anticipated,
thought out, demonstrated, made the most of. My trembling hands take
hold of nothing; the vein has been mined out. Too late! But once again
I want to understand.  Since the time when someone first mourned the
fact that he had arrived too late and everything had been said, a
nostalgia for the past has seemed to persist. Is this that lost
original paradise of which Otto Rank speaks? How many such men,
apparently rooted to the womb of the world, have devoted their lives
to studying the Delphic oracles or exhausted themselves in attempts to
plot the wanderings of Ulysses! The pan-spiritualists seek to prove
the existence of a soul in animals by using this argument: A dog lies
down on the grave of his master and starves to death there. We had to
wait for Janet to demonstrate that the aforesaid dog, in contrast to
man, simply lacked the capacity to liquidate
5. Jon Alfred Mjoen, “Harmonic and Disharmonic Race-crossings,” The
Second International Congress of Eugenics (1921), Eugenics in Race and
State, vol. II, p.  60, quoted in Sir Alan Burns, op. cit., p. 120.
6. In English in the original. (Translator’s note.)
the past. We speak of the glory of Greece, Artaud says; but, he adds,
if modern man can no longer understand the Choephoroi of Aeschylus, it
is Aeschylus who is to blame. It is tradition to which the
anti-Semites turn in order to ground the validity of their “point of
view.” It is tradition, it is that long historical past, it is that
blood relation between Pascal and Descartes, that is invoked when the
Jew is told, “There is no possibility of your finding a place in
society.” Not long ago, one of those good Frenchmen said in a train
where I was sitting: “Just let the real French virtues keep going and
the race is safe. Now more than ever, national union must be made a
reality. Let’s have an end of internal strife!  Let’s face up to the
foreigners (here he turned toward my corner) no matter who they are.”
It must be said in his defense that he stank of cheap wine; if he had
been capable of it, he would have told me that my emancipated-slave
blood could not possibly be stirred by the name of Villon or Taine.
An outrage!  The Jew and I: Since I was not satisfied to be
racialized, by a lucky turn of fate I was humanized. I joined the Jew,
my brother in misery.  An outrage!  At first thought it may seem
strange that the anti-Semite’s outlook should be related to that of
the Negrophobe. It was my philosophy professor, a native of the
Antilles, who recalled the fact to me one day: “Whenever you hear
anyone abuse the Jews, pay attention, because he is talking about
you.” And I found that he was universally right—by which I meant that
I was answerable in my body and in my heart for what was done to my
brother.  Later I realized that he meant, quite simply, an anti-Semite
is inevitably anti-Negro.  You come too late, much too late. There
will always be a world—a white world—between you and us. . . . The
other’s total inability to liquidate the past once and for all. In the
face of this affective ankylosis of the white man, it is
understandable that I could have made up my mind to utter my Negro
cry. Little by little, putting out pseudopodia here and there, I
secreted a race.
And that race staggered under the burden of a basic element. What was
it? Rhythm! Listen to our singer, Léopold Senghor: It is the thing
that is most perceptible and least material. It is the archetype of
the vital element. It is the ﬁrst condition and the hallmark of Art,
as breath is of life: breath, which accelerates or slows, which
becomes even or agitated according to the tension in the individual,
the degree and the nature of his emotion. This is rhythm in its
primordial purity, this is rhythm in the masterpieces of Negro art,
especially sculpture. It is composed of a theme—sculptural form—which
is set in opposition to a sister theme, as inhalation is to
exhalation, and that is repeated. It is not the kind of symmetry that
gives rise to monotony; rhythm is alive, it is free. . . . This is how
rhythm affects what is least intellectual in us, tyrannically, to make
us penetrate to the spirituality of the object; and that character of
abandon which is ours is itself rhythmic.7
Had I read that right? I read it again with redoubled attention.  From
the opposite end of the white world a magical Negro culture was
hailing me. Negro sculpture! I began to flush with pride. Was this our
salvation?  I had rationalized the world and the world had rejected me
on the basis of color prejudice. Since no agreement was possible on
the level of reason, I threw myself back toward unreason. It was up to
the white man to be more irrational than I. Out of the necessities of
my struggle I had chosen the method of regression, but the fact
remained that it was an unfamiliar weapon; here I am at home; I am
made of the irrational; I wade in the irrational. Up to the neck in
the irrational. And now how my voice vibrates!  Those who invented
neither gunpowder nor the compass Those who never learned to conquer
steam or electricity Those who never explored the seas or the skies
But they know the farthest corners of the land of anguish Those who
never knew any journey save that of abduction Those who learned to
kneel in docility Those who were domesticated and Christianized Those
who were injected with bastardy. . . .  7. “Ce que 1’homme noir
apporte,” in Claude Nordey, L’Homme de couleur (Paris, Plon, 1939),
pp. 309–310.
Yes, all those are my brothers—a “bitter brotherhood” imprisons all of
us alike. Having stated the minor thesis, I went overboard after
something else.  . . . But those without whom the earth would not be
the earth Tumescence all the more fruitful than the empty land still
more the land Storehouse to guard and ripen all on earth that is most
earth My blackness is no stone, its deafness hurled against the clamor
of the day My blackness is no drop of lifeless water on the dead eye
of the world My blackness is neither a tower nor a cathedral It
thrusts into the red ﬂesh of the sun It thrusts into the burning ﬂesh
of the sky It hollows through the dense dismay of its own pillar of
patience.8
Eyah! the tom-tom chatters out the cosmic message. Only the Negro has
the capacity to convey it, to decipher its meaning, its
import. Astride the world, my strong heels spurring into the flanks of
the world, I stare into the shoulders of the world as the celebrant
stares at the midpoint between the eyes of the sacrificial victim.
But they abandon themselves, possessed, to the essence of all things,
knowing nothing of externals but possessed by the movement of all
things uncaring to subdue but playing the play of the world truly the
eldest sons of the world open to all the breaths of the world
meeting-place of all the winds of the world undrained bed of all the
waters of the world
8. Aimé Césaire, Cahier d’un retour au pays natal (Paris, Présence
Africaine, 1956), pp. 77–78.
spark of the sacred ﬁre of the World ﬂesh of the ﬂesh of the world,
throbbing with the very movement of the world!9
Blood! Blood! . . . Birth! Ecstasy of becoming! Three-quarters
engulfed in the confusions of the day, I feel myself redden with
blood. The arteries of all the world, convulsed, torn away, uprooted,
have turned toward me and fed me.  “Blood! Blood! All our blood
stirred by the male heart of the sun.”10 Sacrifice was a middle point
between the creation and myself—now I went back no longer to sources
but to The Source.  Nevertheless, one had to distrust rhythm,
earth-mother love, this mystic, carnal marriage of the group and the
cosmos.  In La vie sexuelle en Afrique noire, a work rich in
perceptions, De Pédrals implies that always in Africa, no matter what
field is studied, it will have a certain magico-social structure. He
adds: All these are the elements that one ﬁnds again on a still
greater scale in the domain of secret societies. To the extent,
moreover, to which persons of either sex, subjected to circumcision
during adolescence, are bound under penalty of death not to reveal to
the uninitiated what they have experienced, and to the extent to which
initiation into a secret society always excites to acts of sacred
love, there is good ground to conclude by viewing both male and female
circumcision and the rites that they embellish as constitutive of
minor secret societies.11
I walk on white nails. Sheets of water threaten my soul on fire. Face
to face with these rites, I am doubly alert. Black magic!  Orgies,
witches’ sabbaths, heathen ceremonies, amulets. Coitus is an occasion
to call on the gods of the clan. It is a sacred act, pure, absolute,
bringing invisible forces into action. What is one to think of all
these manifestations, all these initiations, all these acts? From ever
direction I am assaulted by the obscenity of dances and of
words. Almost at my ear there is a song:
9. Ibid., p. 78.  10. Ibid., p. 79.  11. De Pédrals, La vie sexuelle
en Afrique noire (Paris, Payot), p. 83.
First our hearts burned hot Now they are cold All we think of now is
Love When we return to the village When we see the great phallus Ah
how then we will make Love For our parts will be dry and clean.12
The soil, which only a moment ago was still a tamed steed, begins to
revel. Are these virgins, these nymphomaniacs? Black Magic, primitive
mentality, animism, animal eroticism, it all floods over me. All of it
is typical of peoples that have not kept pace with the evolution of
the human race. Or, if one prefers, this is humanity at its
lowest. Having reached this point, I was long reluctant to commit
myself. Aggression was in the stars. I had to choose. What do I mean?
I had no choice. . . .  Yes, we are—we Negroes—backward, simple, free
in our behavior. That is because for us the body is not something
opposed to what you call the mind. We are in the world. And long live
the couple, Man and Earth! Besides, our men of letters helped me to
convince you; your white civilization overlooks subtle riches and
sensitivity. Listen:
Emotive sensitivity. Emotion is completely Negro as reason is Greek.13
Water rippled by every breeze? Unsheltered soul blown by every wind,
whose fruit often drops before it is ripe? Yes, in one way, the Negro
today is richer in gifts than in works.14 But the tree thrusts its
roots into the earth. The river runs deep, carrying precious
seeds. And, the Afro-American poet, Langston Hughes, says:
I have known rivers ancient dark rivers my soul has grown deep like
the deep rivers.
12. A. M. Vergiat, Les rites secrets des primitifs de l’Oubangui
(Paris, Payot, 1951), p. 113.  13. My italics—F.F.  14. My
italics—F.F.
The very nature of the Negro’s emotion, of his sensitivity,
furthermore, explains his attitude toward the object perceived with
such basic intensity.  It is an abandon that becomes need, an active
state of communion, indeed of identiﬁcation, however negligible the
action—I almost said the personality—of the object. A rhythmic
attitude: The adjective should be kept in mind.15
So here we have the Negro rehabilitated, “standing before the bar,”
ruling the world with his intuition, the Negro recognized, set on his
feet again, sought after, taken up, and he is a Negro—no, he is not a
Negro but the Negro, exciting the fecund antennae of the world, placed
in the foreground of the world, raining his poetic power on the world,
“open to all the breaths of the world.” I embrace the world! I am the
world! The white man has never understood this magic substitution. The
white man wants the world; he wants it for himself alone. He finds
himself predestined master of this world. He enslaves it. An
acquisitive relation is established between the world and him. But
there exist other values that fit only my forms. Like a magician, I
robbed the white man of “a certain world,” forever after lost to him
and his. When that happened, the white man must have been rocked
backward by a force that he could not identify, so little used as he
is to such reactions. Somewhere beyond the objective world of farms
and banana trees and rubber trees, I had subtly brought the real world
into being. The essence of the world was my fortune. Between the world
and me a relation of coexistence was established. I had discovered the
primeval One. My “speaking hands” tore at the hysterical throat of the
world. The white man had the anguished feeling that I was escaping
from him and that I was taking something with me. He went through my
pockets.  He thrust probes into the least circumvolution of my brain.
Everywhere he found only the obvious. So it was obvious that I had a
secret. I was interrogated; turning away with an air of mystery, I
murmured:
15. Léopold Senghor, “Ce que I’homme noir apporte,” in Nordey,
op. cit., p. 205.
Tokowaly, uncle, do you remember the nights gone by When my head
weighed heavy on the back of your patience or Holding my hand your
hand led me by shadows and signs The ﬁelds are ﬂowers of glowworms,
stars hang on the bushes, on the trees Silence is everywhere Only the
scents of the jungle hum, swarms of reddish bees that overwhelm the
crickets’ shrill sounds, And covered tom-tom, breathing in the
distance of the night.  You, Tokowaly, you listen to what cannot be
heard, and you explain to me what the ancestors are saying in the
liquid calm of the constellations, The bull, the scorpion, the
leopard, the elephant, and the ﬁsh we know, And the white pomp of the
Spirits in the heavenly shell that has no end, But now comes the
radiance of the goddess Moon and the veils of the shadows fall.  Night
of Africa, my black night, mystical and bright, black and shining.16
I made myself the poet of the world. The white man had found a poetry
in which there was nothing poetic. The soul of the white man was
corrupted, and, as I was told by a friend who was a teacher in the
United States, “The presence of the Negroes beside the whites is in a
way an insurance policy on humanness. When the whites feel that they
have become too mechanized, they turn to the men of color and ask them
for a little human sustenance.”  At last I had been recognized, I was
no longer a zero.  I had soon to change my tune. Only momentarily at a
loss, the white man explained to me that, genetically, I represented a
stage of development: “Your properties have been exhausted by us. We
have had earth mystics such as you will never approach. Study our
history and you will see how far this fusion has gone.” Then
16. Léopold Senghor, Chants d’ombre (Paris, Editions du Seuil, 1945).
I had the feeling that I was repeating a cycle. My originality had
been torn out of me. I wept a long time, and then I began to live
again. But I was haunted by a galaxy of erosive stereotypes: the
Negro’s sui generis odor . . . the Negro’s sui generis good nature
. . . the Negro’s sui generis gullibility. . . .  I had tried to flee
myself through my kind, but the whites had thrown themselves on me and
hamstrung me. I tested the limits of my essence; beyond all doubt
there was not much of it left.  It was here that I made my most
remarkable discovery. Properly speaking, this discovery was a
rediscovery.  I rummaged frenetically through all the antiquity of the
black man. What I found there took away my breath. In his book
L’abolition de l’esclavage Schoelcher presented us with compelling
arguments. Since then, Frobenius, Westermann, Delafosse—all of them
white—had joined the chorus: Ségou, Djenné, cities of more than a
hundred thousand people; accounts of learned blacks (doctors of
theology who went to Mecca to interpret the Koran).  All of that,
exhumed from the past, spread with its insides out, made it possible
for me to find a valid historic place. The white man was wrong, I was
not a primitive, not even a half-man, I belonged to a race that had
already been working in gold and silver two thousand years ago. And
too there was something else, something else that the white man could
not understand. Listen: What sort of men were these, then, who had
been torn away from their families, their countries, their religions,
with a savagery unparalleled in history?  Gentle men, polite,
considerate, unquestionably superior to those who tortured them—that
collection of adventurers who slashed and violated and spat on Africa
to make the stripping of her the easier.  The men they took away knew
how to build houses, govern empires, erect cities, cultivate ﬁelds,
mine for metals, weave cotton, forge steel.  Their religion had its
own beauty, based on mystical connections with the founder of the
city. Their customs were pleasing, built on unity, kindness, respect
for age.  No coercion, only mutual assistance, the joy of living, a
free acceptance of discipline.
Order—Earnestness—Poetry and Freedom.  From the untroubled private
citizen to the almost fabulous leader there was an unbroken chain of
understanding and trust. No science? Indeed yes; but also, to protect
them from fear, they possessed great myths in which the most subtle
observation and the most daring imagination were balanced and
blended. No art? They had their magniﬁcent sculpture, in which human
feeling erupted so unrestrained yet always followed the obsessive laws
of rhythm in its organization of the major elements of a material
called upon to capture, in order to redistribute, the most secret
forces of the universe. . . .17
Monuments in the very heart of Africa? Schools? Hospitals? Not a
single good burgher of the twentieth century, no Durand, no Smith, no
Brown even suspects that such things existed in Africa before the
Europeans came. . . .  But Schoelcher reminds us of their presence,
discovered by Caillé, Mollien, the Cander brothers. And, though he
nowhere reminds us that when the Portuguese landed on the banks of the
Congo in 1498, they found a rich and ﬂourishing state there and that
the courtiers of Ambas were dressed in robes of silk and brocade, at
least he knows that Africa had brought itself up to a juridical
concept of the state, and he is aware, living in the very ﬂood of
imperialism, that European civilization, after all, is only one more
civilization among many—and not the most merciful.18
I put the white man back into his place; growing bolder, I jostled him
and told him point-blank, “Get used to me, I am not getting used to
anyone.” I shouted my laughter to the stars. The white man, I could
see, was resentful. His reaction time lagged interminably. . . . I had
won. I was jubilant.  “Lay aside your history, your investigations of
the past, and try to feel yourself into our rhythm. In a society such
as ours, industrialized to the highest degree, dominated by scientism,
there is no longer room for your sensitivity. One must be tough if one
is to be allowed to live. What matters now is no longer playing the
game of the world but subjugating it with integers and atoms.
17. Aimé Césaire, Introduction to Victor Schoelcher, Esclavage et
colonisation (Paris, Presses Universitaires de France, 1948), p. 7.
18. Ibid., p. 8.
Oh, certainly, I will be told, now and then when we are worn out by
our lives in big buildings, we will turn to you as we do to our
children—to the innocent, the ingenuous, the spontaneous.  We will
turn to you as to the childhood of the world. You are so real in your
life—so funny, that is. Let us run away for a little while from our
ritualized, polite civilization and let us relax, bend to those heads,
those adorably expressive faces. In a way, you reconcile us with
ourselves.”  Thus my unreason was countered with reason, my reason
with “real reason.” Every hand was a losing hand for me. I analyzed my
heredity. I made a complete audit of my ailment. I wanted to be
typically Negro—it was no longer possible. I wanted to be white—that
was a joke. And, when I tried, on the level of ideas and intellectual
activity, to reclaim my negritude, it was snatched away from me. Proof
was presented that my effort was only a term in the dialectic: But
there is something more important: The Negro, as we have said, creates
an anti-racist racism for himself. In no sense does he wish to rule
the world: He seeks the abolition of all ethnic privileges, wherever
they come from; he asserts his solidarity with the oppressed of all
colors. At once the subjective, existential, ethnic idea of negritude
“passes,” as Hegel puts it, into the objective, positive, exact idea
of proletariat. “For Césaire,” Senghor says, “the white man is the
symbol of capital as the Negro is that of labor.  . . . Beyond the
black-skinned men of his race it is the battle of the world
proletariat that is his song.”  That is easy to say, but less easy to
think out. And undoubtedly it is no coincidence that the most ardent
poets of negritude are at the same time militant Marxists.  But that
does not prevent the idea of race from mingling with that of class:
The ﬁrst is concrete and particular, the second is universal and
abstract; the one stems from what Jaspers calls understanding and the
other from intellection; the ﬁrst is the result of a psychobiological
syncretism and the second is a methodical construction based on
experience. In fact, negritude appears as the minor term of a
dialectical progression: The theoretical and practical assertion of
the supremacy of the white man is its thesis; the position of
negritude as an antithetical value is the moment of negativity. But
this negative moment is insufﬁcient by itself, and the
Negroes who employ it know this very well; they know that it is
intended to prepare the synthesis or realization of the human in a
society without races. Thus negritude is the root of its own
destruction, it is a transition and not a conclusion, a means and not
an ultimate end.19
When I read that page, I felt that I had been robbed of my last
chance. I said to my friends, “The generation of the younger black
poets has just suffered a blow that can never be forgiven.”  Help had
been sought from a friend of the colored peoples, and that friend had
found no better response than to point out the relativity of what they
were doing. For once, that born Hegelian had forgotten that
consciousness has to lose itself in the night of the absolute, the
only condition to attain to consciousness of self. In opposition to
rationalism, he summoned up the negative side, but he forgot that this
negativity draws its worth from an almost substantive absoluteness. A
consciousness committed to experience is ignorant, has to be ignorant,
of the essences and the determinations of its being.  Orphée Noir is a
date in the intellectualization of the experience of being black. And
Sartre’s mistake was not only to seek the source of the source but in
a certain sense to block that source: Will the source of Poetry be
dried up? Or will the great black ﬂood, in spite of everything, color
the sea into which it pours itself? It does not matter: Every age has
its own poetry; in every age the circumstances of history choose a
nation, a race, a class to take up the torch by creating situations
that can be expressed or transcended only through Poetry; sometimes
the poetic impulse coincides with the revolutionary impulse, and
sometimes they take different courses. Today let us hail the turn of
history that will make it possible for the black men to utter “the
great Negro cry with a force that will shake the pillars of the world”
(Césaire).20
And so it is not I who make a meaning for myself, but it is the
meaning that was already there, pre-existing, waiting for me. It is
not out of my bad nigger’s misery, my bad nigger’s teeth, my bad
nigger’s hunger that I will shape a torch with which to burn
19. Jean-Paul Sartre, Orphée Noir, preface to Anthologie de la
nouvelle poésie nègre et malgache (Paris, Presses Universitaires de
France, 1948), pp. xl ff.  20. Ibid., p. xliv.
down the world, but it is the torch that was already there, waiting
for that turn of history.  In terms of consciousness, the black
consciousness is held out as an absolute density, as filled with
itself, a stage preceding any invasion, any abolition of the ego by
desire. Jean-Paul Sartre, in this work, has destroyed black zeal. In
opposition to historical becoming, there had always been the
unforeseeable. I needed to lose myself completely in negritude. One
day, perhaps, in the depths of that unhappy romanticism. . . .  In any
case I needed not to know. This struggle, this new decline had to take
on an aspect of completeness. Nothing is more unwelcome than the
commonplace: “You’ll change, my boy; I was like that too when I was
young . . . you’ll see, it will all pass.”  The dialectic that brings
necessity into the foundation of my freedom drives me out of
myself. It shatters my unreflected position. Still in terms of
consciousness, black consciousness is immanent in its own eyes. I am
not a potentiality of something, I am wholly what I am. I do not have
to look for the universal.  No probability has any place inside me. My
Negro consciousness does not hold itself out as a lack. It is. It is
its own follower.  But, I will be told, your statements show a
misreading of the processes of history. Listen then: Africa I have
kept your memory Africa you are inside me Like the splinter in the
wound like a guardian fetish in the center of the village make me the
stone in your sling make my mouth the lips of your wound make my knees
the broken pillars of your abasement
I want to be of your race alone workers peasants of all lands . . .
. . . white worker in Detroit black peon in Alabama uncountable nation
in capitalist slavery destiny ranges us shoulder to shoulder
repudiating the ancient maledictions of blood taboos we roll away the
ruins of our solitudes If the ﬂood is a frontier we will strip the
gully of its endless covering ﬂow If the Sierra is a frontier we will
smash the jaws of the volcanoes upholding the Cordilleras and the
plain will be the parade ground of the dawn where we regroup our
forces sundered by the deceits of our masters As the contradiction
among the features creates the harmony of the face we proclaim the
oneness of the suffering and the revolt of all the peoples on all the
face of the earth and we mix the mortar of the age of brotherhood out
of the dust of idols.21
Exactly, we will reply, Negro experience is not a whole, for there is
not merely one Negro, there are Negroes. What a difference, for
instance, in this other poem: The white man killed my father Because
my father was proud The white man raped my mother Because my mother
was beautiful The white man wore out my brother in the hot sun of the
roads Because my brother was strong Then the white man came to me His
hands red with blood Spat his contempt into my black face Out of his
tyrant’s voice: “Hey boy, a basin, a towel, water.”22
21. Jacques Roumain, “Bois-d’Ebène,” Prelude, in Anthologie de la
nouvelle poésie nègre et malgache, p. 113.  22. David Diop, “Le temps
du martyre,” in ibid., p. 174.
Or this other one: My brother with teeth that glisten at the
compliments of hypocrites My brother with gold-rimmed spectacles Over
eyes that turn blue at the sound of the Master’s voice My poor brother
in dinner jacket with its silk lapels Clucking and whispering and
strutting through the drawing rooms of Condescension How pathetic you
are The sun of your native country is nothing more now than a shadow
On your composed civilized face And your grandmother’s hut Brings
blushes into cheeks made white by years of abasement and Mea culpa But
when regurgitating the ﬂood of lofty empty words Like the load that
presses on your shoulders You walk again on the rough red earth of
Africa These words of anguish will state the rhythm of your uneasy
gait I feel so alone, so alone here!23
From time to time one would like to stop. To state reality is a
wearing task. But, when one has taken it into one’s head to try to
express existence, one runs the risk of finding only the
nonexistent. What is certain is that, at the very moment when I was
trying to grasp my own being, Sartre, who remained The Other, gave me
a name and thus shattered my last illusion. While I was saying to him:
“My negritude is neither a tower nor a cathedral, it thrusts into the
red ﬂesh of the sun, it thrusts into the burning ﬂesh of the sky, it
hollows through the dense dismay of its own pillar of patience . . .”
23. David Diop, “Le Renégat.”
while I was shouting that, in the paroxysm of my being and my fury, he
was reminding me that my blackness was only a minor term. In all
truth, in all truth I tell you, my shoulders slipped out of the
framework of the world, my feet could no longer feel the touch of the
ground. Without a Negro past, without a Negro future, it was
impossible for me to live my Negrohood. Not yet white, no longer
wholly black, I was damned. Jean-Paul Sartre had forgotten that the
Negro suffers in his body quite differently from the white man.24
Between the white man and me the connection was irrevocably one of
transcendence.25 But the constancy of my love had been forgotten. I
defined myself as an absolute intensity of beginning. So I took up my
negritude, and with tears in my eyes I put its machinery together
again. What had been broken to pieces was rebuilt, reconstructed by
the intuitive lianas of my hands.  My cry grew more violent: I am a
Negro, I am a Negro, I am a Negro. . . .  And there was my poor
brother—living out his neurosis to the extreme and finding himself
paralyzed: THE NEGRO: I can’t, ma’am.  LIZZIE: Why not?  THE NEGRO: I
can’t shoot white folks.  LIZZIE: Really! That would bother them,
wouldn’t it?  THE NEGRO: They’re white folks, ma’am.  LIZZIE: So what?
Maybe they got a right to bleed you like a pig just because they’re
white?  THE NEGRO: But they’re white folks.
A feeling of inferiority? No, a feeling of nonexistence. Sin is Negro
as virtue is white. All those white men in a group, guns in their
hands, cannot be wrong. I am guilty. I do not know of what, but I know
that I am no good.  24. Though Sartre’s speculations on the existence
of The Other may be correct (to the extent, we must remember, to which
Being and Nothingness describes an alienated consciousness), their
application to a black consciousness proves fallacious. That is
because the white man is not only The Other but also the master,
whether real or imaginary.  25. In the sense in which the word is used
by Jean Wahl in Existence humaine et transcendence (Neuchâtel, La
Baconnière, 1944).
THE NEGRO: That’s how it goes, ma’am. That’s how it always goes with
white folks.  LIZZIE: You too? You feel guilty?  THE NEGRO: Yes,
ma’am.26
It is Bigger Thomas—he is afraid, he is terribly afraid. He is afraid,
but of what is he afraid? Of himself. No one knows yet who he is, but
he knows that fear will fill the world when the world finds out. And
when the world knows, the world always expects something of the
Negro. He is afraid lest the world know, he is afraid of the fear that
the world would feel if the world knew. Like that old woman on her
knees who begged me to tie her to her bed: “I just know, Doctor: Any
minute that thing will take hold of me.”  “What thing?”  “The wanting
to kill myself. Tie me down, I’m afraid.”  In the end, Bigger Thomas
acts. To put an end to his tension, he acts, he responds to the
world’s anticipation.27 So it is with the character in If He Hollers
Let Him Go28—who does precisely what he did not want to do. That big
blonde who was always in his way, weak, sensual, offered, open,
fearing (desiring) rape, became his mistress in the end.  The Negro is
a toy in the white man’s hands; so, in order to shatter the hellish
cycle, he explodes. I cannot go to a film without seeing myself. I
wait for me. In the interval, just before the film starts, I wait for
me. The people in the theater are watching me, examining me, waiting
for me. A Negro groom is going to appear.  My heart makes my head
swim.  The crippled veteran of the Pacific war says to my brother,
“Resign yourself to your color the way I got used to my stump; we’re
both victims.”29
26. Jean-Paul Sartre, The Respectful Prostitute, in Three Plays (New
York, Knopf, 1949), pp. 189, 191. Originally, La Putain respectueuse
(Paris, Gallimard, 1947).  See also Home of the Brave, a film by Mark
Robson.  27. Richard Wright, Native Son (New York, Harper, 1940).
28. By Chester Himes (Garden City, Doubleday, 1945).  29. Home of the
Brave.
Nevertheless with all my strength I refuse to accept that
amputation. I feel in myself a soul as immense as the world, truly a
soul as deep as the deepest of rivers, my chest has the power to
expand without limit. I am a master and I am advised to adopt the
humility of the cripple. Yesterday, awakening to the world, I saw the
sky turn upon itself utterly and wholly. I wanted to rise, but the
disemboweled silence fell back upon me, its wings paralyzed. Without
responsibility, straddling Nothingness and Infinity, I began to weep.
Psychoanalytic schools have studied the neurotic reactions that arise
among certain groups, in certain areas of civilization. In response to
the requirements of dialectic, one should investigate the extent to
which the conclusions of Freud or of Adler can be applied to the
effort to understand the man of color’s view of the world.  It can
never be sufficiently emphasized that psychoanalysis sets as its task
the understanding of given behavior patterns—within the specific group
represented by the family. When the problem is a neurosis experienced
by an adult, the analyst’s task is to uncover in the new psychic
structure an analogy with certain infantile elements, a repetition, a
duplication of conflicts that owe their origin to the essence of the
family constellation. In every case the analyst clings to the concept
of the family as a “psychic circumstance and object.”1 Here, however,
the evidence is going to be particularly complicated. In Europe the
family represents in effect a certain fashion in which the world
presents itself to the child. There are close connections between the
structure of the family and the structure of the
nation. Militarization and the centraliza- tion of authority in a
country automatically entail a resurgence of the authority of the
father. In Europe and in every country characterized as civilized or
civilizing, the family is a miniature of the nation. As the child
emerges from the shadow of his parents, he finds himself once more
among the same laws, the same principles, the same values. A normal
child that has
1. Jacques Lacan, “Le complèxe, facteur concret de la psychologie
familiale,” Encyclopédie française, 8–40, 5.
grown up in a normal family will be a normal man.2 There is no
disproportion between the life of the family and the life of the
nation. Conversely, when one examines a closed society—that is, a
society that has been protected from the flood of civilization—one
encounters the same structures as those just described. Father
Trilles’ L’âme du Pygmée d’Afrique, for instance, convinces us of
that; although with every word one is aware of the need to
Christianize the savage Negro soul, the book’s description of the
whole culture—the conditions of worship, the persistence of rites, the
survival of myths—has nothing of the artificial impression given by La
philosophie bantoue.  In both cases the characteristics of the family
are projected onto the social environment. It is true that the
children of pickpockets or burglars, accustomed to a certain system of
clan law, would be surprised to find that the rest of the world
behaved differently, but a new kind of training—except in instances of
perversion or arrested development (Heuyer)3—should be able to direct
them into a moralization, a socialization of outlook.  It is apparent
in all such cases that the sickness lies in the family environment.
For the individual the authority of the state is a reproduction of the
authority of the family by which he was shaped in his
childhood. Ultimately the individual assimilates all the authorities
that he meets to the authority of the parents: He perceives the
present in terms of the past. Like all other human conduct, behavior
toward authority is something, learned. And it is learned in the heart
of a family that can be described, from the psychological
2. I should like to think that I am not going to be brought to trial
for this sentence.  Skeptics always have a fine time asking, “What do
you mean by normal?” For the moment, it is beyond the scope of this
book to answer the question. In order to pacify the more insistent,
let me refer them to the extremely instructive work by Georges
Canguilhem, Essai sur quelques problèmes concernant le normal et le
pathologique (Paris, Société d’Editions, 1950), even though its sole
orientation is biological. And let me add only that in the
psychological sphere the abnormal man is he who demands, who appeals,
who begs.  3. Although even this reservation is open to argument. See
for example the question put by Mlle. Juliette Boutonnier: “Might not
perversion be an extreme arrest in affect development, furthered, if
not produced, by the conditions under which the child has lived, at
least as much as by the congenital tendencies that are obviously
factors in it but that probably are not alone responsible?” (Revue
Française de Psychanalyse, No. 3, 1949, pp. 403–404.)
point of view, by the form of organization peculiar to it—that is, by
the way in which its authority is distributed and exercised.4
But—and this is a most important point—we observe the opposite in the
man of color. A normal Negro child, having grown up within a normal
family, will become abnormal on the slightest contact with the white
world. This statement may not be immediately understandable. Therefore
let us proceed by going backward. Paying tribute to Dr. Breuer, Freud
wrote: In almost every case, we could see that the symptoms were, so
to speak, like residues of emotional experiences, to which for this
reason we later gave the name of psychic traumas. Their individual
characters were linked to the traumatic scenes that had provoked
them. According to the classic terminology, the symptoms were
determined by “scenes” of which they were the mnemic residues, and it
was no longer necessary to regard them as arbitrary and enigmatic
effects of the neurosis. In contrast, however, to what was expected,
it was not always a single event that was the cause of the symptom;
most often, on the contrary, it arose out of multiple traumas,
frequently analogous and repeated. As a result, it became necessary to
reproduce chronologically this whole series of pathogenic memories,
but in reverse order: the latest at the beginning and the earliest at
the end; it was impossible to make one’s way back to the ﬁrst trauma,
which is often the most forceful, if one skipped any of its
successors.
It could not be stated more positively; every neurosis has its origins
in specific Erlebnisse. Later Freud added: This trauma, it is true,
has been quite expelled from the consciousness and the memory of the
patient and as a result he has apparently been saved from a great mass
of suffering, but the repressed desire continues to exist in the
unconscious; it is on watch constantly for an opportunity to make
itself known and it soon comes back into consciousness, but in a
disguise that makes it impossible to recognize; in other words, the
repressed thought is replaced in consciousness by another that acts as
its surrogate, its Ersatz, and that soon surrounds itself with all
those feelings of morbidity that had been supposedly averted by the
repression.
4. Joachim Marcus, “Structure familiale et comportements politiques,”
L’autorité dans la famille et dans l’État, Revue Française de
Psychoanalyse, April–June, 1949.
These Erlebnisse are repressed in the unconscious.  What do we see in
the case of the black man? Unless we make use of that frightening
postulate—which so destroys our balance— offered by Jung, the
collective unconscious, we can understand absolutely nothing. A drama
is enacted every day in colonized countries. How is one to explain,
for example, that a Negro who has passed his baccalaureate and has
gone to the Sorbonne to study to become a teacher of philosophy is
already on guard before any conflictual elements have coalesced round
him? René Ménil accounted for this reaction in Hegelian terms. In his
view it was “the consequence of the replacement of the repressed
[African] spirit in the consciousness of the slave by an authority
symbol representing the Master, a symbol implanted in the subsoil of
the collective group and charged with maintaining order in it as a
garrison controls a conquered city.”5 We shall see in our section on
Hegel that René Ménil has made no misjudgment. Meanwhile we have the
right to put a question to ourselves: How is the persistence of this
reaction in the twentieth century to be explained when in other ways
there is complete identification with the white man? Very often the
Negro who becomes abnormal has never had any relations with
whites. Has some remote experience been repressed in his unconscious?
Did the little black child see his father beaten or lynched by a white
man? Has there been a real traumatism? To all of this we have to
answer no. Well, then?  If we want to answer correctly, we have to
fall back on the idea of collective catharsis. In every society, in
every collectivity, exists—must exist—a channel, an outlet through
which the forces accumulated in the form of aggression can be
released. This is the purpose of games in children’s institutions, of
psychodramas in group therapy, and, in a more general way, of
illustrated magazines for children—each type of society, of course,
requiring its own specific kind of catharsis. The Tarzan stories, the
sagas of twelve-year-old explorers, the adventures of Mickey Mouse,
and all those “comic books” serve actually as a release for collective
5. A quotation borrowed from Michel Leiris, “Martinique, Guadeloupe,
Haiti,” Les Temps Modernes, February, 1950, p. 1346.
aggression. The magazines are put together by white men for little
white men. This is the heart of the problem. In the Antilles—and there
is every reason to think that the situation is the same in the other
colonies—these same magazines are devoured by the local children. In
the magazines the Wolf, the Devil, the Evil Spirit, the Bad Man, the
Savage are always symbolized by Negroes or Indians; since there is
always identification with the victor, the little Negro, quite as
easily as the little white boy, becomes an explorer, an adventurer, a
missionary “who faces the danger of being eaten by the wicked
Negroes.” I shall be told that this is hardly important; but only
because those who say it have not given much thought to the role of
such magazines. Here is what G. Legman thinks of them: With very rare
exceptions, every American child who was six years old in 1938 had
therefore assimilated at the very least 18,000 scenes of ferocious
tortures and bloody violence. . . . Except the Boers, the Americans
are the only modem nation that within living memory has completely
driven the autochthonous population off the soil that it had
occupied.6 America alone, then, could have had an uneasy national
conscience to lull by creating the myth of the “Bad Injun,”7 in order
later to be able to bring back the historic ﬁgure of the Noble Redskin
vainly defending his lands against invaders armed with riﬂes and
Bibles; the punishment that we deserve can be averted only by denying
responsibility for the wrong and throwing the blame on the victim; by
proving—at least to our own satisfaction—that by striking the ﬁrst and
only blow we were acting solely on the legitimate ground of
defense. . . . [Anticipating the repercussions of these magazines on
American culture, Legman went on:] There is still no answer to the
question whether this maniacal ﬁxation on violence and death is the
substitute for a forbidden sexuality or whether it does not rather
serve the purpose of channeling, along a line left open by sexual
censorship, both the child’s and the adult’s desire for aggression
against the economic and social structure which, though with their
entire consent, perverts them. In both cases the root of the
perversion, whether it be of a sexual or of an economic character, is
of the essence; that is why, as long as we remain incapable of
attacking 6. In this connection, it is worth noting that the Caribs
experienced the same fate at the hands of French and Spanish
explorers.  7. In English in the original. (Translator’s note.)
these fundamental repressions, every attack aimed at such simple
escape devices as comic books will remain futile.8
The black schoolboy in the Antilles, who in his lessons is forever
talking about “our ancestors, the Gauls,”9 identifies himself with the
explorer, the bringer of civilization, the white man who carries truth
to savages—an all-white truth. There is identification—that is, the
young Negro subjectively adopts a white man’s attitude. He invests the
hero, who is white, with all his own aggression—at that age closely
linked to sacrificial dedication, a sacrificial dedication permeated
with sadism. An eight-year-old child who offers a gift, even to an
adult, cannot endure a refusal. Little by little, one can observe in
the young Antillean the formation and crystallization of an attitude
and a way of thinking and seeing that are essentially white. When in
school he has to read stories of savages told by white men, he always
thinks of the Senegalese. As a schoolboy, I had many occasions to
spend whole hours talking about the supposed customs of the savage
Senegalese. In what was said there was a lack of awareness that was at
the very least paradoxical.  Because the Antillean does not think of
himself as a black man; he thinks of himself as an Antillean. The
Negro lives in Africa.  Subjectively, intellectually, the Antillean
conducts himself like a white man. But he is a Negro. That he will
learn once he goes to Europe; and when he hears Negroes mentioned he
will recognize that the word includes himself as well as the
Senegalese. What are we to conclude on this matter?  To impose the
same “Evil Spirits” on the white man and on the black man is a major
error in education. If one is willing to understand the “Evil Spirit”
in the sense of an attempt to personify the id, the point of view will
be understood. If we are utterly honest, we must say that children’s
counting-out rhymes are subject to the same criticism. It will have
already been noticed 8. G. Legman, “Psychopathologie des Comics,”
French translation by H. Robillot, Les Temps Modernes, May, 1949,
pp. 919 ff.  9. One always sees a smile when one reports this aspect
of education in Martinique.  The smile comes because the comicality of
the thing is obvious, but no one pursues it to its later
consequences. Yet these are the important aspects, because three or
four such phrases are the basis on which the young Antillean works out
his view of the world.
that I should like nothing more nor less than the establishment of
children’s magazines especially for Negroes, the creation of songs for
Negro children, and, ultimately, the publication of history texts
especially for them, at least through the grammar-school grades. For,
until there is evidence to the contrary, I believe that if there is a
traumatism it occurs during those years. The young Antillean is a
Frenchman called on at all times to live with white compatriots. One
forgets this rather too often.  The white family is the agent of a
certain system. The society is indeed the sum of all the families in
it. The family is an institution that prefigures a broader
institution: the social or the national group. Both turn on the same
axes. The white family is the workshop in which one is shaped and
trained for life in society.  “The family structure is internalized in
the superego,” Marcus says, “and projected into political [though I
would say social] behavior.”  As long as he remains among his own
people, the little black follows very nearly the same course as the
little white. But if he goes to Europe, he will have to reappraise his
lot. For the Negro in France, which is his country, will feel
different from other people. One can hear the glib remark: The Negro
makes himself inferior. But the truth is that he is made inferior. The
young Antillean is a Frenchman called upon constantly to live with
white compatriots. Now, the Antillean family has for all practical
purposes no connection with the national—that is, the French, or
European—structure. The Antillean has therefore to choose between his
family and European society; in other words, the individual who climbs
up into society—white and civilized— tends to reject his family—black
and savage—on the plane of imagination, in accord with the childhood
Erlebnisse that we discussed earlier. In this case the schema of
Marcus becomes Family ← Individual → Society and the family structure
is cast back into the id.  The Negro recognizes the unreality of many
of the beliefs that he has adopted with reference to the subjective
attitude of the white man. When he does, his real apprenticeship
begins. And reality proves to be extremely resistant. But, it will be
objected,
you are merely describing a universal phenomenon, the criterion of
maturity being in fact adaptation to society. My answer is that such a
criticism goes off in the wrong direction, for I have just shown that
for the Negro there is a myth to be faced. A solidly established
myth. The Negro is unaware of it as long as his existence is limited
to his own environment; but the first encounter with a white man
oppresses him with the whole weight of his blackness.10 Then there is
the unconscious. Since the racial drama is played out in the open, the
black man has no time to “make it unconscious.” The white man, on the
other hand, succeeds in doing so to a certain extent, because a new
element appears: guilt. The Negro’s inferiority or superiority complex
or his feeling of equality is conscious. These feelings forever chill
him. They make his drama. In him there is none of the affective
amnesia characteristic of the typical neurotic.  Whenever I have read
a psychoanalytic work, discussed problems with my professors, or
talked with European patients, I have been struck by the disparity
between the corresponding schemas and the reality that the Negro
presents. It has led me progressively to the conclusion that there is
a dialectical substitution when one goes from the psychology of the
white man to that of the black.  The earliest values, which Charles
Odier describes,11 are different in the white man and in the black
man. The drive toward socialization does not stem from the same
motivations. In cold actuality, we change worlds. A close study should
be divided into two parts:
10. In this connection it is worth remembering what Sartre said: Some
children, at the age of five or six, have already had fights with
schoolmates who call them “Yids.” Others may remain in ignorance for a
long time. A young Jewish girl in a family I am acquainted with did
not even know the meaning of the word Jew until she was
fifteen. During the Occupation there was a Jewish doctor who lived
shut up in his home at Fontainebleau and raised his children without
saying a word to them of their origin. But however it comes about,
some day they must learn the truth: sometimes from the smiles of those
around them, sometimes from rumor or insult. The later the discovery,
the more violent the shock. Suddenly they perceive that others know
something about them that they do not know, that people apply to them
an ugly and upsetting term that is not used in their own
families. (Anti-Semite and Jew, p. 75.)  11. Les deux sources
consciente et inconsiente de la vie morale (Neuchâtel, La Baconnière,
1943).
1. a psychoanalytic interpretation of the life experience of the black
man; 2. a psychoanalytic interpretation of the Negro myth.  But
reality, which is our only recourse, prevents such procedures.  The
facts are much more complicated. What are they?  The Negro is a
phobogenic object, a stimulus to anxiety.  From the patient treated by
Sérieux and Capgras12 to the girl who confides to me that to go to bed
with a Negro would be terrifying to her, one discovers all the stages
of what I shall call the Negro-phobogenesis. There has been much talk
of psycho- analysis in connection with the Negro. Distrusting the ways
in which it might be applied,13 I have preferred to call this chapter
“The Negro and Psychopathology,” well aware that Freud and Adler and
even the cosmic Jung did not think of the Negro in all their
investigations. And they were quite right not to have. It is too often
forgotten that neurosis is not a basic element of human reality. Like
it or not, the Oedipus complex is far from coming into being among
Negroes. It might be argued, as Malinowski contends, that the
matriarchal structure is the only reason for its absence. But, putting
aside the question whether the ethnologists are not so imbued with the
complexes of their own civilization that they are compelled to try to
find them duplicated in the peoples they study, it would be relatively
easy for me to show that in the French Antilles 97 per cent of the
families cannot produce one Oedipal neurosis. This incapacity is one
on which we heartily congratulate ourselves.14 With the exception of a
few misfits within the closed environment, we can say that every
neurosis, every abnormal 12. Les folies raisonnantes, cited by
A. Hesnard, L’univers morbide de la faute (Paris, Presses
Universitaires de France, 1949), p. 97.  13. I am thinking here
particularly of the United States. See, for example, Home of the
Brave.  14. On this point psychoanalysts will be reluctant to share my
view. Dr. Lacan, for instance, talks of the “abundance” of the Oedipus
complex. But even if the young boy has to kill his father, it is still
necessary for the father to accept being killed.  I am reminded of
what Hegel said: “The cradle of the child is the tomb of the parents”;
and of Nicolas Calas’ Foyer d’incendie and of Jean Lacroix’ Force et
faiblesses de la famille. The collapse of moral values in France after
the war was perhaps the result of the defeat of that moral being which
the nation represented.  We know what such traumatisms on the family
level may produce.
manifestation, every affective erethism in an Antillean is the product
of his cultural situation. In other words, there is a constellation of
postulates, a series of propositions that slowly and subtly—with the
help of books, newspapers, schools and their texts, advertisements,
films, radio—work their way into one’s mind and shape one’s view of
the world of the group to which one belongs.15 In the Antilles that
view of the world is white because no black voice exists. The folklore
of Martinique is meager, and few children in Fort-de-France know the
stories of “Compè Lapin,” twin brother of the Br’er Rabbit of
Louisiana’s Uncle Remus. A European familiar with the current trends
of Negro poetry, for example, would be amazed to learn that as late as
1940 no Antillean found it possible to think of himself as a Negro. It
was only with the appearance of Aimé Césaire that the acceptance of
negritude and the statement of its claims began to be perceptible. The
most concrete proof of this, furthermore, is that feeling which
pervades each new generation of students arriving in Paris: It takes
them several weeks to recognize that contact with Europe compels them
to face a certain number of problems that until their arrival had
never touched them. And yet these problems were by no means
invisible.16 Whenever I had a discussion with my professors or talked
with European patients, I became aware of the differences that might
prevail between the two worlds. Talking recently to a physician
15. I recommend the following experiment to those who are unconvinced:
Attend showings of a Tarzan film in the Antilles and in Europe. In the
Antilles, the young Negro identifies himself de facto with Tarzan
against the Negroes. This is much more difficult for him in a European
theater, for the rest of the audience, which is white, automatically
identifies him with the savages on the screen. It is a conclusive
experience. The Negro learns that one is not black without problems. A
documentary film on Africa produces similar reactions when it is shown
in a French city and in Fort-de-France. I will go farther and say that
Bushmen and Zulus arouse even more laughter among the young
Antilleans. It would be interesting to show how in this instance the
reactional exaggeration betrays a hint of recognition. In France a
Negro who sees this documentary is virtually petrified. There he has
no more hope of flight: He is at once Antillean, Bushman, and Zulu.
16. More especially, they become aware that the line of self-esteem
that they had chosen should be inverted. We have seen in fact that the
Antillean who goes to France pictures this journey as the final stage
of his personality. Quite literally I can say without any risk of
error that the Antillean who goes to France in order to convince
himself that he is white will find his real face there.
who had always practiced in Fort-de-France, I told him what
conclusions I had arrived at; he went farther, saying that they were
valid not only in psychopathology but also in general medicine.  “In
the same way,” he added, “you never encounter a case of pure typhoid
such as you studied in the textbooks; there is always a more or less
manifest complication of malaria.” It would be interesting to study,
for example, a case of schizophrenia as experienced by a Negro—if
indeed that kind of malady were to be found there.  What am I getting
at? Quite simply this: When the Negro makes contact with the white
world, a certain sensitizing action takes place. If his psychic
structure is weak, one observes a collapse of the ego. The black man
stops behaving as an actional person. The goal of his behavior will be
The Other (in the guise of the white man), for The Other alone can
give him worth. That is on the ethical level: self-esteem. But there
is something else.  I have said that the Negro is phobogenic. What is
phobia?  I prefer to answer that question by relying on the latest
work of Hesnard: “Phobia is a neurosis characterized by the anxious
fear of an object (in the broadest sense of anything outside the
individual) or, by extension, of a situation.”17 Naturally that object
must have certain aspects. It must arouse, Hesnard says, both fear and
revulsion. But here we encounter a difficulty. Applying the genetic
method to the understanding of phobia, Charles Odier wrote that all
anxiety derives from a certain subjective insecurity linked to the
absence of the mother.18 This occurs, according to Odier, sometime in
the second year of life.  Investigating the psychic structure of the
phobic, he comes to this conclusion: “Before attacking the adult
beliefs, all the elements of the infantile structure which produced
them must be analyzed.”19 The choice of the phobic object is therefore
over- determined. This object does not come at random out of the void
of nothingness; in some situation it has previously evoked
17. L’univers morbide de la jaute, p. 37.  18. Anxiety and Magic
Thinking (New York, International Universities Press, 1956),
p. 46. Originally, L’angoisse et la pensée magique (Neuchâtel,
Delachaux, 1947).  19. Ibid., p. 76.
an affect in the patient. His phobia is the latent presence of this
affect at the root of his world; there is an organization that has
been given a form. For the object, naturally, need not be there, it is
enough that somewhere it exist: It is a possibility. This object is
endowed with evil intentions and with all the attributes of a malefic
power.20 In the phobic, affect has a priority that defies all rational
thinking. As we can see, the phobic is a person who is governed by the
laws of rational prelogic and affective prelogic: methods of thinking
and feeling that go back to the age at which he experienced the event
that impaired his security. The difficulty indicated here is this: Was
there a trauma harmful to security in the case of the young woman whom
we mentioned a little earlier?  In the majority of Negrophobic men has
there been an attempt at rape? An attempt at fellatio? Proceeding with
complete orthodoxy, we should be led by the application of analytic
conclusions to this: If an extremely frightening object, such as a
more or less imaginary attacker, arouses terror, this is also—for most
often such cases are those of women—and especially a terror mixed with
sexual revulsion. “I’m afraid of men” really means, at the bottom of
the motivation of the fear, because they might do all kinds of things
to me, but not commonplace cruelties: sexual abuses—in other words,
immoral and shameful things.21 “Contact alone is enough to evoke
anxiety. For contact is at the same time the basic schematic type of
initiating sexual action (touching, caresses—sexuality).”22 Since we
have learned to know all the tricks the ego uses in order to defend
itself, we know too that its denials must in no case be taken
literally. Are we not now observing a complete inversion? Basically,
does this fear of rape not itself cry out for rape? Just as there are
faces that ask to be slapped, can one not speak of women who ask to be
raped? In If He Hollers Let Him Go, Chester Himes describes this type
very well. The big blonde trembles whenever the Negro goes near her.
Yet she has nothing to fear, since the factory is full of white men.
In the end, she and the Negro go to bed together.
20. Ibid., pp. 58 and 68.  21. Hesnard, op. cit., p. 38.  22. Ibid.,
p. 40.
When I was in military service I had the opportunity to observe the
behavior of white women from three or four European countries when
they were among Negroes at dances. Most of the time the women made
involuntary gestures of flight, of withdrawing, their faces filled
with a fear that was not feigned. And yet the Negroes who asked them
to dance would have been utterly unable to commit any act at all
against them, even if they had wished to do so. The behavior of these
women is clearly understandable from the standpoint of
imagination. That is because the Negrophobic woman is in fact nothing
but a putative sexual partner—just as the Negrophobic man is a
repressed homosexual.  In relation to the Negro, everything takes
place on the genital level. A few years ago, I remarked to some
friends during a discussion that in a general sense the white man
behaves toward the Negro as an elder brother reacts to the birth of a
younger.  I have since learned that Richard Sterba arrived at the same
conclusion in America.  On the phenomenological level there would be a
double reality to be observed. The Jew is feared because of his
potential for acquisitiveness. “They” are everywhere. The banks, the
stock exchanges, the government are infested with “them.” “They”
control everything. Soon the whole country will belong to “them.”
“They” do better in examinations than the “real” Frenchmen.  Soon
“they” will be making the laws for us. Not long ago, an acquaintance
studying for the civil service said to me, “Say what you want, ‘they’
take good care of one another. When Moch was in power, for instance,
the number of kikes in government jobs was appalling.” In the medical
profession the situation is no different. Every Jewish student who
wins a prize in a competition does it through “pull.” As for the
Negroes, they have tremendous sexual powers. What do you expect, with
all the freedom they have in their jungles! They copulate at all times
and in all places.  They are really genital. They have so many
children that they cannot even count them. Be careful, or they will
flood us with little mulattoes.  Things are indeed going to
hell. . . .
The government and the civil service are at the mercy of the Jews.
Our women are at the mercy of the Negroes.  For the sexual potency of
the Negro is hallucinating. That is indeed the word: This potency must
be hallucinating.  Psychoanalysts who study the problem soon enough
find the mechanisms of every neurosis. Sexual anxiety is predominant
here. All the Negrophobic women I have known had abnormal sex
lives. Their husbands had left them; or they were widows and they were
afraid to find a substitute for the dead husband; or they were
divorced and they had doubts at the thought of a new object
investment. All of them endowed the Negro with powers that other men
(husbands, transient lovers) did not have. And besides there was also
an element of perversion, the persistence of infantile formations: God
knows how they make love! It must be terrifying.23 There is one
expression that through time has become singularly eroticized: the
black athlete. There is something in the mere idea, one young woman
confided to me, that makes the heart skip a beat. A prostitute told me
that in her early days the mere thought of going to bed with a Negro
brought on an orgasm. She went in search of Negroes and never asked
them for money. But, she added, “going to bed with them was no more
remarkable than going to bed with white men. It was before I did it
that I had the orgasm. I used to think about (imagine) all the things
they might do to me: and that was what was so terrific.”  Still on the
genital level, when a white man hates black men, is he not yielding to
a feeling of impotence or of sexual inferiority?  23. In the work of
Joachim Marcus we encounter the view according to which the social
neurosis—or, if one prefers, abnormal behavior in contact with The
Other, whoever he may be—is closely related to the individual
situation: The study of our questionnaires showed that the most
strongly anti-Semitic persons belonged to the most conflictual family
structures. Their anti-Semitism was a reaction to frustrations
suffered inside the family environment. What demonstrates that the Jew
is a substitutive object in anti-Semitism is the fact that, depending
on local conditions, the same family situations will produce hatred of
Negroes, anti-Catholicism, or anti-Semitism. One can therefore state
that, contrary to what is generally believed, it is the attitude that
seeks the content rather than the content that creates the
attitude. (“Structure familiale et comportements politiques,”
op. cit., p. 282.)
Since his ideal is an infinite virility, is there not a phenomenon of
diminution in relation to the Negro, who is viewed as a penis symbol?
Is the lynching of the Negro not a sexual revenge? We know how much of
sexuality there is in all cruelties, tortures, beatings. One has only
to reread a few pages of the Marquis de Sade to be easily convinced of
the fact. Is the Negro’s superiority real? Everyone knows that it is
not. But that is not what matters.  The prelogical thought of the
phobic has decided that such is the case.24 Another woman developed a
Negrophobia after she had read J’irai cracher sur vos tombes. I tried
to demonstrate the irrationality of her position by pointing out to
her that victimized white women were as sick as the Negro. Besides, I
added, this was no case of black vengeance, as the title of the book
might seem to imply, because the author was a white man, Boris Vian. I
had to accept the futility of all such efforts. That young woman did
not want to listen. Anyone who has read the book will understand at
once the ambivalence her phobia revealed. I knew a Negro medical
student who would not dare to make a vaginal examination of any
patient in the gynecological clinic. He told me that one day he had
heard one of them say, “There’s a nigger in there. If he touches me,
I’ll slap his face. You never know with them. He must have great big
hands; and besides he’s sure to be rough.”  If one wants to understand
the racial situation psycho- analytically, not from a universal
viewpoint but as it is experienced by individual consciousnesses,
considerable importance must be given to sexual phenomena. In the case
of the Jew, one thinks of money and its cognates. In that of the
Negro, one thinks of sex.  Anti-Semitism can be rationalized on a
basic level. It is because he takes over the country that the Jew is a
danger. An acquaintance told me recently that although he was not an
anti-Semite he had been constrained to admit that the majority of Jews
whom he had known during the war had behaved very badly. I tried in
vain to get him to concede that such a statement was the fruit
24. To continue in Odier’s terminology, it would be more accurate to
say “paralogical”: “The term ‘paralogical’ might be suggested for the
regression of the neurotic adult.”  (Anxiety and Magic Thinking,
p. 118.)
of a determined desire to find the essence of the Jew wherever it
might exist.  On a clinical level, I am reminded of the story of the
young woman who suffered from a kind of tactile delirium, constantly
washing her hands and arms ever since the day a Jew had been
introduced to her.  Jean-Paul Sartre has made a masterful study of the
problem of anti-Semitism; let us try to determine what are the
constituents of Negrophobia. This phobia is to be found on an
instinctual, biological level. At the extreme, I should say that the
Negro, because of his body, impedes the closing of the postural schema
of the white man—at the point, naturally, at which the black man makes
his entry into the phenomenal world of the white man.  This is not the
place in which to state the conclusions I drew from studying the
influence exerted on the body by the appearance of another body. (Let
us assume, for example, that four fifteen-year- old boys, all more or
less athletic, are doing the high jump. One of them wins by jumping
four feet ten inches. Then a fifth boy arrives and tops the mark by a
half-inch. The four other bodies experience a destructuration.) What
is important to us here is to show that with the Negro the cycle of
the biological begins.25
25. It would indeed be interesting, on the basis of Lacan’s theory of
the mirror period, to investigate the extent to which the imago of his
fellow built up in the young white at the usual age would undergo an
imaginary aggression with the appearance of the Negro. When one has
grasped the mechanism described by Lacan, one can have no further
doubt that the real Other for the white man is and will continue to be
the black man. And conversely. Only for the white man The Other is
perceived on the level of the body image, absolutely as the
not-self—that is, the unidentifiable, the unassimilable. For the black
man, as we have shown, historical and economic realities come into the
picture. “The subject’s recognition of his image in the mirror,” Lacan
says, “is a phenomenon that is doubly significant for the analysis of
this stage: The phenomenon appears after six months, and the study of
it at that time shows in convincing fashion the tendencies that
currently constitute reality for the subject; the mirror image,
precisely because of these affinities, affords a good symbol of that
reality: of its affective value, illusory like the image, and of its
structure, as it reflects the human form.” (Encyclopédie française,
8–40, 9 and 10.)  We shall see that this discovery is basic: Every
time the subject sees his image and recognizes it, it is always in
some way “the mental oneness which is inherent in him” that he
acclaims. In mental pathology, for instance, when one examines
delirious hallucinations or interpretations, one always finds that
this self-image is respected.  In other words, there is a certain
structural harmony, a sum of the individual and of the constructions
through which he goes, at every stage of the psychotic behavior.
No anti-Semite, for example, would ever conceive of the idea of
castrating the Jew. He is killed or sterilized. But the Negro is
castrated. The penis, the symbol of manhood, is annihilated, which is
to say that it is denied. The difference between the two attitudes is
apparent. The Jew is attacked in his religious identity, in his
history, in his race, in his relations with his ancestors and
Aside from the fact that this fidelity might be attributed to
affective content, there still remains evidence that it would be
unscientific to misconstrue. Whenever there is a psychotic belief,
there is a reproduction of self. It is especially in the period of
anxiety and suspicion described by Dide and Guiraud that The Other
takes a hand.  At such times it is not surprising to find the Negro in
the guise of satyr or murderer.  But in the stage of systematization,
when the conviction is being developed, there is no longer room for a
stranger. In extreme cases, moreover, I should not hesitate to say
that the theme of the Negro in certain deliriums (when it is not
central) ranks with other phenomena such as zooscopy.a Lhermitte has
described the liberation of the body image. This is what is clinically
called heautophany or heautoscopy.b The abruptness with which this
phenomenon occurs, Lhermitte says, is inordinately strange. It occurs
even among normal persons (Goethe, Taine, etc.). I contend that for
the Antillean the mirror hallucination is always neutral. When
Antilleans tell me that they have experienced it, I always ask the
same question: “What color were you?” Invariably they reply: “I had no
color.” What is more, in hypnagogic hallucinations and in what, by
derivation from Duhamel, is called “salavinization,”c the same
procedure is repeated. It is not I as a Negro who acts, thinks, and is
praised to the skies.  In addition, I suggest that those who are
interested in such questions read some of the compositions written in
French by Antillean children between the ages of ten and
fourteen. Given as a theme “My Feelings Before I Went on Vacation,”
they reacted like real little Parisians and produced such things as,
“I like vacation because then I can run through the fields, breathe
fresh air, and come home with rosy cheeks.” It is apparent that one
would hardly be mistaken in saying that the Antillean does not
altogether apprehend the fact of his being a Negro. I was perhaps
thirteen when for the first time I saw Senegalese soldiers. All I knew
about them was what I had heard from veterans of the First World War:
“They attack with the bayonet, and, when that doesn’t work, they just
punch their way through the machine-gun fire with their
fists. . . . They cut off heads and collect human ears.”  These
Senegalese were in transit in Martinique, on their way from Guiana. I
scoured the streets eagerly for a sight of their uniforms, which had
been described to me: red scarfs and belts. My father went to the
trouble of collecting two of them, whom he brought home and who had
the family in raptures. It was the same thing in school.  My
mathematics teacher, a lieutenant in the reserve who had been in
command of a unit of Senegalese troopers in 1914, used to make us
shiver with his anecdotes: “When they are praying they must never be
disturbed, because then the officers just cease to exist. They’re
lions in a battle, but you have to respect their habits.”  There is no
reason now to be surprised that Mayotte Capécia dreamed of herself as
pink and white: I should say that that was quite normal.  It may
perhaps be objected that if the white man is subject to the
elaboration of the imago of his peer, an analogous phenomenon should
occur in the Antillean, visual perception being the sketch for such an
elaboration. But to say this is to forget that in the Antilles
perception always occurs on the level of the imaginary.
with his posterity; when one sterilizes a Jew, one cuts off the
source; every time that a Jew is persecuted, it is the whole race that
is persecuted in his person. But it is in his corporeality that the
Negro is attacked. It is as a concrete personality that he is
lynched. It is as an actual being that he is a threat. The Jewish
menace is replaced by the fear of the sexual potency of the Negro.
O. Mannoni said: An argument widely used by racialists against those
who do not share their convictions is worthy of mention for its
revealing character. “What,” they say, “if you had a daughter, do you
mean to say that you would marry her to a negro?” I have seen people
who appeared to have no racialist bias lose all critical sense when
confronted with this kind of question. The reason is that such an
argument disturbs certain uneasy feelings in them (more exactly,
incestuous feelings) and they turn to racialism as a defence
reaction.26
It is in white terms that one perceives one’s fellows. People will say
of someone, for instance, that he is “very black”; there is nothing
surprising, within a family, in hearing a mother remark that “X is the
blackest of my children”—it means that X is the least white. I can
only repeat the observation of a European acquaintance to whom I had
explained this: in terms of people, it is nothing but a mystification.
Let me point out once more that every Antillean expects all the others
to perceive him in terms of the essence of the white man. In the
Antilles, just as in France, one comes up against the same myth; a
Parisian says, “He is black but he is very intelligent”; a Martinican
expresses himself no differently. During the Second World War,
teachers went from Guadeloupe to Fort-de-France to correct the
examinations of candidates for the baccalaureate, and, driven by
curiosity, I went to the hotel where they were staying, simply in
order to see Monsieur B., a philosophy teacher who was supposed to be
remarkably black; as the Martinicans say, not without a certain irony,
he was “blue.” One family in particular has an excellent reputation:
“They’re very black, but they’re all quite nice.” One of them, in
fact, is a piano teacher and a former student at the Conservatoire in
Paris, another is a teacher of natural science in the girls’ academy,
etc. The father was given to walking up and down his balcony every
evening at sunset; after a certain time of night, it was always said,
he became invisible. Of another family, who lived in the country, it
was said that on nights when there was a power failure the children
had to laugh so that their parents would know that they were there. On
Mondays, very carefully got up in their white linen suits, certain
Martinican officials, in the local figure of speech, “looked like
prunes in a bowl of milk.”  a. Hallucinations of
animals. (Translator’s note.)  b. The vivid psychological awareness
and examination of one’s own internal organs as if they were outside
oneself—an extreme hypochondria. (Translator’s note.)  c. See note 52.
26. [Dominique] O. Mannoni, Prospero and Caliban: The Psychology of
Colonization (New York, Praeger, 1964), p. 111, note 1.
Before we go further, it seems important to make this point: Granted
that unconscious tendencies toward incest exist, why should these
tendencies emerge more particularly with respect to the Negro? In what
way, taken as an absolute, does a black son-in-law differ from a white
son-in-law? Is there not a reaction of unconscious tendencies in both
cases? Why not, for instance, conclude that the father revolts because
in his opinion the Negro will introduce his daughter into a sexual
universe for which the father does not have the key, the weapons, or
the attributes?  Every intellectual gain requires a loss in sexual
potential. The civilized white man retains an irrational longing for
unusual eras of sexual license, of orgiastic scenes, of unpunished
rapes, of unrepressed incest. In one way these fantasies respond to
Freud’s life instinct. Projecting his own desires onto the Negro, the
white man behaves “as if the Negro really had them. When it is a
question of the Jew, the problem is clear: He is suspect because he
wants to own the wealth or take over the positions of power.  But the
Negro is fixated at the genital; or at any rate he has been fixated
there. Two realms: the intellectual and the sexual. An erection on
Bodin’s Thinker is a shocking thought. One cannot decently “have a
hard on” everywhere. The Negro symbolizes the biological danger; the
Jew, the intellectual danger.  To suffer from a phobia of Negroes is
to be afraid of the biological. For the Negro is only biological. The
Negroes are animals. They go about naked. And God alone knows. . . .
Mannoni said further: “In his urge to identify the anthropoid apes,
Caliban, the Negroes, even the Jews with the mythological figures of
the satyrs, man reveals that there are sensitive spots in the human
soul at a level27 where thought becomes confused and where sexual
excitement is strangely linked with violence and aggressiveness.”28
Mannoni includes the Jew in his scale. I see nothing inappropriate
there. But here the Negro is the master. He is the specialist of this
matter: Whoever says rape says Negro.  27. When we consider the
responses given in waking-dream therapy we shall see that these
mythological figures, or “archetypes,” do reside very deep in the
human mind.  Whenever the individual plunges down, one finds the
Negro, whether concretely or symbolically.  28. Mannoni, op. cit.,
p. 111.
Over three or four years I questioned some 500 members of the white
race—French, German, English, Italian. I took advantage of a certain
air of trust, of relaxation; in each instance I waited until my
subject no longer hesitated to talk to me quite openly—that is, until
he was sure that he would not offend me. Or else, in the midst of
associational tests, I inserted the word Negro among some twenty
others. Almost 60 per cent of the replies took this form: Negro
brought forth biology, penis, strong, athletic, potent, boxer, Joe
Louis, Jesse Owens, Senegalese troops, savage, animal, devil, sin.
Senegalese soldier, used as the stimulus, evoked dreadful, bloody,
tough, strong.  It is interesting to note that one in fifty reacted to
the word Negro with Nazi or SS; when one knows the emotional meaning
of the SS image, one recognizes that the difference from the other
answers is negligible. Let me add that some Europeans helped me by
giving the test to their acquaintances: In such cases the proportion
went up notably. From this result one must acknowledge the effect of
my being a Negro: Unconsciously there was a certain reticence.  The
Negro symbolizes the biological. First of all, he enters puberty at
the age of nine and is a father at the age of ten; he is hot-blooded,
and his blood is strong; he is tough. As a white man remarked to me
not long ago, with a certain bitterness: “You all have strong
constitutions.” What a beautiful race—look at the
Senegalese. . . . Weren’t they called our Black Devils during the war?
. . . But they must be brutal. . . I just can’t see them putting those
big hands of theirs on my shoulders. I shudder at the mere thought of
it. . . . Well aware that in certain cases one must interpret by
opposites, I understand this extra-fragile woman: At bottom what she
wants most is to have the powerful Negro bruise her frail
shoulders. Sartre says that when one speaks the phrase “a young
Jewess,” there is an imaginary reek of rape and
pillage. . . . Conversely, we might say that the expression “a
handsome Negro” contains a “possible” allusion to similar phenomena. I
have always been struck by the speed with which “handsome young Negro”
turns into “young colt” or “stallion.”
In the film Mourning Becomes Electra, a good part of the plot is based
on sexual rivalry. Orin rebukes his sister, Vinnie, because she
admired the splendid naked natives of the South Seas. He cannot
forgive her for it.29 Analysis of the real is always difficult. An
investigator can choose between two attitudes toward his
subject. First, he can be satisfied only to describe, in the manner of
those anatomists who are all surprised when, in the midst of a
description of the tibia, they are asked how many fibular depressions
they have. That is because in their researches there is never a
question of themselves but of others. In the beginning of my medical
studies, after several nauseating sessions in the dissection room, I
asked an older hand how I could prevent such reactions. “My friend,
pretend you’re dissecting a cat, and everything will be all
right. . . .” Second, once he has described reality, the investigator
can make up his mind to change it. In principle, however, the decision
to describe seems naturally to imply a critical approach and therefore
a need to go farther toward some solution. Both authorized and
anecdotal literature have created too many stories about Negroes to be
suppressed. But putting them all together does not help us in our real
task, which is to disclose their mechanics. What matters for us is not
to collect facts and behavior, but to find their meaning. Here we can
refer to Jaspers, when he wrote: “Comprehension in depth of a single
instance will often enable us, phenomenologically, to apply this
understanding in general to innumerable cases. Often 29. Let us
remember, however, that the situation is ambiguous. Orin is also
jealous of his sister’s fiancé. On a psychoanalytic level, the film
may be described thus: Orin, who suffers from the
abandonment-neurosis, is fixated on his mother and is incapable of
making a real object investment of his libido. Observe, for instance,
his behavior toward the girl to whom he is supposedly engaged. Vinnie,
who for her part is fixated on their father, proves to Orin that their
mother is unfaithful. But let us not make any mistakes. Her action is
a bill of indictment (an introjective mechanism).  Supplied with the
evidence of the adultery, Orin kills his mother’s lover. In reaction
she commits suicide. Orin’s libido, which requires investment in the
same manner as before, turns toward Vinnie. In effect, through her
behavior and even through her physical appearance, Vinnie takes the
place of their mother. Consequently—and this is beautifully handled in
the film—Orin becomes an Oedipus in love with his sister. Hence it is
understandable that Orin storms lamentation and reproach at his sister
when she announces her marriage. But in his conflict with her fiancé
it is emotion, affectivity, that he battles; with the Negro, the
splendid natives, the conflict lies on a genital, biological level.
what one has once grasped is soon met again. What is important in
phenomenology is less the study of a large number of instances than
the intuitive and deep understanding of a few individual cases.”30 The
question that arises is this: Can the white man behave healthily
toward the black man and can the black man behave healthily toward the
white man?  A pseudo-question, some will say. But when we assert that
European culture has an imago of the Negro which is responsible for
all the conflicts that may arise, we do not go beyond reality.  In the
chapter on language we saw that on the screen the Negro faithfully
reproduces that imago. Even serious writers have made themselves its
spokesmen. So it was that Michel Cournot could write: The black man’s
sword is a sword. When he has thrust it into your wife, she has really
felt something. It is a revelation. In the chasm that it has left,
your little toy is lost. Pump away until the room is awash with your
sweat, you might as well just be singing. This is good-by. . . . Four
Negroes with their penises exposed would ﬁll a cathedral. They would
be unable to leave the building until their erections had subsided;
and in such close quarters that would not be a simple matter.  To be
comfortable without problems, they always have the open air. But then
they are faced with a constant insult: the palm tree, the breadfruit
tree, and so many other proud growths that would not slacken for an
empire, erect as they are for all eternity, and piercing heights that
are not easily reached at any price.31
When one reads this passage a dozen times and lets oneself go—that is,
when one abandons oneself to the movement of its images—one is no
longer aware of the Negro but only of a penis; the Negro is
eclipsed. He is turned into a penis. He is a penis. It is easy to
imagine what such descriptions can stimulate in a young girl in
Lyon. Horror? Lust? Not indifference, in any case. Now, what is the
truth? The average length of the penis among the
30. Karl Jaspers, Psychopathologie générde, French translation by
Kastler and Mendousse, p. 49.  31. Martinique (Pans, Collection
Metamorphoses, Gallimard, 1948), pp. 13–14.
black men of Africa, Dr. Pales says, rarely exceeds 120 millimeters
(4.6244 inches). Testut, in his Traité d’anatomie humaine, offers the
same figure for the European. But these are facts that persuade no
one. The white man is convinced that the Negro is a beast; if it is
not the length of the penis, then it is the sexual potency that
impresses him. Face to face with this man who is “different from
himself,” he needs to defend himself. In other words, to personify The
Other. The Other will become the mainstay of his preoccupa- tions and
his desires.32 The prostitute whom I mentioned earlier told me that
her hunt for Negroes dated from the time when she had been told this
story: One night a woman who was in bed with a Negro went mad; she
remained insane for two years, but then when she had been cured
refused to go to bed with anyone else. The prostitute did not know
what had driven the other woman mad. But she sought furiously to
reproduce the same situation, to discover this secret which was part
of the ineffable.  One must recognize that what she wanted was the
destruction, the dissolution, of her being on a sexual level. Every
experiment that she made with a Negro reinforced her limitations. This
delirium 32. Some writers have tried, thus accepting prejudices (in
the etymological sense of the word), to show why the white man does
not understand the sexual life of the Negro.  Thus one can find in De
Pédrals this passage, which, while it does nevertheless convey the
truth, still leaves aside the deep causes of white “opinion”: The
Negro child feels neither surprise nor shame at the facts of
reproduction, because he is told whatever he wants to know. It is
quite obvious, without having to fall back on the subtleties of
psychoanalysis, that this difference cannot help having an effect on
his way of thinking and hence on his way of acting. Since the sexual
act is presented to him as the most natural, indeed the most
commendable thing in view of the end that it pursues— impregnation—the
African will retain this outlook as long as he lives; while the
European, as long as he lives, will always unconsciously keep alive a
guilt complex that neither reason nor experience will ever succeed in
altogether dissipating. In this way the African is inclined to view
his sexual life as only a part of his physiological life, just like
eating, drinking, and sleeping. ... A conception of this kind, one
would suppose, precludes the distortions into which the European is
led in order to reconcile the conflicts of a tortured conscience, a
vacillating intellect, and a frustrated instinct. Hence the
fundamental difference is not at all of natures, or of constitutions,
but of conceptions; hence too the fact that the reproductive instinct,
stripped of the halo with which the monuments of our literature have
adorned it, is not at all the dominant element in the life of the
African as it is in our own, in spite of the statements of too many
students inclined to explain what they have seen by the sole method of
analyzing themselves. (Denis Pierre de Pédrals, La vie sexuelle en
Afrique noire, Paris, Payot, 1950, pp. 28–29.)  My italics—F.F.
of orgasm was unattainable. She could not experience it, so she
avenged herself by losing herself in speculation.  One thing must be
mentioned in this connection: A white woman who has had a Negro lover
finds it difficult to return to white men. Or so at least it is
believed, particularly by white men: “Who knows what ‘they’ can give a
woman?” Who indeed does know? Certainly “they” do not. On this subject
I cannot overlook this comment by Etiemble: Racial jealousy produces
the crimes of racism: To many white men, the black is simply that
marvelous sword which, once it has transﬁxed their wives, leaves them
forever transﬁgured. My statistical sources have been able to provide
me with no documentation on this point. I have, however, known some
Negroes; some white women who have had Negroes; and, ﬁnally, some
Negro women who have had white lovers. I have heard enough conﬁdences
from all of them to be able to deplore the fact that M. Cournot
applies his talents to the rejuvenation of a fable in which the white
man will always be able to ﬁnd a specious argument: shameful, dubious,
and thus doubly effective.33
An endless task, the cataloguing of reality. We accumulate facts, we
discuss them, but with every line that is written, with every
statement that is made, one has the feeling of incompleteness.
Attacking J.-P. Sartre, Gabriel d’Arbousier wrote: This anthology,
which puts Antilleans, Guianans, Senegalese, and Malagasies on the
same footing, creates a deplorable confusion. In this way it states
the cultural problem of the overseas countries by detaching it from
the historical and social reality of each of them, from the national
character- istics and the varying conditions imposed on each of them
by imperialist exploitation and oppression. Thus, when Sartre wrote,
“Simply by plunging into the depths of his memory as a former slave,
the black man asserts that suffering is the lot of man and that it is
no less undeserved on that account,” did he take into consideration
what that might mean for a Hova, a Moor, a Touareg, a Peul, or a Bantu
of the Congo or the Ivory Coast?34
33. “Sur le Martinique de M. Michel Cournot,” Les Temps Modernes,
February, 1950, p. 1505.  34. “Une dangereuse mystification: la
théorie de la négritude,” La Nouvelle Revue Critique, June, 1949.
The objection is valid. It applies to me as well. In the beginning I
wanted to confine myself to the Antilles. But, regardless of
consequences, dialectic took the upper hand and I was compelled to see
that the Antillean is first of all a Negro. Nevertheless, it would be
impossible to overlook the fact that there are Negroes whose
nationality is Belgian, French, English; there are also Negro
republics. How can one claim to have got hold of an essential when
such facts as these demand one’s recognition? The truth is that the
Negro race has been scattered, that it can no longer claim unity. When
Il Duce’s troops invaded Ethiopia, a movement of solidarity arose
among men of color. But, though one or two airplanes were sent from
America to the invaded country, not a single black man made any
practical move. The Negro has a country, he takes his place in a Union
or a Commonwealth. Every description should be put on the level of the
discrete phenomenon, but here again we are driven out to infinite
perspectives. In the universal situation of the Negro there is an
ambiguity, which is, however, resolved in his concrete existence. This
in a way places him beside the Jew. Against all the arguments I have
just cited, I come back to one fact: Wherever he goes, the Negro
remains a Negro.  In some countries the Negro has entered into the
culture. As we have already indicated, it would be impossible to
ascribe too much importance to the way in which white children
establish contact with the reality of the Negro. In the United States,
for example, even if he does not live in the South, where he naturally
encounters Negroes concretely, the white child is introduced to them
through the myth of Uncle Remus. (In France there is the parallel of
La Case de l’Oncle Tom—Uncle Tom’s Cabin.) Miss Sally’s and Marse
John’s little boy listens with a mixture of fear and admiration to the
tales of Br’er Rabbit. To Bernard Wolfe this ambivalence in the white
man is the dominant factor in the white American psychology. Relying
on the life of Joel Chandler Harris, Wolfe goes so far as to show that
the admiration corresponds to a certain identification of the white
man with the black. It is perfectly obvious what these stories are all
about. Br’er Rabbit gets into conflicts with almost all the other
animals in creation,
and naturally he is always the winner. These stories belong to the
oral tradition of the plantation Negroes. Therefore it is relatively
easy to recognize the Negro in his remarkably ironic and wary disguise
as a rabbit. In order to protect themselves against their own
unconscious masochism, which impels them to rapturous admiration of
the (black) rabbit’s prowess, the whites have tried to drain these
stories of their aggressive potential. This is how they have been able
to tell themselves that “the black man makes all the animals behave
like a lower order of human intelligence, the kind that the Negro
himself can understand. The black man naturally feels that he is in
closer touch with the ‘lower animals’ than with the white man, who is
so far superior to him in every respect.” Others have advanced the
theory, with straight faces, that these stories are not reactions to
the conditions imposed on the Negro in the United States but are
simply survivals of Africa.  Wolfe gives us the clue to such
interpretations:
On the basis of all the evidence, Br’er Rabbit is an animal because
the Negro must be an animal; the rabbit is an outlander because the
Negro must be branded as an outlander down to his chromosomes. Ever
since slavery began, his Christian and democratic guilt as a
slave-owner has led the southerner to describe the Negro as an animal,
an unchangeable African whose nature was determined as protoplasm by
his “African” genes. If the black man found himself relegated to the
Limbo of mankind, he was the victim not of Americans but of the
organic inferiority of his jungle ancestors.
So the southerner refused to see in these stories the aggression that
the Negro infused into them. But, Wolfe says, their compiler, Harris,
was a psychopath:
He was especially adept at this task because he was ﬁlled to the
bursting point with pathological racial obsessions over and above
those that tormented the South and, to a lesser degree, all of white
America. . . . Indeed, for Harris as well as for many other white
Americans, the Negro seemed to be in every respect the opposite of his
own anxious self: unworried, gregarious, voluble, muscularly relaxed,
never a victim of boredom, or
passive, unashamedly exhibitionistic, devoid of self-pity in his
condition of concentrated suffering, exuberant. . . .
But Harris always had the feeling of being handicapped.  Therefore
Wolfe sees him as frustrated—but not after the classic schema: It was
the very essence of the man that made it impossible for him to exist
in the “natural” way of the Negro. No one had barred him from it; it
was just impossible for him. Not prohibited, but unrealizable. And it
is because the white man feels himself frustrated by the Negro that he
seeks in turn to frustrate the black, binding him with prohibitions of
all kinds. And here again the white man is the victim of his
unconscious. Let us listen again to Wolfe: The Remus stories are a
monument to the ambivalence of the South. Harris, the archetype of the
southerner, went in search of the Negro’s love and claimed that he had
won it (the grin of Uncle Remus).35 But at the same time he was
striving for the Negro’s hatred (Br’er Rabbit), and he reveled in it,
in an unconscious orgy of masochism—very possibly punishing himself
for not being the black man, the stereotype of the black man, the
prodigious “giver.” Is it not possible that the white South, and
perhaps the majority of white America, often behave in the same way in
their relations with the Negro?
There is a quest for the Negro, the Negro is in demand, one cannot get
along without him, he is needed, but only if he is made palatable in a
certain way. Unfortunately, the Negro knocks down the system and
breaks the treaties. Will the white man rise in resistance? No, he
will adjust to the situation. This fact, Wolfe says, explains why many
books dealing with racial problems become best-sellers.36 Certainly no
one is compelled to read stories of Negroes who make love to white
women (Deep are the Roots, Strange Fruit, Uncle Remus), of whites who
learn that they are Negroes (Kingsblood Royal, Lost Boundaries, Uncle
35. The character of Uncle Remus was created by Harris. The figure of
this gentle, melancholy old slave with his eternal grin is one of the
most typical images of the American Negro.  36. See also the many
Negro films of recent years. And yet all the producers were white.
Remus), of white men strangled by black men (Native Son, If He Hollers
Let Him Go, Uncle Remus). . . . We can package the Negro’s grin and
market it on a grand scale in our popular culture as a cloak for this
masochism: The caress sweetens the blow. And, as Uncle Remus shows,
here the interplay of the races is in large part unconscious. The
white man is no more aware of his masochism when he is being
titillated by the subtle content of the stereotyped grin than the
Negro is aware of his sadism when he transforms the stereotype into a
cultural bludgeon. Perhaps less.37
In the United States, as we can see, the Negro makes stories in which
it becomes possible for him to work off his aggression; the white
man’s unconscious justifies this aggression and gives it worth by
turning it on himself, thus reproducing the classic schema of
masochism.38 We can now stake out a marker. For the majority of white
men the Negro represents the sexual instinct (in its raw state).  The
Negro is the incarnation of a genital potency beyond all moralities
and prohibitions. The women among the whites, by a genuine process of
induction, invariably view the Negro as the keeper of the impalpable
gate that opens into the realm of orgies, of bacchanals, of delirious
sexual sensations. . . . We have shown that reality destroys all these
beliefs. But they all rest on the level of the imagined, in any case
on that of a paralogism. The white man who ascribes a malefic
influence to the black is regressing on the intellectual level, since,
as we have shown, his perception is based on a mental age of eight
years (the comic books). Is there not a concurrent regression to and
fixation at pregenital levels of sexual development? Self-castration?
(The Negro is taken as a terrifying penis.) Passivity justifying
itself by the recognition of the superiority of the black man in terms
of sexual capacity? It
37. Bernard Wolfe, “L’oncle Rémus et son lapin,” Les Temps Modernes,
May, 1949, pp. 898 ff.  38. It is usual to be told in the United
States, when one calls for the real freedom of the Negro: “That’s all
they’re waiting for, to jump our women.” Since the white man behaves
in an offensive manner toward the Negro, he recognizes that in the
Negro’s place he would have no mercy on his oppressors. Therefore it
is not surprising to see that he identifies himself with the Negro:
white “hot-jazz” orchestras, white blues and spiritual singers, white
authors writing novels in which the Negro proclaims his grievances,
whites in blackface.
is obvious what a variety of questions it would be interesting to
raise. There are, for instance, men who go to “houses” in order to be
beaten by Negroes; passive homosexuals who insist on black partners.
Another solution might be this: There is first of all a sadistic
aggression toward the black man, followed by a guilt complex because
of the sanction against such behavior by the democratic culture of the
country in question. This aggression is then tolerated by the Negro:
whence masochism. But, I shall be told, your schema is invalid: It
does not contain the elements of classic masochism.  Perhaps, indeed,
this situation is not classic. In any event, it is the only way in
which to explain the masochistic behavior of the white man.  From a
heuristic point of view, without attributing any reality to it, I
should like to propose an explanation of the fantasy: A Negro is
raping me. From the work of Helene Deutsch39 and Marie Bonaparte,40
both of whom took up and in a way carried to their ultimate
conclusions Freud’s ideas on female sexuality, we have learned that,
alternatively clitoral and clitoral-vaginal and finally purely
vaginal, a woman—having retained, more or less commingled, her libido
in a passive conception and her aggression, having surmounted her
double Oedipus complex—proceeds through her biological and
psychological growth and arrives at the assumption of her role, which
is achieved by neuropsychic integration. We cannot, however, ignore
certain failures or certain fixations.  Corresponding to the clitoral
stage there is an active Oedipus complex, although, according to Marie
Bonaparte, it is not a sequence but a coexistence of the active and
the passive. The desexualization of aggression in a girl is less
complete than in a boy.41 The clitoris is perceived as a diminished
penis, but, going beyond the concrete, the girl clings only to the
quality. She apprehends reality in qualitative terms. In her as in the
little boy
39. The Psychology of Women (New York, Grune and Stratton, 1944–1945).
40. Female Sexuality (New York, International Universities Press,
1953).  41. Marie Bonaparte, “De la sexualité de la femme,” in Revue
Française de Psychanalyse, April–June, 1949.
there will be impulses directed at the mother; she too would like to
disembowel the mother.  Our question, then, is whether, side by side
with the final achievement of femininity, there is not some survival
of this infantile fantasy. “Too strong an aversion in a woman against
the rough games of men is, furthermore, a suspicious indication of
male protest and excessive bisexuality. It is possible that such a
woman will be clitoral.”42 Here is my own view of the matter. First
the little girl sees a sibling rival beaten by the father, a libidinal
aggressive. At this stage (between the ages of five and nine), the
father, who is now the pole of her libido, refuses in a way to take up
the aggression that the little girl’s unconscious demands of him. At
this point, lacking support, this free-floating aggression requires an
investment. Since the girl is at the age in which the child begins to
enter the folklore and the culture along roads that we know, the Negro
becomes the predestined depositary of this aggression. If we go
farther into the labyrinth, we discover that when a woman lives the
fantasy of rape by a Negro, it is in some way the fulfillment of a
private dream, of an inner wish.  Accomplishing the phenomenon of
turning against self, it is the woman who rapes herself. We can find
clear proof of this in the fact that it is commonplace for women,
during the sexual act, to cry to their partners: “Hurt me!” They are
merely expressing this idea: Hurt me as I would hurt me if I were in
your place. The fantasy of rape by a Negro is a variation of this
emotion: “I wish the Negro would rip me open as I would have ripped a
woman open.” Those who grant our conclusions on the psychosexual- ity
of the white woman may ask what we have to say about the woman of
color. I know nothing about her. What I can offer, at the very least,
is that for many women in the Antilles—the type that I shall call the
all-but-whites—the aggressor is symbolized by the Senegalese type, or
in any event by an inferior (who is so considered).  The Negro is the
genital. Is this the whole story? Unfortunately not. The Negro is
something else. Here again we find the Jew.
42. Ibid., p. 180.
He and I may be separated by the sexual question, but we have one
point in common. Both of us stand for Evil. The black man more so, for
the good reason that he is black. Is not whiteness in symbols always
ascribed in French to Justice, Truth, Virginity?  I knew an Antillean
who said of another Antillean, “His body is black, his language is
black, his soul must be black too.” This logic is put into daily
practice by the white man. The black man is the symbol of Evil and
Ugliness.  Henri Barak, in a recent work on psychiatry,43 described
what he termed the anti-Semitic psychoses.  In one of my patients the
vulgarity and the obscenity of his ravings transcended all that the
French language could furnish and took the form of obvious
pederastic44 allusions with which the patient deﬂected his inner
hatred in transferring it to the scapegoat of the Jews, calling for
them to be slaughtered. Another patient, suffering from a ﬁt of
delirium aggravated by the events of 1940, had such violent
anti-Semitic feelings that one day in a hotel, suspecting the man in
the next room to be a Jew, he broke into his room during the night to
murder him. . . .  A third patient, with a physically weak
constitution—he suffered from chronic colitis—was humiliated by his
poor health and ultimately ascribed it to poisoning by means of a
“bacterial injection” given to him by one of the male nurses in an
institution where he had been earlier—nurses who were anticlerical and
Communists, he said, and who had wanted to punish him for his Catholic
convictions and utterances. Now that he was in our hospital and safe
from “a crew of union men,” he felt that he was between Scylla and
Charybdis, since he was in the hands of a Jew. By deﬁnition this Jew
could be only a thief, a monster, a man capable of any and all crimes.
43. Precis de psychiatrie (Paris, Masson, 1950), p. 371.  44. Let me
observe at once that I had no opportunity to establish the overt
presence of homosexuality in Martinique. This must be viewed as the
result of the absence of the Oedipus complex in the Antilles. The
schema of homosexuality is well enough known. We should not overlook,
however, the existence of what are called there “men dressed like
women” or “godmothers.” Generally they wear shirts and skirts. But I
am convinced that they lead normal sex lives. They can take a punch
like any “he-man” and they are not impervious to the allures of
women—fish and vegetable merchants. In Europe, on the other hand, I
have known several Martinicans who became homosexuals, always
passive. But this was by no means a neurotic homosexuality: For them
it was a means to a livelihood, as pimping is for others.
Confronted by such a tide of aggression, this Jew will have to take a
stand. Here is all the ambiguity that Sartre describes.  Certain pages
of Anti-Semite and Jew are the finest that I have ever read. The
finest, because the problem discussed in them grips us in our guts.45
The Jew, authentic or inauthentic, is struck down by the fist of the
“salaud.” His situation is such that everything he does is bound to
turn against him. For naturally the Jew prefers himself, and it
happens that he forgets his Jewishness, or hides it, hides himself
from it. That is because he has then admitted the validity of the
Aryan system. There are Good and Evil. Evil is Jewish.  Everything
Jewish is ugly. Let us no longer be Jews. I am no longer a Jew. Down
with the Jews. In such circumstances, these are the most
aggressive. Like that patient of Baruk who had a persecution complex
and who, seeing the doctor one day wearing his yellow star, grabbed
him by the lapel and shouted: “I, sir, am a Frenchman.” Or this woman:
“Making rounds in the ward of my colleague, Dr. Daday, I encountered a
Jewish patient who had been the target of taunts and insults from her
fellow-patients. A non-Jewish patient had gone to her defense. The
Jewish patient thereupon turned on the woman who had defended the
Jews,
45. I am thinking particularly of this passage: Such then is this
haunted man, condemned to make his choice of himself on the basis of
false problems and in a false situation, deprived of the metaphysical
sense by the hostility of the society that surrounds him, driven to a
rationalism of despair. His life is nothing but a long flight from
others and from himself. He has been alienated even from his own body;
his emotional life has been cut in two; he has been reduced to
pursuing the impossible dream of universal brotherhood in a world that
rejects him.  Whose is the fault? It is our eyes that reflect to him
the unacceptable image that he wishes to dissimulate. It is our words
and our gestures—all our words and all our gestures—our anti-Semitism,
but equally our condescending liberalism—that have poisoned him. It is
we who constrain him to choose to be a Jew whether through flight from
himself or through self-assertion; it is we who force him into the
dilemma of Jewish authenticity or inauthenticity. . . . This species
that bears witness for essential humanity better than any other
because it was born of secondary reactions within the body of
humanity—this quintessence of man, disgraced, uprooted, destined from
the start to either inauthenticity or martyrdom. In this situation
there is not one of us who is not totally guilty and even criminal;
the Jewish blood that the Nazis shed falls on all our heads.
(pp. 135–136.)
hurling every possible anti-Semitic calumny at her and demanding that
that Jewess be got rid of.”46 This is a fine example of a reactional
phenomenon. In order to react against anti-Semitism, the Jew turns
himself into an anti- Semite. This is what Sartre presents in The
Reprieve, in which Birnenschatz finally acts out his disavowal with an
intensity that borders on delirium. We shall see that the word is not
too strong.  Americans who go to Paris are amazed to see so many white
women accompanied by Negroes. In New York, Simone de Beauvoir went for
a walk with Richard Wright and was rebuked in the street by an old
lady. Sartre said: Here it is the Jew, somewhere else it is the
Negro. What is essential is a scapegoat. Baruk says nothing different:
“Release from hate complexes will be accomplished only if mankind
learns to renounce the scapegoat complex.”  Fault, Guilt, refusal of
guilt, paranoia—one is back in homosexual territory. In sum, what
others have described in the case of the Jew applies perfectly in that
of the Negro.47 Good-Evil, Beauty-Ugliness, White-Black: such are the
char- acteristic pairings of the phenomenon that, making use of an
expression of Dide and Guiraud, we shall call “manicheism delirium.”48
Seeing only one type of Negro, assimilating anti-Semitism to
Negrophobia, these seem to be the errors of analysis being committed
here. Someone to whom I was talking about this book asked me what I
expected to come of it. Ever since Sartre’s decisive essay, What Is
Literature?, originally in Situations II, literature has been
committed more and more to its sole really contemporary task, which is
to persuade the group to progress to reflection and mediation: This
book, it is hoped, will be a mirror with a
46. Baruk, Précis de psychiatrie, pp. 372–373.  47. This is what Marie
Bonaparte wrote in Myths de guerre, No. 1, p. 145: “The anti-Semite
projects on to the Jew, ascribes to the Jew all his own more or less
unconscious bad instincts. . . . Thus, in ridding himself of them by
heaping them on the shoulders of the Jew, he has purged himself of
them in his own eyes and sees himself in shining purity. The Jew thus
lends himself magnificently to a projection of the Devil. . . . The
Negro in the United States assumes the same function of fixation.”
48. Psychiatrie du médecin praticien (Paris, Masson, 1922), p. 164.
progressive infrastructure, in which it will be possible to discern
the Negro on the road to disalienation.  When there is no longer a
“human minimum,” there is no culture. It matters very little to me to
know that “Muntu means Power” among the Bantu49—or at least it might
have interested me if certain details had not held me back. What use
are reflections on Bantu ontology when one reads elsewhere: When
75,000 black miners went on strike in 1946, the state police forced
them back to work by ﬁring on them with riﬂes and charging with ﬁxed
bayonets. Twenty-ﬁve were killed and thousands were wounded.  At that
time Smuts was the head of the government and a delegate to the Peace
Conference. On farms owned by white men, the black laborers live
almost like serfs. They may have their families with them, but no man
is allowed to leave the farm without the permission of his master.  If
he does so, the police are notiﬁed and he is brought back by force and
whipped. . . .  Under the Act for Native Administration, the
governor-general, as the supreme authority, has autocratic powers over
the Africans. By proclamation he may arrest and detain any African
deemed dangerous to public order.  He may forbid meetings of more than
ten persons in any native residential area. The writ of habeas corpus
is not available to Africans. Mass arrests without warrants are made
constantly.  The nonwhite populations of South Africa are at an
impasse. All the modem modes of slavery make it impossible for them to
ﬂee from this scourge. In the case of the African especially, white
society has smashed his old world without giving him a new one. It has
destroyed the traditional tribal foundations of his existence and it
blocks the road of the future after having closed the road of the
past. . . .  Apartheid aspires to banish the Negro from participating
in modern history as a free and independent force.50
I apologize for this long quotation, but it permits me to bring out
some possibilities of black men’s mistakes. Alioune Diop, for example,
in his introduction to La philosophic bantoue, remarks that Bantu
ontology knows nothing of the metaphysical misery 49. Reverend
Tempels, La philosophie bantoue.  50. I. R. Skine, “Apartheid en
Afrique du Sud,” Les Temps Modernes, July, 1950.
of Europe. The inference that he draws from this is none the less
dangerous: The double question that arises is to determine whether the
genius of the black man should cultivate what constitutes his
individuality, that youth of spirit, that innate respect for man and
creation, that joy in living, that peace which is not a disﬁgurement
of man imposed and suffered through moral hygiene, but a natural
harmony with the happy majesty of life. . . .  One wonders too what
the Negro can contribute to the modern world. . . .  What we can say
is that the very idea of culture conceived as a revolutionary will is
as contrary to our genius as the very idea of progress. Progress would
have haunted our consciousness only if we had grievances against life,
which is a gift of nature.
Be careful! It is not a matter of finding Being in Bantu thought, when
Bantu existence subsists on the level of nonbeing, of the
imponderable.51 It is quite true that Bantu philosophy is not going to
open itself to understanding through a revolutionary will: But it is
precisely in that degree in which Bantu society, being a closed
society, does not contain that substitution of the exploiter for the
ontological relations of Forces. Now we know that Bantu society no
longer exists. And there is nothing ontological about
segregation. Enough of this rubbish.  For some time there has been
much talk about the Negro. A little too much. The Negro would like to
be dropped, so that he may regroup his forces, his authentic forces.
One day he said: “My negritude is neither a tower. . . .”  And someone
came along to Hellenize him, to make an Orpheus of him . . . this
Negro who is looking for the universal. He is looking for the
universal! But in June, 1950, the hotels of Paris refused to rent
rooms to Negro pilgrims. Why? Purely and simply because their
Anglo-Saxon customers (who are rich and who, as everyone knows, hate
Negroes) threatened to move out.  The Negro is aiming for the
universal, but on the screen his Negro essence, his Negro “nature,” is
kept intact:
51. See, for example, Cry, the Beloved Country, by Alan Paton.
always a servant always obsequious and smiling me never steal, me
never lie eternally ‘sho’ good eatin’. . . .
The Negro is universalizing himself, but at the Lycée Saint- Louis, in
Paris, one was thrown out: He had had the impudence to read Engels.
There is a drama there, and the black intellectuals are running the
risk of being trapped by it.  What? I have barely opened eyes that had
been blindfolded, and someone already wants to drown me in the
universal? What about the others? Those who “have no voice,” those who
“have no spokesman.” . . . I need to lose myself in my negritude, to
see the fires, the segregations, the repressions, the rapes, the
discrimi- nations, the boycotts. We need to put our fingers on every
sore that mottles the black uniform.  One can already imagine Alioune
Diop wondering what place the black genius will have in the universal
chorus. It is my belief that a true culture cannot come to life under
present conditions.  It will be time enough to talk of the black
genius when the man has regained his rightful place.  Once again I
come back to Césaire; I wish that many black intellectuals would turn
to him for their inspiration. I must repeat to myself too: “And more
than anything, my body, as well as my soul, do not allow yourself to
cross your arms like a sterile spectator, for life is not a spectacle,
for a sea of sorrows is not a stage, for a man who cries out is not a
dancing bear. . . .”  Continuing to take stock of reality, endeavoring
to ascertain the instant of symbolic crystallization, I very naturally
found myself on the threshold of Jungian psychology. European
civilization is characterized by the presence, at the heart of what
Jung calls the collective unconscious, of an archetype: an expression
of the bad instincts, of the darkness inherent in every ego, of the
uncivilized savage, the Negro who slumbers in every white man.  And
Jung claims to have found in uncivilized peoples the same psychic
structure that his diagram portrays. Personally, I think
that Jung has deceived himself. Moreover, all the peoples that he has
known—whether the Pueblo Indians of Arizona or the Negroes of Kenya in
British East Africa—have had more or less traumatic contacts with the
white man. I said earlier that in his Salavinizations52 the young
Antillean is never black; and I have tried to show what this
phenomenon corresponds to. Jung locates the collective unconscious in
the inherited cerebral matter. But the collective unconscious, without
our having to fall back on the genes, is purely and simply the sum of
prejudices, myths, collective attitudes of a given group. It is taken
for granted, to illustrate, that the Jews who have settled in Israel
will produce in less than a hundred years a collective unconscious
different from the ones that they had had before 1945 in the countries
which they were forced to leave.  On the level of philosophic
discussion, this would be the place to bring up the old problem of
instinct and habit: instinct, which is inborn (we know how we must
view this “innateness”), invariable, specific; habit, which is
acquired. On this level one would have only to demonstrate that Jung
has confused instinct and habit.  In his view, in fact, the collective
unconscious is bound up with the cerebral structure, the myths and
archetypes are permanent engrams of the race. I hope I have shown that
nothing of the sort is the case and that in fact the collective
unconscious is cultural, which means acquired. Just as a young
mountaineer of the Carpathians, under the physico-chemical conditions
of his country, is likely to develop a myxedema, so a Negro like René
Maran, who has lived in France and breathed and eaten the myths and
prejudices of racist Europe, and assimilated the collective
unconscious of that Europe, will be able, if he stands outside
himself, to express only his hatred of the Negro. One must move
softly, and there is a whole drama in having to lay bare little by
little the workings of processes that are seen in their totality. Will
this statement be susceptible of understanding? In Europe, the black
man is the symbol of Evil. One must move softly, I know, but it is not
52. Salavin is a character created by Georges Duhamel, and who is the
prototype of the ineffectual man: a mediocrity, a creature of fleeting
impulse, and always the victim of his own chimeras. (Translator’s
note.)
easy. The torturer is the black man, Satan is black, one talks of
shadows, when one is dirty one is black—whether one is thinking of
physical dirtiness or of moral dirtiness. It would be astonishing, if
the trouble were taken to bring them all together, to see the vast
number of expressions that make the black man the equivalent of
sin. In Europe, whether concretely or symbolically, the black man
stands for the bad side of the character. As long as one cannot
understand this fact, one is doomed to talk in circles about the
“black problem.” Blackness, darkness, shadow, shades, night, the
labyrinths of the earth, abysmal depths, blacken someone’s reputation;
and, on the other side, the bright look of innocence, the white dove
of peace, magical, heavenly light. A magnificent blond child—how much
peace there is in that phrase, how much joy, and above all how much
hope! There is no comparison with a magnificent black child:
literally, such a thing is unwonted. Just the same, I shall not go
back into the stories of black angels. In Europe, that is to say, in
every civilized and civilizing country, the Negro is the symbol of
sin. The archetype of the lowest values is represented by the
Negro. And it is exactly the same antinomy that is encountered in
Desoille’s waking dreams. How else is one to explain, for example,
that the unconscious representing the base and inferior traits is
colored black? With Desoille, in whose work the situation is (without
any intention of a pun) clearer, it is always a matter of descending
or climbing. When I descend I see caverns, grottoes where savages
dance. Let there be no mistake, above all. For example, in one of the
waking-dream sessions that Desoille describes for us, we find Gauls in
a cave. But, it must be pointed out, the Gaul is a simple fellow. A
Gaul in a cave, it is almost like a family picture—a result, perhaps,
of “our ancestors, the Gauls.” I believe it is necessary to become a
child again in order to grasp certain psychic realities. This is where
Jung was an innovator: He wanted to go back to the childhood of the
world, but he made a remarkable mistake: He went back only to the
childhood of Europe.  In the remotest depth of the European
unconscious an inordinately black hollow has been made in which the
most immoral impulses, the most shameful desires lie dormant. And
as every man climbs up toward whiteness and light, the European has
tried to repudiate this uncivilized self, which has attempted to
defend itself. When European civilization came into contact with the
black world, with those savage peoples, everyone agreed: Those Negroes
were the principle of evil.  Jung consistently identifies the foreign
with the obscure, with the tendency to evil: He is perfectly
right. This mechanism of projection—or, if one prefers,
transference—has been described by classic psychoanalysis. In the
degree to which I find in myself something unheard-of, something
reprehensible, only one solution remains for me: to get rid of it, to
ascribe its origin to someone else.  In this way I eliminate a short
circuit that threatens to destroy my equilibrium. One must be careful
with waking dreams in the early sessions, because it is not good if
the obscenity emerges too soon.  The patient must come to understand
the workings of sublimation before he makes any contact with the
unconscious. If a Negro comes up in the first session, he must be
removed at once; to that end, suggest a stairway or a rope to the
patient, or propose that he let himself be carried off in a
helicopter. Infallibly, the Negro will stay in his hole. In Europe the
Negro has one function: that of symbolizing the lower emotions, the
baser inclinations, the dark side of the soul. In the collective
unconscious of homo occidentalis, the Negro—or, if one prefers, the
color black—symbolizes evil, sin, wretchedness, death, war,
famine. All birds of prey are black.  In Martinique, whose collective
unconscious makes it a European country, when a “blue” Negro—a
coal-black one—comes to visit, one reacts at once: “What bad luck is
he bringing?”  The collective unconscious is not dependent on cerebral
heredity; it is the result of what I shall call the unreflected
imposition of a culture. Hence there is no reason to be surprised when
an Antillean exposed to waking-dream therapy relives the same
fantasies as a European. It is because the Antillean partakes of the
same collective unconscious as the European.  If what has been said
thus far is grasped, this conclusion may be stated: It is normal for
the Antillean to be anti-Negro. Through the collective unconscious the
Antillean has taken over all the archetypes belonging to the
European. The anima of the Antillean
Negro is almost always a white woman. In the same way, the animus of
the Antilleans is always a white man. That is because in the works of
Anatole France, Balzac, Bazin, or any of the rest of “our” novelists,
there is never a word about an ethereal yet ever present black woman
or about a dark Apollo with sparkling eyes. . . . But I too am guilty,
here I am talking of Apollo! There is no help for it: I am a white
man. For unconsciously I distrust what is black in me, that is, the
whole of my being.  I am a Negro—but of course I do not know it,
simply because I am one. When I am at home my mother sings me French
love songs in which there is never a word about Negroes. When I
disobey, when I make too much noise, I am told to “stop acting like a
nigger.”  Somewhat later I read white books and little by little I
take into myself the prejudices, the myths, the folklore that have
come to me from Europe. But I will not accept them all, since certain
prejudices do not apply in the Antilles. Anti-Semitism, for instance,
does not exist there, for there are no Jews, or virtually
none. Without turning to the idea of collective catharsis, it would be
easy for me to show that, without thinking, the Negro selects himself
as an object capable of carrying the burden of original sin.  The
white man chooses the black man for this function, and the black man
who is white also chooses the black man. The black Antillean is the
slave of this cultural imposition. After having been the slave of the
white man, he enslaves himself. The Negro is in every sense of the
word a victim of white civilization. It is not surprising that the
artistic creations of Antillean poets bear no special watermark: These
men are white. To come back to psychopathology, let us say that the
Negro lives an ambiguity that is extraordinarily neurotic. At the age
of twenty—at the time, that is, when the collective unconscious has
been more or less lost, or is resistant at least to being raised to
the conscious level—the Antillean recognizes that he is living an
error. Why is that? Quite simply because—and this is very
important—the Antillean has recognized himself as a Negro, but, by
virtue of an ethical transit, he also feels (collective unconscious)
that one is a Negro to the degree to which one is wicked, sloppy,
malicious,
instinctual. Everything that is the opposite of these Negro modes of
behavior is white. This must be recognized as the source of
Negrophobia in the Antillean. In the collective unconscious, black =
ugliness, sin, darkness, immorality. In other words, he is Negro who
is immoral. If I order my life like that of a moral man, I simply am
not a Negro. Whence the Martinican custom of saying of a worthless
white man that he has “a nigger soul.” Color is nothing, I do not even
notice it, I know only one thing, which is the purity of my conscience
and the whiteness of my soul. “Me white like snow,” the other said.
Cultural imposition is easily accomplished in Martinique. The ethical
transit encounters no obstacle. But the real white man is waiting for
me. As soon as possible he will tell me that it is not enough to try
to be white, but that a white totality must be achieved. It is only
then that I shall recognize the betrayal.— Let us conclude. An
Antillean is made white by the collective unconscious, by a large part
of his individual unconscious, and by the virtual totality of his
mechanism of individuation. The color of his skin, of which there is
no mention in Jung, is black. All the inabilities to understand are
born of this blunder.  While he was in France, studying for his degree
in literature, Césaire “discovered his cowardice.” He knew that it was
cowardice, but he could never say why. He felt that it was ridiculous,
idiotic, I might say even unhealthy, but in none of his writings can
one trace the mechanism of that cowardice. That is because what was
necessary was to shatter the current situation and to try to apprehend
reality with the soul of a child. The Negro in the streetcar was funny
and ugly. Certainly Césaire laughed at him.  That was because there
was nothing in common between himself and this authentic Negro. A
handsome Negro is introduced to a group of white Frenchmen. If it is a
group of intellectuals, we can be sure that the Negro will try to
assert himself. He will insist that attention be paid not to the color
of his skin but to the force of his intellect. There are many people
in Martinique who at the age of twenty or thirty begin to steep
themselves in Montesquieu or Claudel for the sole purpose of being
able to quote them. That
is because, through their knowledge of these writers, they expect
their color to be forgotten.  Moral consciousness implies a kind of
scission, a fracture of consciousness into a bright part and an
opposing black part. In order to achieve morality, it is essential
that the black, the dark, the Negro vanish from consciousness. Hence a
Negro is forever in combat with his own image.  If in like manner one
allows M. Hesnard his scientific conception of the moral life, and if
the world of moral sickness is to be understood by starting from Fault
and Guilt, a normal person will be one who has freed himself of this
guilt, or who in any case has managed not to submit to it. More
directly, each individual has to charge the blame for his baser
drives, his impulses, to the account of an evil genius, which is that
of the culture to which he belongs (we have seen that this is the
Negro). This collective guilt is borne by what is conventionally
called the scapegoat.  Now the scapegoat for white society—which is
based on myths of progress, civilization, liberalism, education,
enlightenment, refinement—will be precisely the force that opposes the
expansion and the triumph of these myths. This brutal opposing force
is supplied by the Negro.  In the society of the Antilles, where the
myths are identical with those of the society of Dijon or Nice, the
young Negro, identifying himself with the civilizing power, will make
the nigger the scapegoat of his moral life.  I was fourteen years old
when I began to understand the meaning of what I now call cultural
imposition. I had an acquaintance, now dead, whose father, an Italian,
had married a Martinican.  This man had lived in Fort-de-France for
more than twenty years.  He was considered an Antillean, but,
underneath, his origin was always remembered. Now, in France, from a
military point of view, an Italian is despised; one Frenchmen is the
equal of ten Italians; the Italians have no guts. . . . My
acquaintance had been born in Martinique and he associated only with
Martinicans.  On the day Montgomery routed the Italian army at
Bengazi, I wanted to mark the Allies’ victory on my map. Measuring the
substantial advance of the lines, I could not help exulting: “We
really murdered them!” My acquaintance, who was not unaware of his
father’s origin, was extremely embarrassed. For that matter, so was
I. Both of us were victims of a cultural imposition. I am convinced
that anyone who has grasped this phenomenon and all its consequences
will know exactly in what direction to look for the solution. Listen
to the Rebel of Césaire: “It is rising . . . it is rising from the
depths of the earth . . . the black tide is rising . . . waves of
cries . . . bogs of animal odors . .  . the raging storm of naked feet
. . . and the paths of the cliffs are teeming with more, they clamber
down the sides of ravines where obscene savage torrents pour
impregnation into chaotic rivers, seas of corruption, oceans in
convulsion, amid a black laughter of knives and bad alcohol. . . .”
Do you understand? Césaire has come down. He is ready to see what is
happening at the very depths, and now he can go up.  He is ripe for
the dawn. But he does not leave the black man down there. He lifts him
to his own shoulders and raises him to the clouds. Earlier, in Cahier
d’un retour au pays natal, he had prepared us. What he has chosen is,
to use the expression of Gaston Bachelard,53 a psyche of ascent: and
for this, O lord with white teeth, men with fragile necks receive and
collect fatal calm triangular and for me my dances my bad-nigger
dances for me my dances break-the-yoke dance jail-break dance
it-is-ﬁne-and-good-and-right-to-be-a-Negro dance For me my dances and
let the sun bounce off the racket of my hands no the unjust sun is no
longer enough for me twist yourself, wind, round my new growth touch
my spaced ﬁngers I give you my conscience and its rhythm of ﬂesh I
give you the ﬂames that char my weakness
53. L’air et les songes (Paris, Corti, 1943).
I give you the chain-gang I give you the swamp I give you the
Intourist with the three-cornered journey devour wind I give you my
rugged lips devour and twist yourself and twisting clasp me in a
greater shiver embrace me into the fury of us embrace, embrace US but
biting us as well into the blood of our blood bitten embrace, my
purity has no bond but your purity but then embrace like a ﬁeld of
measured ﬁlaos the evening our many-colored purities and bind, bind me
without remorse bind me with your great arms to the glowing clay bind
my black vibration to the very navel of the world bind, bind me bitter
brotherhood then, strangling me with your lasso of stars rise, Dove
rise rise rise I follow you who are imprinted on my ancestral white
cornea rise glutton of the sky and the vast black hole where I wanted
to drown myself the other moon there now I want to haul out the evil
tongue of the night in its moveless glaze!54
54. Aimé Césaire, Cahier d’un retour au pays natal (Paris, Présence
Africaine, 1956), pp. 94–96.
One can understand why Sartre views the adoption of a Marxist position
by black poets as the logical conclusion of Negrohood.  In effect,
what happens is this: As I begin to recognize that the Negro is the
symbol of sin, I catch myself hating the Negro. But then I recognize
that I am a Negro. There are two ways out of this conflict. Either I
ask others to pay no attention to my skin, or else I want them to be
aware of it. I try then to find value for what is bad—since I have
unthinkingly conceded that the black man is the color of evil. In
order to terminate this neurotic situation, in which I am compelled to
choose an unhealthy, conflictual solution, fed on fantasies, hostile,
inhuman in short, I have only one solution: to rise above this absurd
drama that others have staged round me, to reject the two terms that
are equally unacceptable, and, through one human being, to reach out
for the universal.  When the Negro dives—in other words, goes
under—something remarkable occurs.  Listen again to Césaire: Ho ho
Their power is well anchored Gained Needed My hands bathe in bright
heather In swamps of annatto trees My gourd is heavy with stars But I
am weak. Oh I am weak.  Help me.  And here I am on the edge of
metamorphosis Drowned blinded Frightened of myself, terriﬁed of myself
Of the gods . . . you are no gods. I am free.  THE REBEL: I have a
pact with this night, for twenty years I have heard it calling softly
for me. . . .55
Having again discovered that night, which is to say the sense of his
identity, Césaire learned first of all that “it is no use painting
55. Et les chiens se taisaient. a tragedy, in Les Armes Miraculeuses
(Paris, Gallimard, 1946), pp. 144 and 122.
the foot of the tree white, the strength of the bark cries out from
beneath the paint. . . .”  Then, once he had laid bare the white man
in himself, he killed him: We broke down the doors. The master’s room
was wide open. The master’s room was brilliantly lighted, and the
master was there, quite calm . . . and we stopped. . . . He was the
master. . . . I entered. “It is you,” he said to me, quite
calmly. . . . It was I. It was indeed I, I told him, the good slave,
the faithful slave, the slavish slave, and suddenly his eyes were two
frightened cockroaches on a rainy day . . . I struck, the blood ﬂowed:
That is the only baptism that I remember today.56
“After an unexpected and salutary internal revolution, he now paid
tribute to his own revolting ugliness.”57 What more is there to add?
After having driven himself to the limit of self-destruction, the
Negro is about to leap, whether deliberately or impetuously, into the
“black hole” from which will come “the great Negro cry with such force
that the pillars of the world will be shaken by it.”  The European
knows and he does not know. On the level of reflection, a Negro is a
Negro; but in the unconscious there is the firmly fixed image of the
nigger-savage. I could give not a dozen but a thousand
illustrations. Georges Mounin said in Présence Africaine: “I had the
good luck not to discover the Negroes through Lévy-Bruhl’s Mentalité
primitive read in a sociology course; more broadly, I had the good
luck to discover the Negroes otherwise than through books—and I am
grateful for it every day. . . .”58 Mounin, whom it would be
impossible to take for an average Frenchman, added, and thus rose
inestimably in my opinion: “I profited perhaps by learning, at an age
when one’s mind has not yet been prejudiced, that Negroes are men like
ourselves. . . . I as a white man thus gained, perhaps, the
possibility of always being natural with a Negro—and never, in his
presence, to fall stupidly
56. Ibid., p. 136.  57. Ibid., p. 65.  58. Premières réponses à
l’enquête sur le “Mythe du nègre,” Présence Africaine, No. 2.
and imperceptibly into that attitude of ethnographic investigator that
is still too often our unbearable manner of putting them in their
place. . . .”  In the same issue of Présence Africaine, Émile
Dermenghem, who cannot be accused of Negrophobia, said: “One of my
childhood memories is of a visit to the World’s Fair of 1900, during
which my chief enthusiasm was to see a Negro. My imagination had
naturally been stimulated by my reading: Capitaine de quinze ans (A
Captain at Fifteen), Les Aventures de Robert (Robert’s Adventures),
Les Voyages de Livingstone (Livingstone’s Travels).”  Dermenghem tells
us that this was the manifestation of his taste for the exotic. While
I may be prepared to put my two hands into his and believe the
Dermenghem who wrote the article, I ask his permission to entertain
doubts about the Dermenghem of the 1900 Fair.  I should be annoyed
with myself if I were simply picking up old subjects that had been
worked dry for fifty years. To write about the chances for Negro
friendship is an unselfish undertaking, but unfortunately the
Negro-phobes and the other princes consort are impregnable to
unselfishness. When we read, “The Negro is a savage, and to lead
savages there is only one method: a kick in the butt,” we sit at our
desks and we like to think that “all such idiocies will have to die
out.” But everyone is in agreement on that. To quote Présence
Africaine (No. 5) again, Jacques Howlett wrote there: Two things,
furthermore, it seems, contributed to the aversion toward the Negro in
the world of the other, which are impossible for me to comprehend: the
color of his skin and his nakedness, for I pictured the Negro
naked. Certainly, superﬁcial factors (although one cannot be sure to
what extent they continue to haunt our new ideas and our altered
conceptions) could sometimes mask that remote black and naked being,
almost nonexistent; such as the nice Negro with the red army tarboosh
and the inﬁnite Fernandel-like grin, the symbol of some chocolate
confection; or the brave Senegalese pioupiou, “a slave to his orders,”
a Don Quixote without glory, “a good-fellow hero” with all that stems
from the “epic of empire”; or the Negro “waiting for salvation,” the
“submissive child” of a bearded missionary.
Farther on, Jacques Howlett tells us that as a reaction he made the
Negro his symbol of innocence. He tells us the reason why, but we have
to remember that he was no longer eight years old, for he speaks of “a
bad conscience about sexuality” and about “solipsism.” I am convinced,
however, as far as that “innocence for a grown man” is concerned, that
Jacques Howlett has left it far, far behind him.  Beyond all question
the most interesting testimony is presented by Michel
Salomon. Although he defends himself against the charge, he stinks of
racism. He is a Jew, he has a “millennial experience of
anti-Semitism,” and yet he is a racist. Listen to him: “But to say
that the mere fact of his skin, of his hair, of that aura of
sensuality that he [the Negro] gives off, does not spontaneously give
rise to a certain embarrassment, whether of attraction or of
revulsion, is to reject the facts in the name of a ridiculous prudery
that has never solved anything. . . .” Later he goes to the extreme of
telling us about the “prodigious vitality of the black man.”
M. Salomon’s study informs us that he is a physician. He should be
wary of those literary points of view that are unscientific.  The
Japanese and the Chinese are ten times more prolific than the Negro:
Does that make them sensual? And in addition, M.  Salomon, I have a
confession to make to you: I have never been able, without revulsion,
to hear a man say of another man: “He is so sensual!” I do not know
what the sensuality of a man is.  Imagine a woman saying of another
woman: “She’s so terribly desirable—she’s darling. . . .” The Negro,
M. Salomon, gives off no aura of sensuality either through his skin or
through his hair.  It is just that over a series of long days and long
nights the image of the biological-sexual-sensual-genital-nigger has
imposed itself on you and you do not know how to get free of it. The
eye is not merely a mirror, but a correcting mirror. The eye should
make it possible for us to correct cultural errors. I do not say the
eyes, I say the eye, and there is no mystery about what that eye
refers to; not to the crevice in the skull but to that very uniform
light that wells out of the reds of Van Gogh, that glides through a
concerto of Tchaikovsky, that fastens itself desperately to Schiller’s
Ode
to Joy, that allows itself to be conveyed by the worm-ridden bawling
of Césaire.  The Negro problem does not resolve itself into the
problem of Negroes living among white men but rather of Negroes
exploited, enslaved, despised by a colonialist, capitalist society
that is only accidentally white. You wonder, M. Salomon, what you
would do “if you had 800,000 Negroes in France”; because for you there
is a problem, the problem of the increase of Negroes, the problem of
the Black Peril. The Martinican is a Frenchman, he wants to remain
part of the French Union, he asks only one thing, he wants the idiots
and the exploiters to give him the chance to live like a human
being. I can imagine myself lost, submerged in a white flood composed
of men like Sartre or Aragon, I should like nothing better. You say,
M. Salomon, that there is nothing to be gained by caution, and I share
your view. But I do not feel that I should be abandoning my
personality by marrying a European, whoever she might be; I can tell
you that I am making no “fool’s bargains.” If my children are
suspected, if the crescents of their fingernails are inspected, it
will be simply because society will not have changed, because, as you
so well put it, society will have kept its mythology intact. For my
part, I refuse to consider the problem from the standpoint of
either-or. . . .  What is all this talk of a black people, of a Negro
nationality?  I am a Frenchman. I am interested in French culture,
French civilization, the French people. We refuse to be considered
“outsiders,” we have full part in the French drama. When men who were
not basically bad, only deluded, invaded France in order to subjugate
her, my position as a Frenchman made it plain to me that my place was
not outside but in the very heart of the problem. I am personally
interested in the future of France, in French values, in the French
nation. What have I to do with a black empire?  Georges Mounin,
Dermenghem, Howlett, Salomon have all tried to find answers to the
question of the origin of the myth of the Negro. All of them have
convinced us of one thing. It is that an authentic grasp of the
reality of the Negro could be achieved only to the detriment of the
cultural crystallization.
Recently, in a children’s paper, I read a caption to a picture in
which a young black Boy Scout was showing a Negro village to three or
four white scouts: “This is the kettle where my ancestors cooked
yours.” One will gladly concede that there are no more Negro
cannibals, but we should not allow ourselves to forget. . . .  Quite
seriously, however, I think that the writer of that caption has done a
genuine service to Negroes without knowing it. For the white child who
reads it will not form a mental picture of the Negro in the act of
eating the white man, but rather as having eaten him. Unquestionably,
this is progress.  Before concluding this chapter, I should like to
abstract a case study, for access to which I must thank the medical
director of the women’s division of the psychiatric hospital of
Saint-Ylie. The case clarifies the point of view that I am defending
here. It proves that, at its extreme, the myth of the Negro, the idea
of the Negro, can become the decisive factor of an authentic
alienation.  Mille. B. was nineteen years old when she entered the
hospital in March. Her admission sheet reads:
The undersigned, Dr. P., formerly on the staff of the Hospitals of
Paris, certiﬁes that he has examined Mille. B., who is afﬂicted with a
nervous disease consisting of periods of agitation, motor instability,
tics, and spasms which are conscious but which she cannot
control. These symptoms have been increasing and prevent her from
leading a normal social life. Her commitment for observation is
required under the provisions laid down by the law of 1838 regarding
voluntary commitments.
Twenty-four hours later the chief physician found these facts:
“Afflicted with neurotic tics that began at the age of ten and became
aggravated at the onset of puberty, and further when she began going
to work away from home. Intermittent depressions with anxiety,
accompanied by a recrudescence of these symptoms.  Obesity. Requests
treatment. Feels reassured in company. Assigned to an open
ward. Should remain institutionalized.”  Her immediate family had no
history of pathological mani- festations. Puberty occurred at the age
of sixteen. A physical examination showed nothing except adiposity and
a minimal
epidermal indication of a slight endocrine insufficiency. Her
menstrual periods were regular.  An interview made it possible to
isolate these details: “It’s especially when I’m working that the tics
come.” (The patient was working at a job that entailed her living away
from home.)  The tics affected the eyes and the forehead; she panted
and yelped.  She slept quite well, without nightmares, and ate
well. She was not out of sorts during menstruation. When she went to
bed, the facial tics were constant until she fell asleep.  The
observations of the ward nurse: “It is worst when she is alone. When
she is talking with others, or is merely with them, it is less
noticeable. The tic depends on what she is doing. She begins by
tapping both her feet, and then goes on to raise her feet, her legs,
her arms, her shoulders symmetrically.”  She uttered sounds. It was
never possible to understand what she was saying. This manifestation
ended in quite loud, inarticulate cries. As soon as she was spoken to,
these stopped.  The psychiatrist in charge decided to employ
waking-dream therapy. A preliminary interview had brought out the
existence of hallucinations in the form of terrifying circles, and the
patient had been asked to describe them. Here is an excerpt from the
notes on the first session: Deep and concentric, the circles expanded
and contracted, to the rhythm of a Negro tom-tom. This tom-tom made
the patient think of the danger of losing her parents, especially her
mother.  I then asked her to make the sign of the cross over these
circles, but they did not disappear. I told her to take a cloth and
rub them out, and they vanished.  She turned in the direction of the
tom-tom. She was surrounded by half-naked men and women dancing in a
frightening way. I told her not to be afraid to join the dance. She
did so. Immediately the appearance of the dancers changed. It was a
splendid party. The men and women were well dressed and they were
dancing a waltz, The Snow Star.  I told her to go closer to the
circles; she could no longer see them. I told her to think of them;
they appeared, but they were broken. I told her to go in through the
opening. “I’m not completely surrounded any more,” she said
spontaneously, “I can get out again.” The circle broke into
two pieces and then into several. Soon there were only two pieces, and
then they disappeared. There were frequent throat and eye tics while
she was talking.  A succession of such sessions will bring about the
sedation of the motor disturbance.
Here are notes on another session:
I told her to bring back the circles. She could not see them at ﬁrst;
then they came. They were broken. She entered them. They broke, rose
again, then gently, one after another, fell away into the void. I told
her to listen to the tom-tom. She did not hear it. She called to
it. She heard it on the left.  I suggested to her that an angel would
go with her to the tom-tom: She wanted to go all alone. But someone
was coming down from the sky.  It was an angel. He was smiling; he
took her close to the tom-tom. There were only black men there, and
they were dancing round a large ﬁre and looked evil. The angel asked
her what they were going to do; she said they were going to burn a
white man. She looked for him everywhere. She could not see him.  “Ah,
I see him! He’s a white man about fifty years old. He’s half
undressed.”  The angel began to negotiate with the black chief (for
she was afraid).  The black chief said that this white man was not
from their country and so they were going to burn him. But he had done
nothing wrong.  They set him free and went back to their dancing,
joyfully. She refused to take part in the dance.  I sent her to talk
to the chief. He was dancing alone. The white man had disappeared. She
wanted to go away and seemed to have no desire to know the
Negroes. She wanted to go away with her angel, somewhere where she
would really be at home, with her mother, her brothers, and her
sisters.
When the tics had ceased, the treatment was dropped. A few days later
the patient was seen again because she had had a relapse. These are
the notes of that session:
The circles kept coming closer. She hit them with a stick. They broke
into fragments. The stick was a magic wand. It changed these bits of
iron into something shining and beautiful.
She turned toward a ﬁre. It was the ﬁre round which the Negroes were
dancing. She wanted to know the chief, and she approached him.  One
Negro who had stopped dancing started again, but in a new rhythm.  She
danced round the ﬁre and let the Negroes take her hands.  These
sessions have clearly improved her condition. She writes to her
parents, receives visits, goes to the ﬁlm showings in the
hospital. She takes part in group games. Now, when some other patient
plays a waltz on the piano in the day room, this patient asks others
to dance with her. She is popular and respected among the other
patients.
I take this passage from the notes of another session: She began to
think about the circles again. Each was broken into a single piece, on
the right of which something was missing. The smaller circles remained
intact. She wanted to break them. She took them in her hands and bent
them, and then they broke. One, however, was still left. She went
through it. On the other side she found she was in darkness. But she
was not afraid. She called someone and her guardian angel came down,
friendly and smiling. He led her to the right, back into the daylight.
In this case, the waking-dream therapy produced appreciable
results. But as soon as the patient was once more alone the tics
returned.  I do not want to elaborate on the infrastructure of this
psycho- neurosis. The questions put by the chief psychiatrist had
brought out a fear of imaginary Negroes—a fear first experienced at
the age of twelve.  I had a great many talks with this patient. When
she was ten or twelve years old, her father, “an old-timer in the
Colonial Service,” liked to listen to programs of Negro music. The
tom- tom echoed through their house every evening, long after she had
gone to bed. Besides, as we have pointed out, it is at this age that
the savage-cannibal-Negro makes his appearance. The connection was
easily discernible.  In addition, her brothers and sisters, who had
discovered her weak point, amused themselves by scaring her. Lying in
bed and hearing the tom-toms, she virtually saw Negroes. She fled
under the covers, trembling. Then smaller and smaller circles
appeared,
blurring the Negroes. These circles are easily recognizable as a land
of defense mechanism against her hallucinosis. Later, the circles
appeared without the Negroes—the defense mechanism had taken over
without reference to what had brought it on.  I talked with the girl’s
mother, who corroborated what the patient had said. The girl was very
emotional, and at the age of twelve she had often been observed to
tremble in her bed. My presence on her ward made no perceptible
difference in her mental state. By now it was the circles alone that
produced the motor reactions: outcries, facial tics, random
gesticulation.  Even when one concedes a constitutional factor here,
it is clear that her alienation is the result of a fear of the Negro,
a fear aggravated by determining circumstances. Although the patient
had made considerable progress, it was doubtful whether she would soon
be able to resume a normal life in society.
A. The Negro and Adler From whatever direction one approaches the
analysis of abnormal psychogenic conditions, one very soon ﬁnds
oneself in the presence of the following phenomenon: The whole picture
of the neurosis, as well as all its symptoms, emerges as under the
inﬂuence of some ﬁnal goal, indeed as projections of this
goal. Therefore one can ascribe the character of a formative cause to
this ﬁnal goal, the quality of a principle of orientation, of
arrangement, of coordination. Try to understand the “meaning” and the
direction of unhealthy manifestations, and you will immediately come
face to face with a chaotic throng of tendencies, of impulses, of
weaknesses and of anomalies, bound to discourage some and to arouse in
others the rash resolve to penetrate the shadows at all costs, even at
the risk of ﬁnding in the end that nothing has been gained, or that
what has been gained is illusory. If, on the other hand, one accepts
the hypothesis of a ﬁnal goal or of a causal ﬁnality, one sees the
shadows dissolve at once and we can read the soul of the patient like
the pages of a book.1
It is on the basis of similar theoretical positions that, in general,
the most stupendous frauds of our period are constructed. Let us apply
Adler’s individual psychology to the Antilleans.  The Negro is
comparison. There is the first truth. He is comparison: that is, he is
constantly preoccupied with self- evaluation and with the
ego-ideal. Whenever he comes into contact with someone else, the
question of value, of merit, arises.  The Antilleans have no inherent
values of their own, they are always contingent on the presence of The
Other. The question 1. Alfred Adler, Le tempérament nerveux,
p. 12. (Originally, “Der nervöse charakter,” in Festschrift William
Stern, Leipzig, Barth, 1931).
is always whether he is less intelligent than I, blacker than I, less
respectable than I. Every position of one’s own, every effort at
security, is based on relations of dependence, with the diminution of
the other. It is the wreckage of what surrounds me that provides the
foundation for my virility.  I should like to suggest an experiment to
any Martinican who reads this book: Find the most “comparative” street
in Fort- de-France. Rue Schoelcher, rue Victor-Hugo—certainly not rue
François-Arago. The Martinican who agrees to make this experiment will
share my opinion precisely insofar as he can objectively endure seeing
himself stripped naked. An Antillean who meets an acquaintance for the
first time after five or six years’ absence greets him with
aggression. This is because in the past each had a fixed position. Now
the inferior thinks that he has acquired worth . . . and the superior
is determined to conserve the old hierarchy. “You haven’t changed a
bit . . . still as stupid as ever.”  I have known some, physicians and
dentists, who have gone on filling their heads with mistakes in
judgment made fifteen years before. It is not so much conceptual
errors as “Creolisms” with which the dangerous man is belabored. He
was put in his place once and for all: nothing to be done about
it. The Antillean is characterized by his desire to dominate the
other. His line of orientation runs through the other. It is always a
question of the subject; one never even thinks of the object. I try to
read admiration in the eyes of the other, and if, unluckily, those
eyes show me an unpleasant reflection, I find that mirror flawed:
Unquestionably that other one is a fool. I do not try to be naked in
the sight of the object. The object is denied in terms of
individuality and liberty. The object is an instrument. It should
enable me to realize my subjective security. I consider myself
fulfilled (the wish for plenitude) and I recognize no division. The
Other comes on to the stage only in order to furnish it. I am the
Hero. Applaud or condemn, it makes no difference to me, I am the
center of attention. If the other seeks to make me uneasy with his
wish to have value (his fiction), I simply banish him without a
trial. He ceases to exist. I don’t want to hear about that fellow. I
do not
wish to experience the impact of the object. Contact with the object
means conflict. I am Narcissus, and what I want to see in the eyes of
others is a reflection that pleases me. Therefore, in any given group
(environment) in Martinique, one finds the man on top, the court that
surrounds him, the in-betweens (who are waiting for something better),
and the losers. These last are slaughtered without mercy. One can
imagine the temperature that prevails in that jungle. There is no way
out of it.  Me, nothing but me.  The Martinicans are greedy for
security. They want to compel the acceptance of their fiction. They
want to be recognized in their quest for manhood. They want to make an
appearance. Each one of them is an isolated, sterile, salient atom
with sharply defined rights of passage, each one of them is. Each one
of them wants to be, to emerge. Everything that an Antillean does is
done for The Other. Not because The Other is the ultimate objective of
his action in the sense of communication between people that Adler
describes,2 but, more primitively, because it is The Other who
corroborates him in his search for self-validation.  Now that we have
marked out the Adlerian line of orientation of the Antillean, our task
is to look for its source.  Here the difficulties begin. In effect,
Adler has created a psychology of the individual. We have just seen
that the feeling of inferiority is an Antillean characteristic. It is
not just this or that Antillean who embodies the neurotic formation,
but all Antilleans. Antillean society is a neurotic society, a society
of “comparison.” Hence we are driven from the individual back to the
social structure. If there is a taint, it lies not in the “soul” of
the individual but rather in that of the environment.  The Martinican
is and is not a neurotic. If we were strict in applying the
conclusions of the Adlerian school, we should say that the Negro is
seeking to protest against the inferiority that he feels
historically. Since in all periods the Negro has been an inferior, he
attempts to react with a superiority complex. And this is indeed what
comes out of Brachfeld’s book. Discussing the feeling of racial
inferiority, Brachfeld quotes a Spanish play
2. In Understanding Human Nature.
by André de Claramunte, El valiante negro de Flandres. This play makes
clear that the inferiority of the Negro does not date from this
century, since De Claramunte was a contemporary of Lope de Vega: Only
the color of his skin there lacked That he should be a man of gentle
blood.
And the Negro, Juan de Mérida, says this: What a disgrace it is to be
black in this world!  Are black men not men?  Does that endow them
with a baser soul, a duller, an uglier?  And for that they have earned
scornful names.  I rise burdened with the shame of my color And I let
the world know my courage . . .  Is it so vile to be black?
Poor Juan cannot be sure any longer what saint to invoke.  Normally,
the black man is a slave. There is nothing of that sort in his
attitude: For, though I be black, I am not a slave.
Nevertheless he would like to be able to flee that blackness. He has
an ethical position in the world. Viewed from an axiological
standpoint, he is a white man: I am more white than snow.
For, after all, on the symbolic level, What is it really, then, to be
black?  Is it being that color?  For that outrage I will denounce
fate,
my times, heaven, and all those who made me black!  O curse of color!
In his isolation, Juan sees that the wish cannot save him. His
appearance saps, invalidates, all his actions: What do souls matter?
I am mad.  What can I do but despair?  O heaven what a dread thing
being black.
At the climax of his anguish there remains only one solution for the
miserable Negro: furnish proofs of his whiteness to others and above
all to himself.  If I cannot change my color I want Luck.3
As we can see, Juan de Mérida must be understood from the viewpoint of
overcompensation. It is because the Negro belongs to an “inferior”
race that he seeks to be like the superior race.  But we have a means
of shaking off the Adlerian leech. In the United States, De Man and
Eastman have applied Adler’s method somewhat excessively. All the
facts that I have noted are real, but, it should not be necessary to
point out, they have only a superficial connection with Adlerian
psychology. The Martinican does not compare himself with the white man
qua father, leader, God; he compares himself with his fellow against
the pattern of the white man. An Adlerian comparison would be
schematized in this fashion: Ego greater than The Other
But the Antillean comparison, in contrast, would look like this: White
Ego different from The Other
3. My own translation from the Spanish—F.F.
The Adlerian comparison embraces two terms; it is polarized by the
ego. The Antillean comparison is surmounted by a third term: Its
governing fiction is not personal but social.  The Martinican is a man
crucified. The environment that has shaped him (but that he has not
shaped) has horribly drawn and quartered him; and he feeds this
cultural environment with his blood and his essences. Now, the blood
of Negroes is a manure prized by experts.  If I were an Adlerian,
then, having established the fact that my friend had fulfilled in a
dream his wish to become white—that is, to be a man—I would show him
that his neurosis, his psychic instability, the rupture of his ego
arose out of this governing fiction, and I would say to him:
“M. Mannoni has very ably described this phenomenon in the
Malagasy. Look here: I think you simply have to resign yourself to
remaining in the place that has been assigned to you.”  Certainly not!
I will not say that at all! I will tell him, “The environment, society
are responsible for your delusion.” Once that has been said, the rest
will follow of itself, and what that is we know. The end of the world.
I wonder sometimes whether school inspectors and government
functionaries are aware of the role they play in the colonies. For
twenty years they poured every effort into programs that would make
the Negro a white man. In the end, they dropped him and told him, “You
have an indisputable complex of dependence on the white man.”
B. The Negro and Hegel Self-consciousness exists in itself and for
itself, in that and by the fact that it exists for another
self-consciousness; that is to say, it is only by being acknowledged
or recognized.  —Hegel, The Phenomenology of Mind
Man is human only to the extent to which he tries to impose his
existence on another man in order to be recognized by him.  As long as
he has not been effectively recognized by the other, that
other will remain the theme of his actions. It is on that other being,
on recognition by that other being, that his own human worth and
reality depend. It is that other being in whom the meaning of his life
is condensed.  There is not an open conflict between white and
black. One day the White Master, without conflict, recognized the
Negro slave.  But the former slave wants to make himself recognized.
At the foundation of Hegelian dialectic there is an absolute
reciprocity which must be emphasized. It is in the degree to which I
go beyond my own immediate being that I apprehend the existence of the
other as a natural and more than natural reality. If I close the
circuit, if I prevent the accomplishment of movement in two
directions, I keep the other within himself. Ultimately, I deprive him
even of this being-for-itself.  The only means of breaking this
vicious circle that throws me back on myself is to restore to the
other, through mediation and recognition, his human reality, which is
different from natural reality. The other has to perform the same
operation. “Action from one side only would be useless, because what
is to happen can only be brought about by means of both. . . .”; “they
recognize themselves as mutually recognizing each other.”4 In its
immediacy, consciousness of self is simple being-for- itself. In order
to win the certainty of oneself, the incorporation of the concept of
recognition is essential. Similarly, the other is waiting for
recognition by us, in order to burgeon into the universal
consciousness of self. Each consciousness of self is in quest of
absoluteness. It wants to be recognized as a primal value without
reference to life, as a transformation of subjective certainty
(Gewissheit) into objective truth (Wahrheit).  When it encounters
resistance from the other, self-consciousness undergoes the experience
of desire—the first milestone on the road that leads to the dignity of
the spirit. Self-consciousness accepts the risk of its life, and
consequently it threatens the other in his physical being. “It is
solely by risking life that freedom is obtained;
4. G. W. F. Hegel, The Phenomenobgy of Mind, trans. by J. B. Baillie,
2nd rev. ed.  (London, Allen & Unwin, 1949), pp. 230, 231.
only thus is it tried and proved that the essential nature of self-
consciousness is not bare existence, is not the merely immediate form
in which it at first makes its appearance, is not its mere absorption
in the expanse of life.”5 Thus human reality in-itself-for-itself can
be achieved only through conflict and through the risk that conflict
implies. This risk means that I go beyond life toward a supreme good
that is the transformation of subjective certainty of my own worth
into a universally valid objective truth.  As soon as I desire I am
asking to be considered. I am not merely here-and-now, sealed into
thingness. I am for somewhere else and for something else. I demand
that notice be taken of my negating activity insofar as I pursue
something other than life; insofar as I do battle for the creation of
a human world—that is, of a world of reciprocal recognitions.  He who
is reluctant to recognize me opposes me. In a savage struggle I am
willing to accept convulsions of death, invincible dissolution, but
also the possibility of the impossible.6 The other, however, can
recognize me without struggle: “The individual, who has not staked his
life, may, no doubt, be recognized as a person, but he has not
attained the truth of this recognition as an independent
self-consciousness.”7
5. Ibid., p. 233.  6. When I began this book, I wanted to devote one
section to a study of the death wish among Negroes. I believed it
necessary because people are forever saying that Negroes never commit
suicide.  M. Achille did not hesitate to maintain this in a lecture,
and Richard Wright, in one of his stories, has a white character say,
“If I were a Negro I’d kill myself . . .,” in the sense that only a
Negro could submit to such treatment without feeling drawn to suicide.
Since then, M. Deshaies has taken the question of suicide as the
subject of his thesis. He demonstrates that the studies by Jaensch,
who contrasted the disintegrated- personality “type” (blue eyes, white
skin) to the integrated-personality “type” (brown eyes and skin), are
predominantly specious.  According to Durkheim, Jews never committed
suicide. Now it is the Negroes.  Very well: “The Detroit municipal
hospital found that 16.6% of its suicide cases were Negroes, although
the proportion of Negroes in the total population is only 7.6%. In
Cincinnati, the number of Negro suicides is more than double that of
whites; this may result in part from the amazing sexual disparity
among Negro suicides: 358 women against 76 men.” (Gabriel Deshaies,
Psychologie du suicide, note 23.)  7. Hegel, op. cit., p. 233.
Historically, the Negro steeped in the inessentiality of servitude was
set free by his master. He did not fight for his freedom.  Out of
slavery the Negro burst into the lists where his masters stood. Like
those servants who are allowed once every year to dance in the drawing
room, the Negro is looking for a prop. The Negro has not become a
master. When there are no longer slaves, there are no longer masters.
The Negro is a slave who has been allowed to assume the attitude of a
master.  The white man is a master who has allowed his slaves to eat
at his table.  One day a good white master who had influence said to
his friends, “Let’s be nice to the niggers. . . .”  The other masters
argued, for after all it was not an easy thing, but then they decided
to promote the machine-animal-men to the supreme rank of men.  Slavery
shall no longer exist on French soil.  The upheaval reached the
Negroes from without. The black man was acted upon. Values that had
not been created by his actions, values that had not been born of the
systolic tide of his blood, danced in a hued whirl round him. The
upheaval did not make a difference in the Negro. He went from one way
of life to another, but not from one life to another. Just as when one
tells a much improved patient that in a few days he will be discharged
from the hospital, he thereupon suffers a relapse, so the announcement
of the liberation of the black slaves produced psychoses and sudden
deaths.  It is not an announcement that one hears twice in a lifetime.
The black man contented himself with thanking the white man, and the
most forceful proof of the fact is the impressive number of statues
erected all over France and the colonies to show white France stroking
the kinky hair of this nice Negro whose chains had just been broken.
“Say thank you to the nice man,” the mother tells her little boy
. . . but we know that often the little boy is dying to scream some
other, more resounding expression. . . .
The white man, in the capacity of master,8 said to the Negro, “From
now on you are free.”  But the Negro knows nothing of the cost of
freedom, for he has not fought for it. From time to time he has fought
for Liberty and Justice, but these were always white liberty and white
justice; that is, values secreted by his masters. The former slave,
who can find in his memory no trace of the struggle for liberty or of
that anguish of liberty of which Kierkegaard speaks, sits unmoved
before the young white man singing and dancing on the tightrope of
existence.  When it does happen that the Negro looks fiercely at the
white man, the white man tells him: “Brother, there is no difference
between us.” And yet the Negro knows that there is a difference.  He
wants it. He wants the white man to turn on him and shout: “Damn
nigger.” Then he would have that unique chance—to “show them. . . .”
But most often there is nothing—nothing but indifference, or a
paternalistic curiosity.  The former slave needs a challenge to his
humanity, he wants a conflict, a riot. But it is too late: The French
Negro is doomed to bite himself and just to bite. I say “the French
Negro,” for the American Negro is cast in a different play. In the
United States, the Negro battles and is battled. There are laws that,
little by little, are invalidated under the Constitution. There are
other laws that forbid certain forms of discrimination. And we can be
sure that nothing is going to be given free.  There is war, there are
defeats, truces, victories.  “The twelve million black voices”9 howled
against the curtain of the sky. Torn from end to end, marked with the
gashes of teeth
8. I hope I have shown that here the master differs basically from the
master described by Hegel. For Hegel there is reciprocity; here the
master laughs at the consciousness of the slave. What he wants from
the slave is not recognition but work.  In the same way, the slave
here is in no way identifiable with the slave who loses himself in the
object and finds in his work the source of his liberation.  The Negro
wants to be like the master.  Therefore he is less independent than
the Hegelian slave.  In Hegel the slave turns away from the master and
turns toward the object.  Here the slave turns toward the master and
abandons the object.  9. In English in the original. (Translator’s
note.)
biting into the belly of interdiction, the curtain fell like a burst
balloon.  On the field of battle, its four corners marked by the
scores of Negroes hanged by their testicles, a monument is slowly
being built that promises to be majestic.  And, at the top of this
monument, I can already see a white man and a black man hand in hand.
For the French Negro the situation is unbearable. Unable ever to be
sure whether the white man considers him consciousness
in-itself-for-itself, he must forever absorb himself in uncovering
resistance, opposition, challenge.  This is what emerges from some of
the passages of the book that Mounier has devoted to Africa.10 The
young Negroes whom he knew there sought to maintain their
alterity. Alterity of rupture, of conflict, of battle.  The self takes
its place by opposing itself, Fichte said. Yes and no.  I said in my
introduction that man is a yes. I will never stop reiterating that.
Yes to life. Yes to love. Yes to generosity.  But man is also a no. No
to scorn of man. No to degradation of man. No to exploitation of
man. No to the butchery of what is most human in man: freedom.  Man’s
behavior is not only reactional. And there is always resentment in a
reaction. Nietzsche had already pointed that out in The Will to Power.
To educate man to be actional, preserving in all his relations his
respect for the basic values that constitute a human world, is the
prime task of him who, having taken thought, prepares to act.
10. Emmanuel Mounier, L’éveil de l’Afrique noire (Paris, Éditions du
Seuil, 1948).
The social revolution . . . cannot draw its poetry from the past, but
only from the future. It cannot begin with itself before it has
stripped itself of all its superstitions concerning the past. Earlier
revolutions relied on memories out of world history in order to drug
themselves against their own content. In order to ﬁnd their own
content, the revolutions of the nineteenth century have to let the
dead bury the dead. Before, the expression exceeded the content; now,
the content exceeds the expression.  —Karl Marx, The Eighteenth
Brumaire
I can already see the faces of all those who will ask me to be precise
on this or that point, to denounce this or that mode of conduct.  It
is obvious—and I will never weary of repeating this—that the quest for
disalienation by a doctor of medicine born in Guadeloupe can be
understood only by recognizing motivations basically different from
those of the Negro laborer building the port facilities in Abidjan. In
the first case, the alienation is of an almost intellectual
character. Insofar as he conceives of European culture as a means of
stripping himself of his race, he becomes alienated. In the second
case, it is a question of a victim of a system based on the
exploitation of a given race by another, on the contempt in which a
given branch of humanity is held by a form of civilization that
pretends to superiority.  I do not carry innocence to the point of
believing that appeals to reason or to respect for human dignity can
alter reality. For the Negro who works on a sugar plantation in Le
Robert, there is only one solution: to fight. He will embark on this
struggle, and he will pursue it, not as the result of a Marxist or
idealistic analysis but quite simply because he cannot conceive of
life otherwise than in the form of a battle against exploitation,
misery, and hunger.
It would never occur to me to ask these Negroes to change their
conception of history. I am convinced, however, that without even
knowing it they share my views, accustomed as they are to speaking and
thinking in terms of the present, The few working-class people whom I
had the chance to know in Paris never took it on themselves to pose
the problem of the discovery of a Negro past. They knew they were
black, but, they told me, that made no difference in anything. In
which they were absolutely right.  In this connection, I should like
to say something that I have found in many other writers: Intellectual
alienation is a creation of middle-class society. What I call
middle-class society is any society that becomes rigidified in
predetermined forms, forbidding all evolution, all gains, all
progress, all discovery. I call middle- class a closed society in
which life has no taste, in which the air is tainted, in which ideas
and men are corrupt. And I think that a man who takes a stand against
this death is in a sense a revolutionary.  The discovery of the
existence of a Negro civilization in the fifteenth century confers no
patent of humanity on me. Like it or not, the past can in no way guide
me in the present moment.  The situation that I have examined, it is
clear by now, is not a classic one. Scientific objectivity was barred
to me, for the alienated, the neurotic, was my brother, my sister, my
father. I have ceaselessly striven to show the Negro that in a sense
he makes himself abnormal; to show the white man that he is at once
the perpetrator and the victim of a delusion.  There are times when
the black man is locked into his body.  Now, “for a being who has
acquired consciousness of himself and of his body, who has attained to
the dialectic of subject and object, the body is no longer a cause of
the structure of consciousness, it has become an object of
consciousness.”1 The Negro, however sincere, is the slave of the
past. None the less I am a man, and in this sense the Peloponnesian
War is as much mine as the invention of the compass. Face to face with
1.  Maurice Merleau-Ponty, La Phénoménologie de la perception (Paris,
Gallimard, 1945), p. 277.
the white man, the Negro has a past to legitimate, a vengeance to
exact; face to face with the Negro, the contemporary white man feels
the need to recall the times of cannibalism. A few years ago, the Lyon
branch of the Union of Students From Overseas France asked me to reply
to an article that made jazz music literally an irruption of
cannibalism into the modern world. Knowing exactly what I was doing, I
rejected the premises on which the request was based, and I suggested
to the defender of European purity that he cure himself of a spasm
that had nothing cultural in it. Some men want to fill the world with
their presence. A German philosopher described this mechanism as the
pathology of freedom. In the circumstances, I did not have to take up
a position on behalf of Negro music against white music, but rather to
help my brother to rid himself of an attitude in which there was
nothing healthful.  The problem considered here is one of time. Those
Negroes and white men will be disalienated who refuse to let
themselves be sealed away in the materialized Tower of the Past. For
many other Negroes, in other ways, disalienation will come into being
through their refusal to accept the present as definitive.  I am a
man, and what I have to recapture is the whole past of the world. I am
not responsible solely for the revolt in Santo Domingo.  Every time a
man has contributed to the victory of the dignity of the spirit, every
time a man has said no to an attempt to subjugate his fellows, I have
felt solidarity with his act.  In no way should I derive my basic
purpose from the past of the peoples of color.  In no way should I
dedicate myself to the revival of an unjustly unrecognized Negro
civilization. I will not make myself the man of any past. I do not
want to exalt the past at the expense of my present and of my future.
It is not because the Indo-Chinese has discovered a culture of his own
that he is in revolt. It is because “quite simply” it was, in more
than one way, becoming impossible for him to breathe.  When one
remembers the stories with which, in 1938, old regular sergeants
described the land of piastres and rickshaws, of cut-rate
boys and women, one understands only too well the rage with which the
men of the Viet-Minh go into battle.  An acquaintance with whom I
served during the Second World War recently returned from
Indo-China. He has enlightened me on many things. For instance, the
serenity with which young Vietnamese of sixteen or seventeen faced
firing squads. “On one occasion,” he told me, “we had to shoot from a
kneeling position: The soldiers’ hands were shaking in the presence of
those young ‘fanatics.’” Summing up, he added: “The war that you and I
were in was only a game compared to what is going on out there.”  Seen
from Europe, these things are beyond understanding.  There are those
who talk of a so-called Asiatic attitude toward death. But these
basement philosophers cannot convince anyone.  This Asiatic serenity,
not so long ago, was a quality to be seen in the “bandits” of Vercors
and the “terrorists” of the Resistance.  The Vietnamese who die before
the firing squads are not hoping that their sacrifice will bring about
the reappearance of a past.  It is for the sake of the present and of
the future that they are willing to die.  If the question of practical
solidarity with a given past ever arose for me, it did so only to the
extent to which I was committed to myself and to my neighbor to fight
for all my life and with all my strength so that never again would a
people on the earth be subjugated. It was not the black world that
laid down my course of conduct. My black skin is not the wrapping of
specific values.  It is a long time since the starry sky that took
away Kant’s breath revealed the last of its secrets to us. And the
moral law is not certain of itself.  As a man, I undertake to face the
possibility of annihilation in order that two or three truths may cast
their eternal brilliance over the world.  Sartre has shown that, in
the line of an unauthentic position, the past “takes” in quantity,
and, when solidly constructed, informs the individual. He is the past
in a changed value. But, too, I can recapture my past, validate it, or
condemn it through my successive choices.
The black man wants to be like the white man. For the black man there
is only one destiny. And it is white. Long ago the black man admitted
the unarguable superiority of the white man, and all his efforts are
aimed at achieving a white existence.  Have I no other purpose on
earth, then, but to avenge the Negro of the seventeenth century?  In
this world, which is already trying to disappear, do I have to pose
the problem of black truth?  Do I have to be limited to the
justification of a facial conformation?  I as a man of color do not
have the right to seek to know in what respect my race is superior or
inferior to another race.  I as a man of color do not have the right
to hope that in the white man there will be a crystallization of guilt
toward the past of my race.  I as a man of color do not have the right
to seek ways of stamping down the pride of my former master.  I have
neither the right nor the duty to claim reparation for the
domestication of my ancestors.  There is no Negro mission; there is no
white burden.  I find myself suddenly in a world in which things do
evil; a world in which I am summoned into battle; a world in which it
is always a question of annihilation or triumph.  I find myself—I, a
man—in a world where words wrap themselves in silence; in a world
where the other endlessly hardens himself.  No, I do not have the
right to go and cry out my hatred at the white man. I do not have the
duty to murmur my gratitude to the white man.  My life is caught in
the lasso of existence. My freedom turns me back on myself. No, I do
not have the right to be a Negro.  I do not have the duty to be this
or that. . . .  If the white man challenges my humanity, I will impose
my whole weight as a man on his life and show him that I am not that
“sho’ good eatin’” that he persists in imagining.
I find myself suddenly in the world and I recognize that I have one
right alone: That of demanding human behavior from the other.  One
duty alone: That of not renouncing my freedom through my choices.  I
have no wish to be the victim of the Fraud of a black world.  My life
should not be devoted to drawing up the balance sheet of Negro values.
There is no white world, there is no white ethic, any more than there
is a white intelligence.  There are in every part of the world men who
search.  I am not a prisoner of history. I should not seek there for
the meaning of my destiny.  I should constantly remind myself that the
real leap consists in introducing invention into existence.  In the
world through which I travel, I am endlessly creating myself.  I am a
part of Being to the degree that I go beyond it.  And, through a
private problem, we see the outline of the problem of Action. Placed
in this world, in a situation, “embarked,” as Pascal would have it, am
I going to gather weapons?  Am I going to ask the contemporary white
man to answer for the slave-ships of the seventeenth century?  Am I
going to try by every possible means to cause Guilt to be born in
minds?  Moral anguish in the face of the massiveness of the Past? I am
a Negro, and tons of chains, storms of blows, rivers of expectoration
flow down my shoulders.  But I do not have the right to allow myself
to bog down. I do not have the right to allow the slightest fragment
to remain in my existence. I do not have the right to allow myself to
be mired in what the past has determined.  I am not the slave of the
Slavery that dehumanized my ancestors.  To many colored intellectuals
European culture has a quality of exteriority. What is more, in human
relationships, the Negro may feel himself a stranger to the Western
world. Not wanting to live
the part of a poor relative, of an adopted son, of a bastard child,
shall he feverishly seek to discover a Negro civilization?  Let us be
clearly understood. I am convinced that it would be of the greatest
interest to be able to have contact with a Negro literature or
architecture of the third century before Christ. I should be very
happy to know that a correspondence had flourished between some Negro
philosopher and Plato. But I can absolutely not see how this fact
would change anything in the lives of the eight-year-old children who
labor in the cane fields of Martinique or Guadeloupe.  No attempt must
be made to encase man, for it is his destiny to be set free.  The body
of history does not determine a single one of my actions.  I am my own
foundation.  And it is by going beyond the historical, instrumental
hypothesis that I will initiate the cycle of my freedom.  The disaster
of the man of color lies in the fact that he was enslaved.  The
disaster and the inhumanity of the white man lie in the fact that
somewhere he has killed man.  And even today they subsist, to organize
this dehumanization rationally. But I as a man of color, to the extent
that it becomes possible for me to exist absolutely, do not have the
right to lock myself into a world of retroactive reparations.  I, the
man of color, want only this: That the tool never possess the
man. That the enslavement of man by man cease forever. That is, of one
by another. That it be possible for me to discover and to love man,
wherever he may be.  The Negro is not. Any more than the white man.
Both must turn their backs on the inhuman voices which were those of
their respective ancestors in order that authentic communication be
possible. Before it can adopt a positive voice, freedom requires an
effort at disalienation. At the beginning of his life a man is always
clotted, he is drowned in contingency. The tragedy of the man is that
he was once a child.
It is through the effort to recapture the self and to scrutinize the
self, it is through the lasting tension of their freedom that men will
be able to create the ideal conditions of existence for a human world.
Superiority? Inferiority?  Why not the quite simple attempt to touch
the other, to feel the other, to explain the other to myself?  Was my
freedom not given to me then in order to build the world of the You?
At the conclusion of this study, I want the world to recognize, with
me, the open door of every consciousness.
My ﬁnal prayer: O my body, make of me always a man who questions!
Compiled by Sue Carlton
